The Dhammapada: The Way of the Buddha, Vol 1
Talks given from 21/06/79 am to 30/04/80 am
The Dhammapada: The Way of the Buddha, Vol 1
Chapter #1
Chapter title: We are what we think
21 June 1979 am in Buddha Hall
WE ARE WHAT WE THINK.
ALL THAT WE ARE ARISES WITH OUR THOUGHTS.
WITH OUR THOUGHTS WE MAKE THE WORLD.
SPEAK OR ACT WITH AN IMPURE MIND
AND TROUBLE WILL FOLLOW YOU
AS THE WHEEL FOLLOWS THE OX THAT DRAWS THE CART.
WE ARE WHAT WE THINK.
ALL THAT WE ARE ARISES WITH OUR THOUGHTS.
WITH OUR THOUGHTS WE MAKE THE WORLD.
SPEAK OR ACT WITH A PURE MIND
AND HAPPINESS WILL FOLLOW YOU
AS YOUR SHADOW, UNSHAKABLE.
"LOOK HOW HE ABUSED ME AND BEAT ME,
HOW HE THREW ME DOWN AND ROBBED ME."
LIVE WITH SUCH THOUGHTS AND YOU LIVE IN HATE.
"LOOK HOW HE ABUSED ME AND BEAT ME,
HOW HE THREW ME DOWN AND ROBBED ME."
ABANDON SUCH THOUGHTS, AND LIVE IN LOVE.
IN THIS WORLD
HATE NEVER YET DISPELLED HATE.
ONLY LOVE DISPELS HATE.
THIS IS THE LAW,
ANCIENT AND INEXHAUSTIBLE.
YOU TOO SHALL PASS AWAY.
KNOWING THIS, HOW CAN YOU QUARREL?
HOW EASILY THE WIND OVERTURNS A FRAIL TREE.SEEK HAPPINESS IN THE SENSES,
INDULGE IN FOOD AND SLEEP,
AND YOU TOO WILL BE UPROOTED.
THE WIND CANNOT OVERTURN A MOUNTAIN.
TEMPTATION CANNOT TOUCH THE MAN
WHO IS AWAKE, STRONG AND HUMBLE,
WHO MASTERS HIMSELF AND MINDS THE LAW.
IF A MAN'S THOUGHTS ARE MUDDY,
IF HE IS RECKLESS AND FULL OF DECEIT,
HOW CAN HE WEAR THE YELLOW ROBE?
WHOEVER IS MASTER OF HIS OWN NATURE,
BRIGHT, CLEAR AND TRUE,
HE MAY INDEED WEAR THE YELLOW ROBE.
My beloved bodhisattvas.... Yes, that's how I look at you. That's how you have to start
looking at yourselves. Bodhisattva means a buddha in essence, a buddha in seed, a
buddha asleep, but with all the potential to be awake. In that sense everybody is a
bodhisattva, but not everybody can be called a bodhisattva -- only those who have
started groping for the light, who have started longing for the dawn, in whose hearts
the seed is no longer a seed but has become a sprout, has started growing.
You are bodhisattvas because of your longing to be conscious, to be alert, because of
your quest for the truth. The truth is not far away, but there are very few fortunate ones
in the world who long for it. It is not far away but it is arduous, it is hard to achieve. It is
hard to achieve, not because of its nature, but because of our investment in lies.
We have invested for lives and lives in lies. Our investment is so much that the very
idea of truth makes us frightened. We want to avoid it, we want to escape from the
truth. Lies are beautiful escapes -- convenient, comfortable dreams. But dreams are
dreams. They can enchant you for the moment, they can enslave you for the moment,
but only for the moment. And each dream is followed by tremendous frustration, and
each desire is followed by deep failure.
But we go on rushing into new lies; if old lies are known, we immediately invent new
lies. Remember that only lies can be invented; truth cannot be invented. Truth already
is! Truth has to be discovered, not invented. Lies cannot be discovered, they have to be
invented.
Mind feels very good with lies because the mind becomes the inventor, the doer. And as
the mind becomes the doer, ego is created. With truth, you have nothing to do...and
because you have nothing to do, mind ceases, and with the mind the ego disappears,
evaporates. That's the risk, the ultimate risk.You have moved towards that risk. You have taken a few steps -- staggering, stumbling,
groping, haltingly, with many doubts, but still you have taken a few steps; hence I call
you bodhisattvas.
And THE DHAMMAPADA, the teaching of Gautama the Buddha, can only be taught
to the bodhisattvas. It cannot be taught to the ordinary, mediocre humanity, because it
cannot be understood by them.
These words of Buddha come from eternal silence. They can reach you only if you
receive them in silence. These words of Buddha come from immense purity. Unless you
become a vehicle, a receptacle, humble, egoless, alert, aware, you will not be able to
understand them. Intellectually you will understand them -- they are very simple
words, the simplest possible. But their very simplicity is a problem, because you are not
simple. To understand simplicity you need simplicity of the heart, because only the
simple heart can understand the simple truth. Only the pure can understand that which
has come out of purity.
I have waited long...now the time is ripe, you are ready. The seeds can be sown. These
tremendously important words can be uttered again. For twenty-five centuries, such a
gathering has not existed at all. Yes, there have been a few enlightened masters with a
few disciples -- half a dozen at the most -- and in small gatherings THE
DHAMMAPADA has been taught. But those small gatherings cannot transform such a
huge humanity. It is like throwing sugar in the ocean with spoons: it cannot make it
sweet -- your sugar is simply wasted.
A great, unheard-of experiment has to be done, on such a large scale that at least the
most substantial part of humanity is touched by it -- at least the soul of humanity, the
center of humanity, can be awakened by it. On the periphery, the mediocre minds will
go on sleeping -- let them sleep -- but at the center where intelligence exists a light can
be kindled.
The time is ripe, the time has come for it. My whole work here consists in creating a
buddhafield, an energy field where these eternal truths can be uttered again. It is a rare
opportunity. Only once in a while, after centuries, does such an opportunity exist. Don't
miss it. Be very alert, mindful. Listen to these words not only with the head but with
your heart, with every fiber of your being. Let your totality be stirred by them.
And after these ten days of silence, it is exactly the right moment to bring Buddha back,
to make him alive again amongst you, to let him move amongst you, to let the winds of
Buddha pass through you. Yes, he can be called back again, because nobody every
disappears. Buddha is no longer an embodied person; certainly he does not exist as an
individual anywhere -- but his essence, his soul, is part of the cosmic soul now.
If many many people -- with deep longing, with immense longing, with prayerful
hearts -- desire it, passionately desire it, then the soul that has disappeared into the
cosmic soul can again become manifest in millions of ways.
No true master ever dies, he cannot die. Death does not appear for the masters, does not
exist for them. Hence they are masters. They have known the eternity of life. They have
seen that the body disappears but that the body is not all: the body is only the
periphery, the body is only the garments. The body is the house, the abode, but theguest never disappears. The guest only moves from one abode to another. One day,
ultimately, the guest starts living under the sky, with no shelter...but the guest
continues. Only bodies, houses, come and go, are born and then die. But there is an
inner continuum, an inner continuity -- that is eternal, timeless, deathless.
Whenever you can love a master -- a master like Jesus, Buddha, Zarathustra, Lao Tzu --
if your passion is total, immediately you are bridged.
My talking on Buddha is not just a commentary: it is creating a bridge. Buddha is one of
the most important masters who has ever existed on the earth -- incomparable, unique.
And if you can have a taste of his being, you will be infinitely benefited, blessed.
I am immensely glad, because after these ten days of silence I can say to you that many
of you are now ready to commune with me in silence. That is the ultimate in
communication. Words are inadequate; words say, but only partially. Silence
communes totally.
And to use words is a dangerous game too, because the meaning will remain with me,
only the word will reach you; and you will give it your own meaning, your own color.
It will not contain the same truth that it was meant to contain. It will contain something
else, something far poorer. It will contain your meaning, not my meaning. You can
distort language -- in fact it is almost impossible to avoid distortion -- but you cannot
distort silence. Either you understand or you don't understand.
And for these ten days there were only two categories of people here: those who
understood and those who did not. But there was not a single person who
misunderstood. You cannot misunderstand silence -- that's the beauty of silence. The
demarcation is absolute: either you understand or, simply, you don't understand --
there is nothing to misunderstand.
With words the case is just the opposite: it is very difficult to understand, it is very
difficult to understand that you don't understand; these two are almost impossibilities.
And the third is the only possibility: misunderstanding.
These ten days have been of strange beauty, and of a mysterious majesty too. I no
longer really belong to this shore. My ship has been waiting for me for a long time -- I
should have gone. It is a miracle that I am still in the body. The whole credit goes to
you: to your love, to your prayers, to your longing. You would like me to linger a little
while longer on this shore, hence the impossible has become possible.
These ten days, I was not feeling together with my body. I was feeling very uprooted,
dislocated. It is strange to be in the body when you don't feel that you are in the body.
And it is also strange to go on living in a place which no longer belongs to you -- my
home is on the other shore. And the call comes persistently. But because you need me, it
is the compassion of the universe -- you can call it God's compassion -- that is allowing
me to be in the body a little more.
It was strange, it was beautiful, it was mysterious, it was majestic, it was magical. And
many of you have felt it. Many of you have felt it in different ways. A few have felt it as
a very frightening phenomenon, as if death is knocking on the door. A few have felt it
as a great confusion. A few have felt shocked, utterly shocked. But everybody has been
touched in some way or other.Only the newcomers were a little at a loss -- they could not comprehend what was
going on. But I feel thankful to them too. Although they could not understand what was
going on, they waited -- they were waiting for me to speak, they were waiting for me to
say something, they were hoping. Many were afraid that I might not speak ever
again...that was also a possibility. I was not certain myself.
Words are becoming more and more difficult for me. They are becoming more and
more of an effort. I have to say something so I go on saying something to you. But I
would like you to get ready as soon as possible so that we can simply sit in
silence...listening to the birds and their songs...or listening just to your own
heartbeat...just being here, doing nothing....
Get ready as soon as possible, because I may stop speaking any day. And let the news
be spread to all the nooks and corners of the world: those who want to understand me
only through the words, they should come soon, because I may stop speaking any day.
Unpredictably, any day, it may happen -- it may happen even in the middle of a
sentence. Then I am not going to complete the sentence! Then it will hang forever and
forever...incomplete.
But this time you have pulled me back.
These sayings of Buddha are called THE DHAMMAPADA. This name has to be
understood. Dhamma means many things. It means the ultimate law, logos. By
"ultimate law" is meant that which keeps the whole universe together. Invisible it is,
intangible it is -- but it is certainly; otherwise the universe would fall apart. Such a vast,
infinite universe, running so smoothly, so harmoniously, is enough proof that there
must be an undercurrent that connects everything, that joins everything, that bridges
everything -- that we are not islands, that the smallest grass leaf is joined to the greatest
star. Destroy a small grass leaf and you have destroyed something of immense value to
the existence itself.
In existence there is no hierarchy, there is nothing small and nothing great. The greatest
star and the smallest grass leaf, both exist as equals; hence the other meaning of the
word 'dhamma'. The other meaning is justice, the equality, the nonhierarchic existence.
Existence is absolutely communist; it knows no classes, it is all one. Hence the other
meaning of the word 'dhamma' -- justice.
And the third meaning is righteousness, virtue. Existence is very virtuous. Even if you
find something which you cannot call virtue, it must be because of your
misunderstanding; otherwise the existence is absolutely virtuous. Whatsoever happens
here, always happens rightly. The wrong never happens. It may appear wrong to you
because you have a certain idea of what right is, but when you look without any
prejudice, nothing is wrong, all is right. Birth is right, death is right. Beauty is right and
ugliness is right.
But our minds are small, our comprehension is limited; we cannot see the whole, we
always see only a small part. We are like a person who is hiding behind his door and
looking through the keyhole into the street. He always sees things...yes, somebody is
moving, a car suddenly passes by. One moment it was not there, one moment it is there,
and another moment it is gone forever. That's how we are looking at existence. We saysomething is in the future, then it comes into the present, and then it has gone into the
past.
In fact, time is a human invention. It is always now! Existence knows no past, no future
-- it knows only the present.
But we are sitting behind a keyhole and looking. A person is not there, then suddenly
he appears; and then as suddenly as he appears he disappears too. Now you have to
create time. Before the person appeared he was in the future; he was there, but for you
he was in the future. Then he appeared; now he is in the present -- he is the same! And
you cannot see him anymore through your small keyhole -- he has become past.
Nothing is past, nothing is future -- all is always present. But our ways of seeing are
very limited.
Hence we go on asking why there is misery in the world, why there is this and
that...why? If we can look at the whole, all these whys disappear. And to look at the
whole, you will have to come out of your room, you will have to open the door...you
will have to drop this keyhole vision.
This is what mind is: a keyhole, and a very small keyhole it is. Compared to the vast
universe, what are our eyes, ears, hands? What can we grasp? Nothing of much
importance. And those tiny fragments of truth, we become too much attached to them.
If you see the whole, everything is as it should be -- that is the meaning of "everything is
right." Wrong exists not. Only God exists; the Devil is man's creation.
The third meaning of 'dhamma' can be God -- but Buddha never uses the word 'God'
because it has become wrongly associated with the idea of a person, and the law is a
presence, not a person. Hence Buddha never uses the word 'God', but whenever he
wants to convey something of God he uses the word 'dhamma'. His mind is that of a
very profound scientist. Because of this, many have thought him to be an atheist -- he is
not. He is the greatest theist the world has ever known or will ever know -- but he never
talks about God. He never uses the word, that's all, but by 'dhamma' he means exactly
the same. "That which is" is the meaning of the word 'God', and that's exactly the
meaning of 'dhamma'. 'Dhamma' also means discipline -- different dimensions of the
word. One who wants to know the truth will have to discipline himself in many ways.
Don't forget the meaning of the word 'discipline' -- it simply means the capacity to
learn, the availability to learn, the receptivity to learn. Hence the word 'disciple'.
'Disciple' means one who is ready to drop his old prejudices, to put his mind aside, and
look into the matter without any prejudice, without any a priori conception.
And 'dhamma' also means the ultimate truth. When mind disappears, when the ego
disappears, then what remains? Something certainly remains, but it cannot be called
'something' -- hence Buddha calls it 'nothing'. But let me remind you, otherwise you will
misunderstand him: whenever he uses the word 'nothing' he means no-thing. Divide
the word in two; don't use it as one word -- bring a hyphen between 'no' and 'thing',
then you know exactly the meaning of 'nothing'.
The ultimate law is not a thing. It is not an object that you can observe. It is your
interiority, it is subjectivity.Buddha would have agreed totally with the Danish thinker, Soren Kierkegaard. He
says: Truth is subjectivity. That is the difference between fact and truth. A fact is an
objective thing. Science goes on searching for more and more facts, and science will
never arrive at truth -- it cannot by the very definition of the word. Truth is the
interiority of the scientist, but he never looks at it. He goes on observing other things.
He never becomes aware of his own being.
That is the last meaning of 'dhamma': your interiority, your subjectivity, your truth.
One thing very significant -- allow it to sink deep into your heart: truth is never a
theory, a hypothesis; it is always an experience. Hence my truth cannot be your truth.
My truth is inescapably my truth; it will remain my truth, it cannot be yours. We cannot
share it. Truth is unsharable, untransferable, incommunicable, inexpressible.
I can explain to you how I have attained it, but I cannot say what it is. The "how" is
explainable, but not the "why." The discipline can be shown, but not the goal. Each one
has to come to it in his own way. Each one has to come to it in his own inner being. In
absolute aloneness it is revealed.
And the second word is PADA. 'Pada' also has many meanings. One, the most
fundamental meaning, is path. Religion has two dimensions: the dimension of "what"
and the dimension of "how." The "what" cannot be talked about; it is impossible. But the
"how" can be talked about, the "how" is sharable. That is the meaning of 'path'. I can
indicate the path to you; I can show you how I have traveled, how I reached the sunlit
peaks. I can tell you about the whole geography of it, the whole topography of it. I can
give you a contour map, but I cannot say how it feels to be on the sunlit peak.
It is like you can ask Edmund Hillary or Tensing how they reached the highest peak of
the Himalayas, Gourishankar. They can give you the whole map of how they reached.
But if you ask them what they felt when they reached, they can only shrug their
shoulders. That freedom that they must have known is unspeakable; the beauty, the
benediction, the vast sky, the height, and the colorful clouds, and the sun and the
unpolluted air, and the virgin snow on which nobody had ever traveled before...all that
is impossible to convey. One has to reach those sunlit peaks to know it. 'Pada' means
path, 'pada' also means step, foot, foundation. All these meanings are significant. You
have to move from where you are. You have to become a great process, a growth.
People have become stagnant pools; they have to become rivers, because only rivers
reach the ocean. And it also means foundation, because it is the fundamental truth of
life. Without dhamma, without relating in some way to the ultimate truth, your life has
no foundation, no meaning, no significance, it cannot have any glory. It will be an
exercise in utter futility. If you are not bridged with the total you cannot have any
significance of your own. You will remain a driftwood -- at the mercy of the winds, not
knowing where you are going and not knowing who you are. The search for truth, the
passionate search for truth, creates the bridge, gives you a foundation. These sutras that
are compiled as THE DHAMMAPADA are to be understood not intellectually but
existentially. Become like sponges: let it soak, let it sink into you. Don't be sitting there
judging; otherwise you will miss the Buddha. Don't sit there constantly chattering inyour mind about whether it is right or wrong -- you will miss the point. Don't be
bothered whether it is right or wrong.
The first, the most primary thing, is to understand what it is -- what Buddha is saying,
what Buddha is trying to say. There is no need to judge right now. The first, basic need
is to understand exactly what he means. And the beauty of it is that if you understand
exactly what it means, you will be convinced of its truth, you will know its truth. Truth
has its own ways of convincing people; it needs no other proofs.
Truth never argues: it is a song, not a syllogism.
The sutras:
WE ARE WHAT WE THINK.
ALL THAT WE ARE ARISES WITH OUR THOUGHTS.
WITH OUR THOUGHTS WE MAKE THE WORLD.
It has been said to you again and again that the Eastern mystics believe that the world is
illusory. It is true: they not only believe that the world is untrue, illusory, maya -- they
know that it is maya, it is an illusion, a dream. But when they use the word sansara --
the world -- they don't mean the objective world that science investigates; no, not at all.
They don't mean the world of the trees and the mountains and the rivers; no, not at all.
They mean the world that you create, spin and weave inside your mind, the wheel of
the mind that goes on moving and spinning. Sansara has nothing to do with the outside
world.
There are three things to be remembered. One is the outside world, the objective world.
Buddha will never say anything about it because that is not his concern; he is not an
Albert Einstein. Then there is a second world: the world of the mind, the world that the
psychoanalysts, the psychiatrists, the psychologists investigate. Buddha will have a few
things to say about it, not many, just a few -- in fact, one: that it is illusory, that it has no
truth, either objective or subjective, that it is in between.
The first world is the objective world, which science investigates. The second world is
the world of the mind, which the psychologist investigates. And the third world is your
subjectivity, your interiority, your inner self.
Buddha's indication is towards the interiormost core of your being. But you are too
much involved with the mind. Unless he helps you to become untrapped from the
mind, you will never know the third, the real world: your inner substance. Hence he
starts with the statement: WE ARE WHAT WE THINK. That's what everybody is: his
mind. ALL THAT WE ARE ARISES WITH OUR THOUGHTS.
Just imagine for a single moment that all thoughts have ceased...then who are you? If all
thoughts cease for a single moment, then who are you? No answer will be coming. You
cannot say, "I am a Catholic," "I am a Protestant," "I am a Hindu," "I am a
Mohammedan" -- you cannot say that. All thoughts have ceased. So the Koran has
disappeared, the Bible, the Gita...all words have ceased! You cannot even utter yourname. All language has disappeared so you cannot say to which country you belong, to
which race. When thoughts cease, who are you? An utter emptiness, nothingness, no-
thingness.
It is because of this that Buddha has used a strange word; nobody has ever done such a
thing before, or since. The mystics have always used the word 'self' for the interiormost
core of your being -- Buddha uses the word 'no-self'. And I perfectly agree with him; he
is far more accurate, closer to truth. To use the word 'self' -- even if you use the word
'Self' with a capital 'S', does not make much difference. It continues to give you the
sense of the ego, and with a capital 'S' it may give you an even bigger ego.
Buddha does not use the words atma, 'self', atta. He uses just the opposite word: 'no-
self', anatma, anatta. He says when mind ceases, there is no self left -- you have become
universal, you have overflowed the boundaries of the ego, you are a pure space,
uncontaminated by anything. You are just a mirror reflecting nothing.
WE ARE WHAT WE THINK. ALL THAT WE ARE ARISES WITH OUR THOUGHTS.
WITH OUR THOUGHTS WE MAKE THE WORLD.
If you really want to know who, in reality, you are, you will have to learn how to cease
as a mind, how to stop thinking. That's what meditation is all about. Meditation means
going out of the mind, dropping the mind and moving in the space called no-mind.
And in no-mind you will know the ultimate truth, dhamma.
And moving from mind to no-mind is the step, pada. And this is the whole secret of
THE DHAMMAPADA.
SPEAK OR ACT WITH AN IMPURE MIND
AND TROUBLE WILL FOLLOW YOU
AS THE WHEEL FOLLOWS THE OX THAT DRAWS THE CART.
Whenever Buddha uses the phrase 'impure mind' you can misunderstand it. By 'impure
mind' he means mind, because all mind is impure. Mind as such is impure, and no-
mind is pure. Purity means no-mind; impurity means mind.
SPEAK OR ACT WITH AN IMPURE MIND -- speak or act with mind -- AND
TROUBLE WILL FOLLOW YOU.... Misery is a by-product, the shadow of the mind, the
shadow of the illusory mind. Misery is a nightmare. You suffer only because you are
asleep. And there is no way of escaping it while you are asleep. Unless you become
awakened the nightmare will persist. It may change forms, it can have millions of
forms, but it will persist.
Misery is the shadow of the mind: mind means sleep, mind means unconsciousness,
mind means unawareness. Mind means not knowing who you are and still pretending
that you know. Mind means not knowing where you are going and still pretending that
you know the goal, that you know what life is meant for -- not knowing anything about
life and still believing that you know.
This mind will bring misery as certainly AS THE WHEEL FOLLOWS THE OX THAT
DRAWS THE CART.WE ARE WHAT WE THINK.
ALL THAT WE ARE ARISES WITH OUR THOUGHTS.
WITH OUR THOUGHTS WE MAKE THE WORLD.
SPEAK OR ACT WITH A PURE MIND
AND HAPPINESS WILL FOLLOW YOU
AS YOUR SHADOW, UNSHAKABLE.
Again, remember: when Buddha says "pure mind" he means no-mind. It is very difficult
to translate a man like Buddha. It is almost an impossible job, because a man like
Buddha uses language in his own way; he creates his own language. He cannot use the
ordinary language with ordinary meanings, because he has something extraordinary to
convey.
Ordinary words are absolutely meaningless in reference to the experience of a Buddha.
But you should understand the problem. The problem is, he cannot use an absolutely
new language; nobody will understand. It will look like gibberish.
That's how the word 'gibberish' came into existence. It comes from a Sufi; his name was
Jabbar. He invented a new language. Nobody was able to make head or tail of it. How
can you understand an absolutely new language? He looked like a madman, uttering
nonsense, utter nonsense. That's how it happens! If you listen to a Chinese and you
don't understand Chinese, it is utter nonsense.
Somebody was asking a man who had gone to China, "How do they find such strange
names for people? -- Ching, Chung, Chang...."
The man said, "They have a way: they collect all the spoons in the house and they throw
them upwards, and when those spoons fall down...ching! chung! chang! or whatsoever
sound they make, that's how they name a child."
But the same is the case: if a Chinese hears English he thinks, "What nonsense!"
If that is the case with languages which millions of people use, what will be the case
with a Buddha if he invents an original language? Only he will understand it and
nobody else. Jabbar did that -- must have been a very courageous man. People thought
that he was mad.
The English word 'gibberish' comes from Jabbar. Nobody knows what he was saying.
Nobody has even tried to collect it...how to collect it? There was no alphabet. And what
he was saying was making no sense at all, so we don't know what treasures we have
missed.
The problem for Buddha is that either he has to use your language as you use it -- then
he cannot convey his experience at all -- or he has to invent a new language nobody will
understand. So all great masters have to be very much in the middle. They will use your
language, but they will give your words their color, their flavor. The bottles will be
yours, the wine will be theirs. And thinking that because the bottles are yours the wine
is also yours, you will carry them for centuries. And there is a possibility that, thinkingthat it is your wine because the bottle is yours, sometimes you may drink out of it, you
may become drunk.
That's why it is very difficult to translate. Buddha used a language that was understood
by the people who surrounded him, but he gave twists and turns to words in such a
subtle way that even people who knew the language were not alerted, were not
shocked. They thought they were hearing their own language.
Buddha uses the words "pure mind" for no-mind, because if you say "no-mind,"
immediately it becomes impossible to understand. But if you say "pure mind," then
some communication is possible. Slowly slowly, he will convince you that pure mind
means no-mind. But that will take time; very slowly you have to be caught and trapped
into a totally new experience. But remember always: pure mind means no-mind,
impure means mind.
By putting these adjectives, impure and pure, he is compromising with you so that you
don't become alerted too early and escape. You have to be allured, seduced. All great
masters are seductive -- that is their art. They seduce you in such a way that slowly
slowly, you are ready to drink anything, whatsoever they give. First they supply you
with ordinary water, then slowly slowly, wine has to be mixed in it. Then water has to
be withdrawn...and one day you are completely drunk. But it has to be a very slow
process.
As you go deeper into the sutras you will understand. Impure mind means mind, pure
mind means no-mind. And happiness will follow you if you have a pure mind or no
mind.... HAPPINESS WILL FOLLOW YOU AS YOUR SHADOW, UNSHAKABLE.
Misery is a by-product, so is bliss. Misery is a by-product of being asleep, bliss is a by-
product of being awake. Hence you cannot seek and search for bliss directly, and those
who seek and search for bliss directly are bound to fail, doomed to fail. Bliss can be
attained only by those who don't seek bliss directly; on the contrary, they seek
awareness. And when awareness comes, bliss comes of its own accord, just like your
shadow, unshakable.
"LOOK HOW HE ABUSED ME AND BEAT ME,
HOW HE THREW ME DOWN AND ROBBED ME."
LIVE WITH SUCH THOUGHTS AND YOU LIVE IN HATE.
"LOOK HOW HE ABUSED ME AND BEAT ME,
HOW HE THREW ME DOWN AND ROBBED ME."
ABANDON SUCH THOUGHTS, AND LIVE IN LOVE.
Something of profound importance: hate exists with the past and the future -- love
needs no past, no future. Love exists in the present. Hate has a reference in the past:
somebody abused you yesterday and you are carrying it like a wound, a hangover. Or
you are afraid that somebody is going to abuse you tomorrow -- a fear, a shadow of the
fear. And you are already getting ready, you are getting prepared to encounter it.Hate exists in the past and the future. You cannot hate in the present -- try, and you will
be utterly impotent. Try it today: sit silently and hate somebody in the present, with no
reference to the past or the future...you cannot do it. It cannot be done; in the very
nature of things it is impossible. Hate can exist only if you remember the past: this man
did something to you yesterday -- then hate is possible. Or this man is going to do
something tomorrow -- then too hate is possible. But if you don't have any reference to
the past or the future -- this man has not done anything to you and he is not going to do
anything to you, this man is just sitting there -- how can you hate? But you can love.
Love needs no reference -- that's the beauty of love and the freedom of love. Hate is a
bondage. Hate is imprisonment -- imposed by you upon yourself. And hate creates
hate, hate provokes hate. If you hate somebody you are creating hate in that person's
heart for yourself. And the whole world exists in hate, in destructiveness, in violence, in
jealousy, in competitiveness. People are at each other's throats either in reality,
actuality, in action, or at least in their minds, in their thoughts, everybody is murdering,
killing. That's why we have created a hell out of this beautiful earth -- which could have
become a paradise.
Love, and the earth becomes a paradise again. And the immense beauty of love is that it
has no reference. Love comes from you for no reason at all. It is your outpouring bliss, it
is your sharing of your heart. It is the sharing of the song of your being. And sharing is
so joyful -- hence one shares! Sharing for sharing's sake, for no other motive.
But what love you have known in the past is not the love Buddha is talking about or I
am talking about. Your love is nothing but the other side of hate. Hence your love has
reference: somebody has been beautiful to you yesterday, so nice he was that you feel
great love for him. This is not love; this is the other side of hate -- the reference proves it.
Or somebody is going to be nice to you tomorrow: the way he smiled at you, the way he
talked to you, the way he invited you to his house tomorrow -- he is going to be loving
to you. And great love arises.
This is not the love buddhas talk about. This is hate disguised as love -- that's why your
love can turn into hate any moment. Scratch a person just a little bit, and the love
disappears and hate arises. It is not even skin-deep. Even so-called great lovers are
continuously fighting, continuously at each other's throats -- nagging, destructive. And
people think this is love....
You can ask Astha and Abhiyana -- they are in such a love that Astha is having a black
eye almost every day. Great fight! But when great fight goes on, people think something
is happening. When nothing is happening -- no fight, no quarrel -- people feel empty. "It
is better to be fighting than to be empty" -- that's the idea of millions of people in the
world. At least the fight keeps you engaged, at least the fight keeps you involved, and
the fight makes you important. Life seems to have some meaning -- ugly meaning, but
at least some meaning.
Your love is not really love: it is its very opposite. It is hate disguised as love,
camouflaged as love, parading as love. True love has no reference. It thinks not of the
yesterdays, it thinks not of the tomorrows. True love is a spontaneous welling up of joyin you...and the sharing of it...and the showering of it...for no other reason, for no other
motive, than just the joy of sharing it.
The birds singing in the morning, this cuckoo calling from the distance...for no reason.
The heart is just so full of joy that a song bursts forth. When I am talking about love I
am talking about such love. Remember it. And if you can move into the dimension of
this love, you will be in paradise -- immediately. And you will start creating a paradise
on the earth.
Love creates love just as hate creates hate.
IN THIS WORLD
HATE NEVER YET DISPELLED HATE.
ONLY LOVE DISPELS HATE.
THIS IS THE LAW,
ANCIENT AND INEXHAUSTIBLE.
Aes dhammo sanantano -- this the law, eternal, ancient and inexhaustible.
What is the law? That hate never dispels hate -- darkness cannot dispel darkness -- that
only love dispels hate. Only light can dispel darkness: love is light, the light of your
being, and hate is the darkness of your being. If you are dark inside, you go on
throwing hate all around you. If you are light within, luminous, then you go on
radiating light around you.
A sannyasin has to be a radiant love, a radiant light.
AES DHAMMO SANANTANO.... Buddha repeats this again and again -- this is the
eternal law. What is the eternal law? Only love dispels hate, only light dispels darkness.
Why? -- because darkness in itself is only a negative state; it has no positive existence of
its own. It does not exist really -- how can you dispel it? You cannot do anything
directly to darkness. If you want to do anything to darkness you will have to do
something with light. Bring light in and darkness is gone, take light out and darkness
comes in. But you cannot bring darkness in or out directly -- you cannot do anything
with darkness. Remember, you cannot do anything with hate either.
And that's the difference between moral teachers and religious mystics: moral teachers
go on propounding the false law. They go on propounding, "Fight with darkness -- fight
with hate, fight with anger, fight with sex, fight with this, fight with that!" Their whole
approach is, "Fight the negative," while the real, true master teaches you the positive
law: aes dhammo sanantano -- the eternal law, "Do not fight with darkness." And hate is
darkness, and sex is darkness, and jealousy is darkness, and greed is darkness and
anger is darkness.
Bring the light in....
How is the light brought in? Become silent, thoughtless, conscious, alert, aware, awake -
- this is how light is brought in. And the moment you are alert, aware, hate will not be
found. Try to hate somebody with awareness....These are experiments to be done, not just words to be understood -- experiments to be
done. That's why I say don't try to understand only intellectually: become existential
experimenters.
Try to hate somebody consciously and you will find it impossible. Either consciousness
disappears, then you can hate; or if you are conscious, hate disappears. They can't exist
together. There is no coexistence possible: light and darkness cannot exist together --
because darkness is nothing but the absence of light.
The true masters teach you how to attain to God; they never say renounce the world.
Renunciation is negative. They don't tell you to escape from the world, they teach you
to escape into God. They teach you to attain to truth, not to fight with lies. And lies are
millions. If you go on fighting it will take millions of lives, and still nothing will be
attained. And truth is one; hence truth can be attained instantly, this very moment it is
possible.
YOU TOO SHALL PASS AWAY.
KNOWING THIS, HOW CAN YOU QUARREL?
Life is so short, so momentary, and you are wasting it in quarreling? Use the whole
energy for meditation -- it is the same energy. You can fight with it or you can become a
light through it.
HOW EASILY THE WIND OVERTURNS A FRAIL TREE.
SEEK HAPPINESS IN THE SENSES,
INDULGE IN FOOD AND SLEEP,
AND YOU TOO WILL BE UPROOTED.
Buddha says: Remember, if you depend on the senses you will remain very fragile --
because senses cannot give you strength. They cannot give you strength because they
cannot give you a constant foundation. They are constantly in flux; everything is
changing. Where can you have a shelter? Where can you make a foundation?
One moment this woman looks beautiful and another moment another woman. If you
just decide by the senses, you will be a constant turmoil -- you cannot decide because
senses go on changing their opinions. One moment something seems so incredible, and
another moment it is just ugly, unbearable. And we depend on these senses.
Buddha says: Don't depend on senses -- depend on awareness. Awareness is something
hidden behind the senses. It is not the eye that sees. If you go to the eye specialist he
will say it is the eye that sees, but that is not true. The eye is only a mechanism --
through which somebody else sees. The eye is only a window; the window cannot see.
When you stand at the window, you can look outside. Somebody passing in the street
may think, "The window is seeing me." The eye is only a window, an aperture. Who is
behind the eye?The ear does not hear -- who is behind the ear who hears? Who is the one who feels? Go
on searching for that and you will find some foundation; otherwise, your life will be just
a dry leaf in the wind.
THE WIND CANNOT OVERTURN A MOUNTAIN.
TEMPTATION CANNOT TOUCH THE MAN
WHO IS AWAKE, STRONG AND HUMBLE,
WHO MASTERS HIMSELF AND MINDS THE LAW.
Meditation will make you awake, strong and humble. Meditation will make you awake
because it will give you the first experience of yourself. You are not the body, you are
not the mind -- you are the pure witnessing consciousness. And when this witnessing
consciousness is touched, a great awakening happens -- as if a snake was sitting coiled
up and suddenly it uncoils, as if somebody was asleep and has been shaken and
awakened. Suddenly a great awakening inside: for the first time you feel you are. For
the first time you feel the truth of your being.
And certainly it makes you strong; you are no longer fragile, not like a frail tree that any
wind can overturn. Now you become a mountain! Now you have a foundation, now
you are rooted -- no wind can overturn a mountain. You become awake, you become
strong, and still you become humble. This strength does not bring any ego in you. You
become humble because you become aware that the same witnessing soul exists in
everybody, even in animals, birds, plants, rocks.
These are only different ways of sleeping! Somebody sleeps on the right side, and
somebody sleeps on the left side, and somebody sleeps on the back...these are only
different ways of sleeping. A rock has its own way of sleep, a tree a different way of
sleep, a bird still a different way -- but only differences in the ways and methods of
sleeping; otherwise deep down at the core of every being is the same witnessing, the
same God. That makes you humble. Even before a rock you know you are nobody
special, because the whole existence is made of the same stuff called consciousness. And
if you are awake, strong, and humble, this gives you a mastery over yourself.
IF A MAN'S THOUGHTS ARE MUDDY,
IF HE IS RECKLESS AND FULL OF DECEIT,
HOW CAN HE WEAR THE YELLOW ROBE?
Buddha chose for his sannyasins the yellow robe, just as I have chosen the orange. That
is the difference between my approach and the Buddha's approach. Yellow represents
death -- the yellow leaf. Yellow represents the setting sun, the evening.
Buddha emphasized death too much -- that's a way. If you emphasize death too much,
it helps: people become more and more aware of life in contrast to death. And when
you emphasize death again and again and again, you help people to awaken. They have
to be awake because death is coming. Whenever a new sannyasin would be initiated by
Buddha, he would tell him, "Go to the cemetery -- and just be there and go on watchingfuneral pyres, dead bodies being carried, burned...go on watching. And go on
remembering this is going to happen to you too. Three months' meditation on death,
then come back." That was the beginning of sannyas.
There are only two possible ways. One is, emphasize death; the other is, emphasize life.
Because these are the only two things in existence -- life and death. Buddha chose death
as a symbol; hence the yellow robe.
The orange represents life; it is the color of blood. It represents the morning sun, the
early dawn, the eastern sky becoming red. My emphasis is on life. But the purpose is
the same. I want you to be so passionately in love with life that your very passion for
life makes you aware, your very intensity to live it makes you awake.
And death is in the future, and life is now, so if you think of death you will be thinking
of the future. If you think of death it will be an inference: you will see somebody else
dying, you will never see yourself dying. You can imagine, you can infer, you can think,
but this will be a thinking.
Life need not be thought, it can be lived. It can help you to be mindless more than death
can. Hence my choice is far better than Buddha's choice, because life is right now; you
need not go to a cemetery. All that you need is to be alert and life is everywhere...in the
flowers, in the birds, in the people around you, the children laughing...and in you!...and
right now! You need not think about it, you need not infer it. You can just close your
eyes and feel it -- you can feel the tickle of it, you can feel the beat of it.
But both methods can be used: death can be used for you to become a meditator, or life
can be used -- my choice is life. And I emphasize and repeat that my choice is far better
than Buddha's. Buddha's choice of death as a symbol helped this whole country to
become dead, dull, insipid. My choice of life as the symbol can revive this country -- not
only this country but the whole world -- because it is not only the Buddha who has
chosen death as a symbol, Christianity has also chosen death as a symbol -- the cross. So
the two greatest religions of the world, Christianity and Buddhism, are death-oriented.
And because of these two religions.... And their impact has been the greatest:
Christianity has transformed the whole West, and Buddhism has transformed the
whole East.
Jesus and Buddha have been the two greatest teachers, but the choice of death as a
symbol has been dangerous, has been a calamity. I choose life. I would like this whole
earth to be full of life, more and more life, pulsating life. But what Buddha says about
his yellow robe I would also say about my orange robe. He says: IF A MAN'S
THOUGHTS ARE MUDDY, IF HE IS RECKLESS AND FULL OF DECEIT, HOW CAN
HE WEAR THE YELLOW ROBE?
WHOEVER IS MASTER OF HIS OWN NATURE,
BRIGHT, CLEAR AND TRUE,
HE MAY INDEED WEAR THE ORANGE ROBE.
What he says about the yellow robe, I say about the orange robe: WHOEVER
IS...BRIGHT, CLEAR AND TRUE, HE MAY INDEED WEAR THE ORANGE ROBE.
AES DHAMMO SANANTANO.The Dhammapada: The Way of the Buddha, Vol 1
Chapter #2
Chapter title: An empty chair
22 June 1979 am in Buddha Hall
The first question:
Question 1
BELOVED MASTER,
AN EMPTY CHAIR
A SILENT HALL
AN INTRODUCTION TO BUDDHA --
HOW ELOQUENT!
HOW RARE!
Yes, Subhuti, that's the only way to introduce the Buddha to you. Silence is the only
language he can be expressed in. Words are too profane, too inadequate, too limited.
Only an empty space...utterly silent...can represent the being of a buddha.
There is a temple in Japan, absolutely empty, not even a statue of the Buddha in the
temple, and it is known as a temple dedicated to Buddha. When visitors come and they
ask, "Where is the Buddha? The temple is dedicated to him..." the priest laughs and he
says, "This empty space, this silence -- this is Buddha!"
Stones cannot represent him, statues cannot represent him. Buddha is not a stone, not a
statue. Buddha is not a form -- Buddha is a formless fragrance. Hence, it was not just
accidental that ten days' silence preceded these talks on Buddha. That silence was the
only possible preface.
Subhuti, you are right: "An empty chair...." Yes, only an empty chair can represent him.
This chair is empty, and this man talking to you is empty. It is an empty space pouring
itself into you. There is nobody within, just a silence.
Because you cannot understand silence, it has to be translated into language. It is
because of your limitation that I have to speak; otherwise there is no need. Truth cannot
be said, has never been said, will never be said. All scriptures talk about truth, go on
talking about it, about and about, but no scripture has yet been capable of expressing it -
- neither the Vedas, nor the Bible, nor the Koran -- because it is impossible in the very
nature of things to express it.
It cannot be said -- it can only be shown. It cannot be logically proved, but love can
prove it. Where logic fails, love succeeds. Where language fails, silence succeeds.
I cannot prove it, but the absence of the 'I' within me can become an absolute proof for
it. If you want to understand Buddha, really, you will have to come closer and closer to
this silence that I am, you will have to become more and more intimate, available,
vulnerable, to this nobody who is talking to you.I am not a person. The person died long ago. It is a presence -- an absence and a
presence. I am absent as a person, as an individual; I am present as a vehicle, a passage,
a hollow bamboo. It can become a flute -- only the hollow bamboo can become a flute.
I have given myself to the whole. Now whatsoever the will of the whole...if he wants to
speak through me, I am available; if he does not want to speak through me, I am
available. His will is the only will now. I have no will of my own.
That's why many times you will find contradictions in my statements -- because I
cannot change anything. God is contradictory because God is a paradox. He contains
the polar opposites: he is darkness and light, summer and winter, life and death.
Sometimes he speaks as life and sometimes as death, and sometimes he comes as
summer and sometimes as winter...what can I do?
If I interfere, I will misrepresent. If I try to be consistent then I will be false. I can be true
only if I will remain available to all the contradictions that God contains.
This chair, Subhuti, is certainly empty. And the day you are able to see this chair empty,
this body empty, this being empty, you will have seen me, you will have contacted me.
That is the real moment when the disciple meets the master. It is a dissolution, a
disappearance...the dewdrop slipping into the ocean, or the ocean slipping into the
dewdrop. It is the same! -- the master disappearing into the disciple and the disciple
disappearing into the master. And then there prevails a profound silence.
It is not a dialogue! That's where Eastern religions, particularly Buddhism, have
reached higher pinnacles than Christianity, Judaism, Islam -- because Islam, Judaism,
Christianity, remain clinging somehow to the idea of a dialogue. But a dialogue
presupposes duality, twoness. Islam, Christianity, Judaism, are religions of prayer.
Prayer presupposes that there is a God separate from you, that you can address him.
Hence Martin Buber's book became very famous -- I AND THOU. That is the essence of
prayer. But 'I' and 'thou'...a duality is needed for a dialogue. And howsoever beautiful
the dialogue may be, it is still a division, a split; it is not yet union. The river has not
entered into the ocean. Maybe it has come very close, just on the verge, but it is holding
back.
Buddhism is not the religion of prayer, it is the religion of meditation. And that's the
difference between prayer and meditation: prayer is a dialogue, meditation is a silence.
Prayer has to be addressed to somebody -- real, unreal, but it has to be addressed to
somebody. Meditation is not an address at all; one has simply to fall into silence, one
has simply to disappear into nothingness. When one is not, meditation is.
And Buddha is meditation -- that is his flavor. These ten days we remained silent, we
remained in meditation. The real thing has been said. Those who have not heard the
real thing, now for them I will be speaking.
The meditation that prevailed for ten days was with a difference -- and that is the
difference between Buddha's and my approach -- a little difference, but of tremendous
import. And that has to be understood by you, because I am not a mere commentator
on Buddha. I am not only echoing him, I am not simply a mirror to reflect him; I am a
response, not a reflection. I am not a scholar, I am not going to make a scholarly analysis
of his statements -- I am a poet!I have seen the same nothingness that he has seen, and, certainly, I have seen it in my
own way. Buddha has his own way, I have my own way -- of seeing, of being. Both
ways reach the same peak, but the ways are different. My way has a little difference --
little, but of profound import, remember.
These ten days were not only of silent meditation -- these ten days were of music,
silence, and meditation. Music is my contribution to it. Buddha would not have allowed
it. On that point we would have quarreled. He would not have allowed music; he
would have said that music is a disturbance. He would have insisted on pure silence, he
would have said that is enough. But that is where we agree to disagree.
To me, music and meditation are two aspects of the same phenomenon. And without
music, meditation lacks something; without music, meditation is a little dull, unalive.
Without meditation, music is simply noise -- harmonious, but noise. Without
meditation, music is an entertainment. And without music, meditation becomes more
and more negative, tends to be death-oriented.
Hence my insistence that music and meditation should go together. That adds a new
dimension -- to both. Both are enriched by it.
Remember three M's just as you remember three R's. The first M is mathematics;
mathematics is the purest science. The second M is music; music is pure art. And the
third M is meditation; meditation is pure religion. Where all these three meet, you attain
the trinity.
My approach is scientific. Even if I make illogical statements, I make them very very
logically. Even if I assert paradoxes, they are asserted in a logical way. Whatsoever I am
saying has a mathematics behind it, a method, a certain scientific approach. I am not an
unscientific person. My science serves my religion; the science is not the end but it is a
beautiful beginning.
And my approach is artistic, aesthetic. I cannot help you unless this energy field
becomes musical. Music is pure art. And if it is joined with mathematics, it becomes a
tremendously powerful instrument to penetrate into your interiority. Of course, it will
not be complete unless meditation is the highest peak, the purest religion.
And we are trying to create the ultimate synthesis. This is my trinity: mathematics,
music, meditation. This is my trimurti -- three faces of God. You can attain to God
through one face, but then your experience of God will not be so rich as it will be when
you attain two faces. But it will still lack something unless you attain all the three faces.
When you know God as a trinity, when you have come through all the three
dimensions, your experience, your nirvana, your enlightenment, will be the richest.
Buddha insists on meditation alone; that is one face of God. Mohammed insists on
prayer, music, singing; hence the Koran has the quality of music in it. No other
scripture has so much music in it as the Koran. The very word koran simply means
"Recite! Sing!" That was the first revelation to Mohammed. Something from the beyond
called forth and said, "Recite! Recite! Sing!"
Islam is another face of God. And there are religions which have approached God
through the third M: mathematics. Jainism is the purest representative of the third
approach. Mahavira speaks like Albert Einstein. It is not an accident that Mahavira wasthe first person in human history to talk about the theory of relativity. After twenty-five
centuries, Albert Einstein was able to prove it scientifically, but Mahavira saw it in his
vision.
If you read Mahavira, his statements are absolutely logical, mathematical. Jaina
scriptures have no juice in them -- dry, arithmetical. That is another face of God. And
only three kinds of religion have existed in the world: the religions of mathematics,
represented by Jainism; the religions of music, represented by Islam, Christianity,
Judaism, Hinduism; and the religions of meditation, represented by Buddhism, Taoism.
My effort here is to give you a total religion, which contains all the three M's in it. It is a
very ambitious adventure. It has never been tried before; hence I am going to be
opposed as nobody has ever been opposed before. You are moving with a dangerous
person, but the journey is going to be of tremendous beauty. Dangers, hazards don't
make a journey ugly; on the contrary, they make it tremendously beautiful. All the
dangers that you will have to face with me are going to give you a thrill. The journey is
not going to be dull, it is going to be very alive. We are going to move towards God in
such a multidimensional way that each moment of the journey is going to be precious.
I started these Buddha lectures with a ten-day silence deliberately. It was a device to
start with silence -- Buddha would have been very happy. He must have shrugged his
shoulders a little bit because of the music, but what can I do? It can't be helped.
My religion has to be a religion of dance, love, laughter. It has to be life-oriented, it has
to be life-affirmative. It has to be a love affair with life. It is not a renunciation but a
rejoicing.
The second question:
Question 2
BELOVED MASTER,
IT IS ABOUT THIS FEELING THAT IT HAS ALWAYS BEEN THERE, AND AS SOON
AS I FEEL IT, IT SEEMS SO FAR AWAY -- BUT WHAT IS THIS "IT"?
Deva Prashantam, it is one of the perennial problems encountered by every seeker of
truth. You cannot grasp truth -- if you try, it will be far far away. You cannot possess
truth -- if you try, you will find your hands utterly empty. Truth cannot be possessed
because it is not a thing. On the contrary, you have to be courageous enough to be
possessed by truth -- because it is a love affair.
Allow yourself to be possessed by it and you will know what it is. But you have been
doing just the contrary: you have been trying to have a grip on it. That's what mind
always longs for, desires. That's what mind calls "understanding." Unless the mind is
capable of catching hold of something, the mind is not satisfied.
But truth is mercurial: if you try to hold it in your hands, the firmer the grip, the more
elusive it will become, and the farthest -- so far away that you will stop believing in it,
trusting in it...so far away that you will not be able to see that it exists at all.
Truth comes; it cannot be brought. Truth happens; you cannot do anything about it --
because the doer is the problem, the hindrance, the obstacle. The doer is the ego. And ifyou somehow manage and don't allow the doer to interfere, it comes by the back door --
as the one who experiences, as an observer, as an experiencer. It is the same ego again,
in new garments.
That's why when you feel it, it is lost -- the doer has come now as a feeler. The doer has
to be dissolved totally; it has not to be allowed back in some subtle way, in some secret
way.
Let the truth be! Don't be in a hurry to understand it or to feel it -- just let it be there.
You need not do anything about it. If you can remain in such a state of nondoing, of no-
effort, of no-ego, you will understand, you will feel, you will know, you will have it. It
can only be had indirectly, not directly.
Prashantam, that's where you are missing it. And that's where everybody misses it. Yes,
there are moments when suddenly it is so close by...you would like to grab it. The very
desire to grab comes out of greed, the very desire to grab comes out of fear. The very
desire to grab is a mind desire. And as the mind enters in, truth goes out.
Can't you simply be silent, not doing anything at all -- not on the intellectual level, not
on the physical level, not on the emotional level -- doing nothing at all, just being there,
utterly quiet? And then you will be possessed by it. And the only way to know it is to
be possessed by it.
You say, "It is about this feeling that it has always been there...."
Yes, it has always been there. It is our very being. It is the stuff we are made of. Truth is
not something separate from you: you are truth. It is your very consciousness, the very
ground of your being. You need not go anywhere else to seek and search, to Kashi or to
Kaaba. Not even a single step is needed.
Lao Tzu says: You can find it sitting in your own house, no need to go anywhere --
because it is already there! When you go on a search, when you move into seeking, you
go farther away from it. Each search takes you away from the truth that is already there.
And there are moments when you feel it, that it has always been there -- moments of
joy, love, beauty. Moments when suddenly the world stops: a beautiful sunset...and you
are gripped by it. Remember I am saying you are gripped by it, possessed by it, not that
you possess it. How can you possess a sunset? The sunset possesses you, fills you; every
nook and corner of your being is overflowing with the beauty of it.
And then one knows, deep down in the depths of one's being, it has always been there.
Not even the words are needed; one simply knows without words -- one feels.
Or, when you are in love...or when you listen to beautiful poetry...or the songs of the
birds...or just the wind blowing through the pine trees...or the sound of water....
Whenever you allow yourself to be possessed you will find, suddenly, out of nowhere,
truth has appeared, God has appeared, dhamma has appeared. You have touched
something intangible, you have seen something invisible. You have been in contact with
something eternal...aes dhammo sanantano -- the eternal law, the inexhaustible law.
Whenever you are in a state of harmony, everything humming, functioning in harmony,
whenever you are in accord...and these moments happen to everybody. These moments
have nothing to do with churches and the temples and the mosques. In fact, it is very
rare to find a person becoming enlightened in a church or in a mosque, in a temple.Buddha became enlightened under a tree, watching the last morning star disappearing
in the sky; not in a temple, not in a church -- under a tree, watching a star. Must have
become possessed. And the disappearing star, slowly slowly disappearing...going,
going, gone. One moment before it was there, and now it is no longer there. And in that
moment, suddenly something in him, the last citadel of the ego, disappeared too. Just
like the disappearing morning star, his ego disappeared too.
The sky was empty, and he was empty. And whenever two things are empty, they
become one -- because two empty things cannot be demarcated. By what will you
demarcate emptiness? Two nothings cannot be kept separate; two nothings become one
nothing. The star disappeared there, and the sky was empty, and the ego disappeared
inside and the sky was empty inside too...and suddenly the inner and the outer were
gone. It was only one sky.
That moment Buddha became enlightened. That moment he came to know dhamma,
the logos, the tao, God, the cosmic principle of life.
Mahavira became enlightened, not in a temple -- not even in a Jaina temple! There were
Jaina temples in Mahavira's time. Mahavira was the twenty-fourth tirthankara of the
Jainas -- the twenty-fourth great master. Twenty-three masters had preceded him. There
were Jaina temples, but he didn't become enlightened in a Jaina temple -- the Jainas
should note the fact. He became enlightened in the forest. Just sitting there, doing
nothing, and suddenly it came. It comes like a flood.
Mohammed became enlightened on a mountain. And so is the case with everybody:
Lao Tzu, Zarathustra, Kabir, Nanak...not a single person has ever become enlightened
in a temple, church or mosque. Why do you go there?
Go early in the morning to see the sunrise. Sit in the middle of the night watching the
sky full of stars. Go, befriend trees and rocks. Go, lie down by the side of the river and
listen to its sound. And you will be coming closer and closer to the real temple of God.
Nature is his real temple. And there, be possessed -- don't try to possess. The effort to
possess is worldly; the desire to be possessed is divine.
Prashantam, next time it happens, don't try to do anything about it. No need to
understand, no need to observe, no need to examine, no need to analyze -- let it be
there! Be possessed by it! Dance it! Sing it! And be totally one with it. That is the only
way to know it.
You ask me, "It is about this feeling that it has always been there" -- the feeling is
absolutely true -- "and as soon as I feel it, it seems so far away." Because with the
feeling, the 'I' comes in -- and the 'I' is the distance between you and truth. The bigger
the 'I', the bigger the distance, the smaller the 'I', the smaller the distance. No 'I', no
distance.
And you ask me, "...but what is this 'it'?"
I cannot say it. It is now. Be possessed! It is here. Be possessed! It is not in my words but
in the gaps. It is not in my statements but in the intervals. Read it between the lines.
But remember one thing very very significant: that you have to be possessed by it to
understand it. And we are very much afraid of being possessed -- it seems as if we arelosing control, it seems as if we are dissolving. "Who knows where it will land us? Who
knows whether I will be able to come back from it or not?"
All these fears arise and you shrink back. And that is the moment you create the
distance. The distance is your creation. Otherwise, it is always here, it is always now.
Don't create the distance, don't bring fear in.
In all the languages of the world there are words for religious people like 'God-fearing' -
- ugly words, absolute lies, because a religious person is not a God-fearing person at all.
A religious person is a God-loving person, not a God-fearing person. But the priest
depends on fear, he exploits your fear, and he creates fear in you. His whole business
depends on whether you are afraid.
Drop your fears. There is no need to be afraid of God. God simply means the totality,
the whole, that which is. We are part of it! How can the part be afraid of the whole? The
whole cares for the part, the whole loves the part, because the whole will not be the
whole without the part. It cannot be indifferent to the part.
Knowing this, one trusts. Knowing this, one allows the whole to possess. Knowing this,
one drops all fears, one surrenders. And only in surrender it is, only in trust it is.
I can indicate towards it, but I cannot explain it to you. And it is already happening to
you, Prashantam. You are blessed. Just stop your ways of creating distance between you
and it. And that can be easily done: just take a little risk, a step into the unknown.... Fear
will be there -- in spite of it, go into the unknown. Let the fear be there -- still go into the
unknown. Only by going into the unknown will the fear disappear, because you will
come to know there is nothing to fear.
And once you are enchanted by the unknown, then there is no end to this pilgrimage --
it is an eternal journey, never-ending, always ongoing; it is inexhaustible. aes dhammo
sanantano -- it is eternal and inexhaustible....
The third question:
Question 3
BELOVED MASTER,
WHAT IS YOUR HOBBY?
Anando, I have none. I don't need any. A hobby is needed to keep you occupied. When
you are tired of your ordinary occupation -- and naturally one gets tired of earning
bread and butter -- when you are tired of your ordinary occupation there are only two
alternatives. Either be unoccupied...which creates great fear in you, because to be
unoccupied means to be with oneself, to be utterly alone with oneself. It is to face one's
own abysmal depth -- it frightens, it scares. It means to face one's life and one's death, it
means to face one's own interiority -- which is infinite, so vast you cannot comprehend
it. And the very vastness frightens. A great trembling arises in you.
The one alternative is: meditate when you are unoccupied with your ordinary business.
The other alternative is: get occupied again in some foolish activity, and call it a hobby.A few people collect postage stamps -- now, see the stupidity of it -- and they call it a
hobby. And all hobbies are like that. These are ways and means to keep escaping from
yourself.
I am utterly blissful with myself. To be alone, to be, without doing anything, is such a
profound experience that if once you have tasted it you will drop all these stupid
activities called hobbies. Hobbies are pseudo occupations. When real occupations are
not there, you get into pseudo occupations. Now, see the foolishness of it. Six days of
the week you are waiting for Sunday -- so that you can relax, so that you can rest, so
that you can be with yourself. You are tired of the world; the world is too much with
you. You are tired of people, you are tired of everything. And you are hoping Sunday
will come soon, and when Sunday comes you are again occupied -- now it is your
hobby. You cannot remain unoccupied; that is your problem.
And it often happens that a person is more tired after Sunday than after any other day,
because of so many hobbies, and going for a picnic, and driving, and doing a thousand
and one things for which you have been waiting for six days. And you were thinking
you were going to rest?
You cannot rest! You don't know how to rest. You cannot relax -- you don't know how
to relax. Even in the name of relaxation you will get into some work, some kind of
work; even in the name of rest you will start some kind of work. Simply because you
are not paid for it, does it become rest? You will play cards or chess. You are not paid
for it, that's true, but that doesn't make much difference; it is only unpaid work.
Rather than searching for hobbies, use the opportunities. Whenever you are capable of
having a time empty, utterly unoccupied, with yourself, remain...remain in it, don't
move out of it. Don't start collecting stamps.
Two old Jewish men were sitting on a park bench. "Well, what do you do now that you
are retired?" asked one.
"I have a hobby: I raise pigeons," replied the other.
"Pigeons? Where do you keep them? You live in a condominium!"
"I keep them in a closet."
"In your closet? Don't they shit on your shoes and on your clothes?"
"No," said the man. "I keep them in a box."
"In a box? How do they breathe?"
"Breathe? They don't breathe," said the man, "they are dead."
"Dead?" exclaimed the friend, shocked. "You keep dead pigeons?"
"What the hell, it is only a hobby!"
The fourth question:
Question 4
BELOVED MASTER,
THIS MORNING WHEN YOU ADDRESSED US "MY BELOVED BODHISATTVAS," IT
FELT AT THAT MOMENT AS THOUGH IT WERE ACTUALLY TRUE. BUT LATERON, EVEN A POSSIBILITY THAT WE ONE DAY WILL BECOME BODHISATTVAS
SEEMED LIKE A DREAM....
Sheela, it is a truth -- that's why when uttered with trust, with love, it immediately
strikes something deep in your heart, it rings a bell. But it is because of my trust that it
rings a bell. I say again: You are bodhisattvas -- buddhas in essence, in seed, in
potentiality.
When I say it, I mean it. When I say it, I say it because it is so. And in that moment you
are so in tune with me that it appears absolutely true; no proof is needed, no argument
is needed.
I need not argue for the truths that I utter. In fact, no truth ever needs any argument; it
is simple, but it immediately rings a bell. The only thing needed is that it should come
from the heart, then it reaches your heart.
I am not talking from my head. I am pouring my being into your being. It is a meeting
of energies. It is a meeting of souls. Hence, when you are with me, it appears absolutely
true -- you cannot doubt it, it is impossible. But when you are alone and I am not there,
doubts arise. Your old mind comes back, with a vengeance, and says, "Sheela, you, and
a bodhisattva? And what about your love with Veetrag? -- and you, a bodhisattva? And
what about your jealousies, and what about your anger, and what about all that you
are? You a bodhisattva? He must have been joking; he tricked you!" Great doubts arise
because they are always there in your mind.
It is like you come with me, we go along, we walk side by side for the time being. I have
a light in my hand, but because of my light, your path is also lighted. Then the moment
comes when we part -- we have to part; a crossroad has come, our paths separate. I
move in one direction, you move in another. Suddenly you are in darkness and you are
very much puzzled: "What happened to the light?"
That light was not yours. Of course, your path was lighted, but the light was not yours.
So when you are with me, there is a light surrounding you. In that light, things are very
clear. When you are not with me suddenly there is darkness, and in that darkness you
will doubt everything that you had trusted, and in that darkness you will doubt even
the possibility of light. You will doubt even the reality of the light that you had lived
just a few moments before. Your mind will say, "You must have been dreaming. You
must have been hallucinating. What light? Where is the light? If it was there, where has
it gone?"
And this will happen again and again. This has a deep significance to be understood.
When you are with me, here, listening to me, sitting by my side, the situation can
remain the same even when you are not physically with me. You will have to go a little
deeper in your love, so that even if physically you are far away, spiritually you are not.
Then the trust will continue. Then doubts will not dare to come in.
Right now doubts come in because you have a certain love for me but it is not yet total.
There are spaces within your being you have not allowed access to me yet. And this is
not only so with Sheela, it is so with many of you. You are keeping a few corners still
hidden, separate, private, of your own. You have not opened your heart totally, you arenot utterly naked. And if you are hiding something, then whatsoever you are hiding
will remain a distance between me and you.
So when you are here, under my impact, when you are here physically with me, my
presence can put your mind aside. But when you are not physically with me, your mind
will come back -- you have not put it aside! Learn a lesson: when you go away from me,
when you cannot see me, try to still be with me. Imbibe the spirit of closeness, intimacy
-- then even death cannot separate us. Then there is no question of space and time. Then
you are with me forever. And the trust will persist, and the trust will continue; it will
become a constant factor in you. The only thing that will be constant will be your trust.
Everything else will change, but not the trust.
You will have found the center of your being. And that finding is arriving home.
The last question:
Question 5
BELOVED MASTER,
THERE IS SO MUCH NONSENSE ABOUT YOUR TEACHINGS AND THE
ACTIVITIES OF YOUR ASHRAM IN THE PRESS RECENTLY. IT SOMEHOW
INFURIATES ME BECAUSE IT SEEMS SO FAR FROM THE ACTUAL FACTS.
LETTERS IN RESPONSE TO THE CONTRARY ARE NOT BEING PUBLISHED. NOW,
I KNOW THIS MUST MAKE NO DIFFERENCE WHATSOEVER TO YOU. IS THIS
THEN WHAT JESUS MEANS WHEN HE SAYS TO TURN THE OTHER CHEEK?
Zareen, it is as it should be. A man like me cannot remain unopposed. A man like me is
bound to divide people into two categories: those who are with me and those who are
not with me.
Just the other day, an old friend wrote a letter to me suggesting.... Right now there are
only two kinds of people: those who are devotees, who are utterly in love with me, and
those who are enemies, full of hatred for me. He wants to create a third category of
people who are neither devotees nor enemies, but impartial thinkers.
His idea looks logical, but it is not possible. It has never happened, and it is not going to
happen. It cannot happen. In fact, he himself is finding it difficult to become a
sannyasin. He has been an old friend and he feels it a little difficult to surrender now as
a disciple. He cannot be a devotee and he cannot be an enemy either. He knows me, he
loves me; he has been a friend of long standing. So it is really his problem.
He cannot surrender because of his ego that he was a friend to me, a colleague. He
cannot be against me because he feels for me. Now he is in a jam, so he wants to find a
way out; he wants to create a third force -- people who are neither for nor against but
impartial. Those people will be impotent. And I am not interested in impartial people. I
am not interested in the third force at all, for a certain reason: because they will be
utterly cold. I am far more interested in people who have a very strong hatred for me --
they are at least hot, and hot people are good people. They can be transformed; they are
not ice-cold.Those who are hotly in hate with me sooner or later will have become devotees --
because you cannot live in hate long. It hurts you. By hating me you cannot love me.
Zareen, you are right, it doesn't matter at all to me. If the whole world hates me, it
doesn't matter, it makes no difference. I remain in my absolute bliss.
My bliss cannot be affected by people's hatred, opposition. But think of those people
who are living in hatred -- they are torturing themselves, they are hurting themselves,
they are wounding themselves. How long can they go on doing it? Sooner or later their
wounds would like to heal. And sooner or later, their very heated antagonism itself will
turn into a passionate love.
I am reminded, Zareen, of a beautiful story:
A Sufi mystic wrote a book on the Koran. It was opposed by all the authorities, by the
official religion. They banned it, they made it a crime to read it. It was sacrilegious, they
thought, dangerous, because he was interpreting the Koran in such a way as nobody
had ever interpreted it. He was going against the tradition.
He called his chief disciple, gave him the book, and told him to go the chief priest and
present the book to him -- and watch everything. "Whatsoever happens, you have to
report it correctly. So be very alert: whatsoever happens...when you give the book as a
present, how he reacts, what he does, what he says, remember accurately because you
have to report the whole scene. And let me tell you," the master told him, "that this is a
kind of test for you. It is not only the question of giving the book to the chief priest and
coming back; the whole point is reporting everything as it happens."
The man went, very alert, very cautious. Entering into the house of the chief priest, he
made himself very alert, shook his body, because everything had to be observed
minutely. Then he went in.
As he presented the book to the chief priest and told the name of his master, the priest
threw the book out of the house, onto the road, and said, "Why didn't you tell me before
that this is from that dangerous man? I would not even have touched it. I will have to
wash my hands now. It is a sin to touch his book!"
The wife of the chief priest was sitting by his side. She said, "You are being
unnecessarily hard on the poor man. He has not done any harm to you. Even if you
wanted to throw the book, you could have thrown it later on. And I don't see the point
in throwing it because you have a big library -- thousands of books are there; this book
can also be kept in the library. If you don't want to read it, there is no need to read it.
But you could have done at least one thing: you could have thrown it afterwards,
washed your hands, taken a bath, or whatsoever you wanted to do -- but why are you
hurting this poor man?"
The man went back, told the master the whole thing as it happened, in minute detail.
The master asked, "What is your reaction, then?"
The man said, "My reaction is that the wife of the chief priest is a very religious woman.
I felt much respect for her. And the chief priest is simply ugly -- I wanted to cut his
throat!"The master said, "Now listen: I am more interested in the chief priest -- he can be
converted because he is hot. If he can be so full of hate, he can also be so full of love,
because it is the same energy that becomes hate or love. Love standing upside-down is
hate -- love doing shirshasana, a headstand, is hate. But it is very easy to put a man back
on his feet. As far as the wife is concerned, she is cold, ice-cold. I have no hope for her;
she cannot be converted."
I totally agree with the Sufi master. Those who are against me, Zareen, why are they
against me? Their hearts are stirred. Something has started happening to them, and they
don't want it to happen. It is risky. I have started influencing their lives and they don't
want to go with me.
Their whole investment is against it. They want to avoid me, and they see that they
cannot avoid me -- they are becoming heated up. Hence the hatred; hence they are
inventing all kinds of lies. But I have great hope for these people -- in fact, I love these
people. Sooner or later they are going to end up with me.
The real problem is with those people who are indifferent, ice-cold, neither for nor
against. I would like to divide the whole humanity into two camps: the friends and the
enemies. And the more friends I have the more enemies are bound to be there. There is
a certain balance in it; in life everything balances. If you have so many friends, you are
bound to have so many enemies; otherwise the balance will be lost. If you have more
friends, you will have more enemies; the balance has to be kept. Life continuously
balances itself.
I watch the whole scene and enjoy it.
Zareen, you need not be worried about it. But I can understand your concern.
You say, "There is so much nonsense about your teachings and the activities of your
ashram in the press recently...."
There will be more and more every day, because more and more people are going to
come to me. Millions are on the way. And the more people become interested in me and
the work that is going on here, the more and more people become involved in it, the
more and more people will be against it -- a kind of balance. It is how things happen in
the world; it is a natural phenomenon.
And all kinds of nonsense is bound to be told, because the people who are against have
never been here. If they had been here they would have not been against, so they live on
rumors. And negative things have a way of their own: they spread more easily, faster,
quicker, because the whole of humanity lives in negativity.
For example, just the other day I received a letter from Canada saying that the Canadian
government is becoming concerned, very much concerned, about my sannyasins and
the people coming to me from Canada. And they are seriously inquiring into the whole
phenomenon, because they are afraid that my commune may turn into another
Jonestown. Now, I feel happy, because when governments become concerned that
means something is happening. When a faraway country becomes so much concerned
that they are thinking of sending a team to investigate the whole phenomenon, thatmean things are on the way, that I am becoming some kind of disturbance to them. I
must be popping up in their dreams.
And on what grounds are they becoming so much afraid? Because one American
sannyasin committed suicide, another American sannyasin went mad. These two
instances are enough.... Now, Americans are all mad! And have you seen an American
who has never pondered the possibility of committing suicide? The psychologists say
that every American, at least four times in his life, thinks of committing suicide. The
greatest rate of suicide is in America.
Out of one hundred thousand sannyasins, one sannyasin commits suicide -- that is
enough! And that too an American sannyasin. What else were you expecting from an
American sannyasin? Another American goes mad...it is absolutely normal! But the
negative catches our attention immediately. How many Americans have gone sane,
nobody bothers. And how many Americans have been prevented from committing
suicide, nobody counts. They will never be counted.
And journalists, the press, and other media, they are also only interested in the negative
things. Unless you do something wrong, you are not news. George Bernard Shaw says:
If a dog bites a man, it is not news. But if a man bites a dog, it is news.
Something is newsworthy only if it is outlandish, if it is eye-catching.
You can go on doing a thousand and one things and nobody will take any note. Do only
one thing wrong and the whole world suddenly becomes interested in you.
And then people are very inventive. When you tell a rumor to a person you add
something to it. People are creative! And when that person shares the rumor with
somebody else, do you think he will share it exactly as you told him? He will give it a
new color, a little more depth, a little larger dimension. He will make it more attractive,
he will exaggerate it. And it goes on and on from mouth to mouth.
Rumors have a way of spreading, and everybody contributes to them. They don't have
anything that relates to the facts. But this is how it always happens. And then it
continues.... I will be gone and the rumors will continue, and they will go on increasing.
They become independent forces; they go on growing.
I have heard:
God has the blues. Saint Peter suggests a trip to Earth to pick up a nice Greek girl,
possibly in the old swan suit. God says, "No. As long as I stuck to those Greek girls it
was alright. But once I made the mistake of knocking up a Jewish girl, two thousand
years ago, and I'll be damned if they aren't still talking about it!"
Rumors go on and on.... And what they are doing to me is nothing uncommon; it is
expected. They have always done such things to Jesus, to Socrates, to Mansoor, to
Buddha, to Kabir. If they don't do these things to me, that will be a surprise. In fact, I
will not feel good if they don't do these things to me. I would like to be counted with
the buddhas -- and that is the only way!Jesus decided to return to earth. He had seen that in America there was a resurgence of
Jesus freaks and born-again baptists, so he thought it was a good time to come. He
brought Peter along with him.
When he came to Earth he made the announcement that he was Jesus, the Son of God.
No one would believe him; they thought he was some kind of nut. So Jesus asked Peter,
"How can I get them to believe me, to convince them that I am the true savior?"
Peter said, "Remember that trick you did in Galilee, when you walked across the water?
I bet that would work."
So they made a press announcement that tomorrow Jesus would walk on water. On the
next day, the television and newspapers were at the lake to watch Jesus walk on water.
Jesus and Peter arrived and rowed out to the middle of the lake, then Jesus climbed
over the side of the boat and immediately sank. When he came back up, Peter, in shock,
asked, "What happened? Why did you sink?"
"Shut up, you fool!" said Jesus. "The last time I did this I didn't have these damned holes
in my feet!"
Things are more difficult than they were in the time of Jesus and Buddha! But I am
enjoying, I am having a good time. Zareen, don't be worried at all. My suggestion is:
you should enjoy it.
You say, "It somehow infuriates me because it seems so far from the actual facts."
Don't feel infuriated, don't feel angry -- that won't help. My people have to learn to
laugh at all these stupid things that are bound to become more and more intense. As my
work deepens, more and more nonsense rumors will go around -- which will have
nothing to do with the facts. Or, even if they have something to do with the facts, they
will distort them.
People are going to invent many kinds of stories. If you become infuriated, in a way you
help them. That's what they want. That's what they want! -- that if my people become
infuriated, angry, then they can crush, destroy you. And, certainly, they can crush and
they can destroy you. My people are very few, a chosen few.
Don't feel infuriated; otherwise you will be playing into their hands. When such things
come to your notice, have a good laugh. Learn to laugh -- respond with laughter!
Laughter has to be your protection. And your laughter will make them look stupid.
When somebody says something against me, have a good laugh. Pat him on the back,
hug him! Give him a good kiss!
That's what Jesus means, really: love your enemies. But I know, it is easy to love your
enemies -- it is more difficult to love your neighbors. So I say, just as Jesus says, again:
Love your neighbors. They are the same people! Hug your neighbors; don't just go on
loving them spiritually -- express it. When somebody is saying some nonsense thing
about me, express your love. Let him feel puzzled -- let him feel either he is mad or you
are mad. He will never be able to figure it out, what happened -- why you hugged him.
He was not saying such nice things about your master...why did you hug him? That
might give him a longing to come and see the master too. When the disciple is doing
such a thing it is worth taking the trouble to go and see what is happening there.Zareen, no need to be angry.
And you say, "Letters in response to the contrary are not being published."
They will not be published, because the newspapers, the television, the radio, they are
in the hands of the vested interests. They will publish everything that is against me,
because some newspaper is owned by a Hindu, some newspaper is owned by a Jaina,
some newspaper is owned by a Mohammedan, some newspaper is owned by a
Christian -- and all the newspapers are owned by different kinds of politicians. Your
letters will not be published. These things have to be taken for granted.
You say, "Now, I know this must make no difference whatsoever to you. Is this then
what Jesus means when he says to turn the other cheek?"
Yes, that's exactly what Jesus means. That's the best way to transform people, to convert
people. The best possible way to convert people to your own way is to give the other
cheek. Love them. Laugh at their nonsensical statements. Enjoy their rumors. Make
jokes out of them, and make them puzzled.
If you can do that much, you are doing my work, Zareen.
Enough for today.The Dhammapada: The Way of the Buddha, Vol 1
Chapter #3
Chapter title: True or false
23 June 1979 am in Buddha Hall
MISTAKING THE FALSE FOR THE TRUE
AND THE TRUE FOR THE FALSE,
YOU OVERLOOK THE HEART
AND FILL YOURSELF WITH DESIRE.
SEE THE FALSE AS FALSE,
THE TRUE AS TRUE.
LOOK INTO YOUR HEART.
FOLLOW YOUR NATURE.
AN UNREFLECTING MIND IS A POOR ROOF.
PASSION, LIKE THE RAIN, FLOODS THE HOUSE.
BUT IF THE ROOF IS STRONG, THERE IS SHELTER.
WHOEVER FOLLOWS IMPURE THOUGHTS
SUFFERS IN THIS WORLD AND THE NEXT.
IN BOTH WORLDS HE SUFFERS,
AND HOW GREATLY,
WHEN HE SEES THE WRONG HE HAS DONE.
BUT WHOEVER FOLLOWS THE LAW
IS JOYFUL HERE AND JOYFUL THERE.
IN BOTH WORLDS HE REJOICES,
AND HOW GREATLY,
WHEN HE SEES THE GOOD HE HAS DONE.
FOR GREAT IS THE HARVEST IN THIS WORLD,
AND GREATER STILL IN THE NEXT.
HOWEVER MANY HOLY WORDS YOU READ,
HOWEVER MANY YOU SPEAK,
WHAT GOOD WILL THEY DO YOU
IF YOU DO NOT ACT UPON THEM?
ARE YOU A SHEPHERD
WHO COUNTS ANOTHER MAN'S SHEEP,
NEVER SHARING THE WAY?
READ AS FEW WORDS AS YOU LIKEAND SPEAK FEWER.
BUT ACT UPON THE LAW.
GIVE UP THE OLD WAYS --
PASSION, ENMITY, FOLLY.
KNOW THE TRUTH AND FIND PEACE.
SHARE THE WAY.
Truth is. It needs no effort on your part to invent it. Truth has to be discovered, not
invented. And what is hindering us from discovering it? We have been taught many
lies, mountains of lies. Those are the barriers which go on falsifying the truth, which do
not allow our hearts to reflect that which is.
Truth is not a logical conclusion. Truth is existence, reality. It is already here -- it has
always been here. Only truth exists. Then why cannot we find it? How do we manage
not to find it? Because from the very childhood we are taught falsities, prejudices,
ideologies, religions, philosophies...all lead you astray.
Truth is not an idea. You need not be a Hindu to know it, or a Mohammedan, or a
Christian. If you are a Hindu you will never know it; your very being a Hindu will keep
you blind. What do we mean when we say, "I am a Hindu, or a Mohammedan, or a
Jew"? We mean, "I have already got ideas about truth -- ideas from the Bible or the
Koran or the Gita, but I have got ideas already. I don't know the truth, but I know much
about it." And that knowing much about it is the only problem that has to be solved.
Once you drop your ideas about truth you will be confronting it, within and without
both. You will be facing it -- because there is nothing else!
But the parents, the society, the state, the church, the educational system, they all
depend on lies. As the child is born they start trapping it into lies. And the child is
helpless. He cannot escape his parents, he is utterly dependent. You can exploit his
dependence...and it has been exploited down the ages.
Nobody has been exploited so much as children -- neither the proletariat nor women,
nobody has been exploited so much and so deeply and so destructively as the innocent
children. Because they are helpless and dependent they have to learn whatsoever you
teach them. They have to imbibe all the falsehoods that you go on forcing upon them. It
is a question of survival for them -- they cannot survive without you. It is a question of
life and death! They have to be Hindus, they have to be Mohammedans, they have to be
Jainas, they have to be Buddhists, they have to be communists. Whatsoever you are
interested in putting into their minds, you go on putting it in.
Instead of making them more alert, more aware, more alive, more reflective, instead of
making them more mirrorlike, pure, you make them full of ideas...layers and layers of
dust. And then it becomes impossible for them to see that which is. They start seeing
that which is not and they stop seeing that which is.
Hence, to be really religious means a rebirth: again becoming like a child, dropping all
that the society has given to you.Religion is a rebellion -- a rebellion against all that has been forced upon you, a rebellion
against being reduced to a computer. Just look inside! Whatsoever you know, you have
been told; it is not your knowing, it is not authentic. How can it be authentic if it is not
yours? You are not a witness to it, you are just a victim -- a victim of circumstances.
It is just an accident to be born in India or to be born in England. It is just an accident to
be born in a Hindu family or in a Christian family. Because of these accidents your
essential nature has been lost -- you have been forced to lose it. If you want to regain it
you will have to be reborn.
That's precisely what the meaning is when Jesus says to Nicodemus, "Unless you are
born again you will not enter into the Kingdom of God." He does not mean that you
actually have to die, commit suicide, and then be born again. That won't help, because
again you will be born to some parents in a certain society, within a certain church, and
again the same stupidity is going to be done to you.
Jesus means by 'rebirth' that deliberately, consciously, now you are capable of dropping
all that has been taught to you. Drop your knowledge and become innocent. And that is
the only way to become innocent. Knowledge is a contamination. To be in a state of not-
knowing is innocence, and to function from that state is the only way to know the truth.
Meditate over these tremendously significant sutras of Gautama the Buddha. He says:
MISTAKING THE FALSE FOR THE TRUE
AND THE TRUE FOR THE FALSE,
YOU OVERLOOK THE HEART
AND FILL YOURSELF WITH DESIRE.
Mind is nothing but desire. The heart knows no desire. You will be surprised to hear it,
that all desires belong to the head. The heart lives in the present; it pulsates, beats, in the
herenow. It knows nothing of the past and it knows nothing of the future. It is always
now, here.
And I am not talking about a certain philosophy. I am simply stating a fact so simple
you can observe it within yourself: your heart is beating now. It cannot beat in the past,
it cannot beat in the future. The heart only knows the present, hence it is utterly pure. It
is not polluted by the past memories, by knowledge, by experience, by all that you have
been told and taught, by the scriptures, by the traditions. It knows nothing of all that
nonsense! And it knows nothing of the future, of the morrow. For it, past exists no
more, the future not yet. It is utterly here. It is immediate.
But the mind is just the opposite of the heart: the mind is never now, here. Either it
thinks of beautiful experiences of the past or it desires the same beautiful experiences in
the future. It goes on shuttling between past and future, it never stops at the present. It
is utterly unaware of the present. For the mind, the present exists not. See the point: the
present is the only thing that exists, but for the mind the present is the only thing that
exists not. Past is nonexistential, future is nonexistential, but those are the things which
are existential for the mind.The head is the problem...and the heart is the solution. The child functions from the
heart. As you start growing, you start moving from the heart to the head. When you
graduate from the university you have completely forgotten about the heart. You are
hung up in the head, your whole energy has moved to the head. Now you don't know
anything of reality. You are full of garbage -- scholarly garbage, academic nonsense.
You may be a Ph.D., a D.Litt. You know much, knowing nothing at all! -- because real
knowing happens in the heart, not in the head. And the universities exist to distract
your energies from the heart to the head.
All the universities in the world up to now have been enemies of humanity. Their
whole function is to serve the state and the church. They are agents of the status quo,
they are agents of the vested interests. They don't serve you, they serve the powers, the
masters, the oppressors, the exploiters. Whosoever happens to be in power the
universities serve. They are not in the service of humanity yet.
If they were really in the service of humanity, then the university would be the place to
learn rebellion. The university would create revolutionaries. The university would not
create conventionalists, conformists; the university would create nonconformists,
nonconventional people. It would create rebels -- adventurous, ready to risk their lives
for truth. That has not happened yet.
It is a sad fact that in the name of education something ugly is continued, something
very ugly. Behind a facade, something very criminal continues. And this is the crime:
that they divert your energies from the heart to the head, they destroy your capacity to
love and they force you to learn logic. Logic is more important than love for them,
thinking is more important than sensitivity. This is just putting the bullocks behind the
cart. It is totally topsy-turvy.
That's why humanity is in such a mess: the untrue seems to be true and the true seems
to be untrue. They have succeeded in distorting your vision. The buddhas have been
fighting against all these vested interests.
Buddha says: MISTAKING THE FALSE FOR THE TRUE AND THE TRUE FOR THE
FALSE, YOU OVERLOOK THE HEART AND FILL YOURSELF WITH DESIRE.
Mind is desire, and you go on filling yourself with more and more desire, more and
more ambition, more and more longing for power, prestige, wealth. And you
completely forget that there is a heart beating within you which already lives in God,
which is already part of the ultimate law -- aes dhammo sanantano -- which is already
part of the inexhaustible, eternal law. You are joined from the heart to God. Your hearts
are the roots in the soil of God.
Your hearts are still being nourished by God, by truth, but you are not there. You have
vacated the place. You live in your head. Day in, day out, you live in your head; you
never descend from there. Even in the night while asleep you go on rumbling in the
head...dreams, and dreams upon dreams. In the day thoughts, in the night dreams.
They are not different.
The dream is only a translation of thinking in the language of sleep, and vice versa:
thinking is nothing but a translation of dreaming in the language of the day. You go onmoving between these two: dreaming and thinking. Both are desiring. What do you
think? What is there to think except desire? And what do you dream except desire?
Buddha says the false appears to be true because you have become false to your own
truth, to your own heart. Come back to the heart, and then you will be able to know the
truth as the truth and the false as the false. That is enlightenment, that is coming home.
SEE THE FALSE AS FALSE.
But from where to begin? Begin from seeing the false as the false. That's why all the
buddhas appear to be negative, all buddhas appear to be destructive. They negate. Jesus
negates. He says again and again: It has been told to you in the past, but I say to you....
And he changes the whole standpoint.
For example, he says: It has been told to you in the past that tit for tat is the law. If
somebody throws a brick at you, react by throwing a rock. But I say unto you, if
somebody hits you on one cheek, give him the other cheek too. And if somebody takes
away your coat, give him your shirt too. And if somebody forces you to go one mile
with him, go two miles.
Mohammed is against all kinds of images of God, because his people were worshipping
for centuries; they had three hundred and sixty-five gods -- one god for every day of the
year. The Kaaba of Mohammed's days was one of the greatest temples on the earth --
dedicated to three hundred and sixty-five gods! Mohammed destroyed all those idols. It
looks negative....
Buddha says: There is no truth in the Vedas, in the Upanishads. Beware of beautiful
words, beware of philosophic speculation. Don't waste your time with hairsplitting,
with logic. Be silent! Throw the Vedas out of your head, only then can you be silent. He
looks negative, he looks nihilistic, he look dangerous -- but that is the only way you can
be helped.
You have to be told the false is false. You have to begin with this: neti, neti -- neither this
nor that. The master has to say to you, "This is false, that is false." He has to go on
pointing out to you whatsoever is false first, because when you have known all that is
false, suddenly a transformation happens in your consciousness. When you have
become aware of the false, you start becoming aware of the true.
You cannot be taught what is truth, but you can certainly be taught what is not truth.
You have been conditioned, you can be unconditioned. You have been hypnotized -- as
Hindus, Mohammedans, Christians, Jainas.... The function of a master is to dehypnotize
you. Once you are dehypnotized, suddenly you will be able to see the truth. The truth
need not be taught.
SEE THE FALSE AS FALSE, THE TRUE AS TRUE.
LOOK INTO YOUR HEART.
FOLLOW YOUR NATURE.One of the most significant statements ever: LOOK INTO YOUR HEART. FOLLOW
YOUR NATURE. He is not saying follow scriptures. He is not saying follow me. He is
not saying follow certain rules of conduct. He is not teaching you any morality. He is
not trying to create a certain character around you, because all characters are beautiful
prison cells. He is not giving you a certain way of life. Rather he is giving you courage,
encouragement, to follow your own nature. He wants you to be brave enough to listen
to your own heart and go accordingly.
"Follow your nature" means flow with yourself. You are the scripture...and hidden deep
down within you is a still, small voice. If you become silent you will be guided from
there.
The master has only to make you aware of your inner master. Then his function is
fulfilled. Then he can leave you to yourself; he can throw you back upon yourself. A
master is not to enslave the disciple; a master is to free him, to give him total freedom.
And this is the only possibility of attaining total freedom: FOLLOW YOUR NATURE.
By "nature" Buddha means dhamma. Just as it is the nature of water to flow downwards
and it is the nature of fire to rise upwards, so there is a certain nature hidden in you. If
all the conditionings that have been put around you by the society are removed,
suddenly you will discover your nature. Your nature has become God. Aes dhammo
sanantano -- this is the eternal, inexhaustible law: your nature is to become God.
Man is a potential god -- a bodhisattva. Man is meant to become a god. Less than that
won't satisfy you, less than that is of no use. You can have all the money in the world,
all the power, all the prestige possible, and still you will remain empty -- unless your
divine nature flowers, opens its buds, unless you become a lotus, a one-thousand-
petaled lotus, unless your divinity is revealed to you, you can never be contented.
The ordinary religious person is told to remain satisfied, contented, with whatsoever is
the case. The so-called religious saints go on teaching people: Be satisfied. Satisfaction is
one of their fundamental teachings. That is not the way of the true masters.
The true master creates discontent in you -- and such a discontent that nothing of this
world can ever satisfy it. He creates such a longing in you, that unless you attain to the
ultimate you will remain aflame, afire. He creates pain in your heart, he creates
anguish...because life is slipping by every moment, and each moment gone is gone
forever, and you have not attained to God yet, and one day is over.
He creates such a deep longing in you, such pain in the heart! He creates tears in your
eyes, because only through such divine discontent will you move, will you take the
quantum leap, the ultimate jump into the unknown. It is only through such divine
discontent that you will gather together all your energies, and you will risk, and you
will go on the ultimate adventure of finding who you are.
Follow your own nature. Your nature is consciousness. But you have been told by the
priests: follow certain rules of conduct, the ten commandments, follow certain
principles -- not your nature. Priests are very much afraid of your nature, because if you
follow your nature you will get out of their grip, you will be a slave no more. You won't
go to the churches and the temples and the mosques, and you won't listen to yourstupid priests, politicians, the so-called leaders. I call them "so-called leaders" because
what is actually happening is that blind people are leading other blind people.
You won't listen to them anymore if you listen to your own nature. If you know your
own inner voice you will become free. Your inner voice has to be crushed, destroyed,
utterly destroyed -- at least distorted so much that even if you hear it you can't
understand it. And they have succeeded. Unless you struggle hard against them there is
no possibility of succeeding. Their exploitation is so old, their oppression is so ancient,
their strategies are so cunning...and they have infinite power in their hands. And what
are you against them as an individual?
But if you go in, if you listen to your heart, you will attain to such power that no power
on the earth can enslave you again.
FOLLOW YOUR NATURE.... But how to follow your nature if you don't know what it
is? And you are not allowed to know it! You are given precise instructions as to what to
do: what to eat, when to get up in the morning, when to go to bed. You have been given
precise instructions. Those instructions, if followed, make you a slave. If not followed,
they make you a criminal. If followed, you become a saint -- but a slave. People will
worship you, respect you, but all that respect is a mutual understanding: "If you follow
our instructions, we will respect you. If you don't follow, you will be thrown into jail."
Either you are made a slave spiritually or a prisoner physically: these are the two
alternatives the society gives to you. And it never lets you become aware that there is a
source of infinite guidance within you, from where God speaks.
God still speaks, he has not stopped speaking. He is not partial -- it is not that he spoke
to Mohammed and to Moses and he does not speak to you. He is speaking to you as
much as he was speaking to Mohammed. The only difference is, Mohammed was ready
to listen and you are not ready to listen. Mohammed was available and you are not
available.
To become available to your inner nature is what I call meditation.
Remember these two words. 'Character' is an invention of the politicians and the
priests; it is a conspiracy against you. Consciousness is your nature. Yes, a man of
consciousness has a certain character, but that character follows his consciousness. It is
not imposed by anybody else on him; it is his own decision. And he is not encaged in it;
he is totally free to change it any moment. As circumstances change, his consciousness
gives him different directions and he changes his character.
The man of character -- the so-called man of character -- is encaged. Even if
circumstances change he goes on repeating the same character, although it is no longer
relevant, it does not fit. The context in which it was meaningful has disappeared, but he
goes on repeating the same nonsense. He is like a parrot. He is a machine: he does not
respond, he only reacts.
A man of consciousness responds, and his responses are spontaneous. He is mirrorlike:
he reflects whatsoever confronts him. And out of this spontaneity, out of this
consciousness, a new kind of action is born. That action never creates any bondage, any
karma. That action frees you. You remain a freedom if you listen to your nature.But this simple advice seems to be very difficult for people. It should be the simplest
thing in the world. Each child is born following his nature, but as you grow up, slowly
you lose contact with it -- you are forced to lose contact with it. The contact can be
regained, it can be rediscovered. Later on, when you become very knowledgeable,
encaged in a certain character, utterly blind to your own heart and nature, you start
asking such questions.
Just the other day Prem Vijen asked:
"Beloved Master, what do you mean when you say 'Go in'?" Such a simple statement --
"Go in" -- and you ask me, "What do you mean?" Can't you understand these simple
words, 'go in'? I know you understand the words, but going in has become so difficult
because you have been taught only how to go out. You can only go out, you only know
how to go out. Your consciousness has been turned towards others; it has forgotten the
way to itself. You go on knocking on others' doors, and whenever it is said to you, "Go
home," you say, "What do you mean by 'going home'?" You know only others' houses,
but you don't know your own home. And you are carrying it within yourself. You have
been forced to become extroverts. One has to learn again ways of inwardness.
Soren Kierkegaard has said: Religion means inwardness -- going into your own
interiority. But the simple words, 'go in', have become so difficult to understand. Mind
only knows how to go out; it has no reverse gear in it.
I have heard that when Ford made his first cars they had no reverse gear. It was a later
addition. Without a reverse gear it was really a problem: whenever you wanted to come
back you had to go miles unnecessarily, you had to go round. Even if you wanted to go
a few feet back, you might have to take a journey of miles. Then Ford became aware
that a reverse gear was needed.
I am teaching you here that the reverse gear is there, built in, you have just forgotten
about it. You know how to go out. Nobody asks, "What does it mean when you say 'Go
out'?" But everybody wants to ask, "What do you mean when you say 'Go in'?" Simple
words!
Thinking is going out: nonthinking is going in. Think, and you have started moving
away from yourself. Thought is the way leading you farther away. Thought is a project.
No-thought...and suddenly you are in. Without thought you cannot go out, without
desire you cannot go out. You need the fuel of desire and the vehicle of thought to go
out.
Sitting silently, doing nothing...not even thinking, not even desiring...and where will
you be?
Going in is not really going in. It is simply stopping going out...and suddenly you find
yourself in.
Prem Vijen, you need not go in because if you go you will always go out. Going means
going out. Stop going! Stop going anywhere! Can't you sit silently without going
anywhere? Yes, physically you can sit, that is not very difficult. You can learn a yoga
posture and you can make your body almost a statue, but the problem is -- what areyou doing inside? Desires, thoughts, memories, imagination, all kinds of projects? --
stop them too.
How to stop them? Just become indifferent to them, unconcerned. Even if they are
there, don't pay attention to them. Even if they are there, don't give them any
importance. Even if they are there, let them be. You sit silently inside -- watching.
Remember that word 'watching' -- witnessing, just being alert.
And as watching grows, becomes deeper, the same energy that was becoming desires
and thoughts and memories and imagination -- the same energy is absorbed in the new
depth. The same energy is used by this deepening inwardness. And you will know
what it means when I say "Go in."
Don't start looking in the dictionaries or in the ENCYCLOPAEDIA BRITANNICA. It is
not a question of words! Words are simple to understand; when I say "Go in," that's
exactly what I mean -- go in! Don't start asking about the words -- listen to the hidden
message; otherwise you will miss the train. What do I mean by 'missing the train'?
Let me tell you a story:
A naive farmer's wife arrived at Paddington Station to catch a train, and having some
time to spare before the train arrived, she thought she would check out her weight on a
nearby weighing machine.
She got on, put in a penny and out popped a card which read, "You weigh one hundred
and fifty pounds and in five minutes from now you will fart." Red with embarrassment
and feeling a little outraged, she got off the scale and hurried away. Five minutes later,
to her total amazement, she farted loud and long.
Very embarrassed, but intrigued, she made her way back to the machine to see what it
had to say this time. In went the penny -- out came the card: "You still weigh one
hundred and fifty pounds and in five minutes from now you will be raped." She
jumped off the machine in disgust and walked firmly away.
A newspaper salesman, who was having a particularly slack morning, saw this country
bumpkin and thought to have some fun, so before she knew what was happening, she
was pulled behind the counter and raped. Emerging a few minutes later in a terrible
state, with her hat on one side, the heel of her shoe broken, and in a total state of shock,
she staggered back to the machine and blindly put in a penny. Out came the card: "You
still weigh one hundred and fifty pounds, and with all this farting and fucking, you've
missed the train!"
If you become too much interested in words -- "What does it mean to go in? What does
it mean, verbally, linguistically?" -- Vijen, you are going to miss the train. Don't waste
time with words!
And it is a particularly new kind of disease that has gripped the intellectuals of the
world. For at least fifty years the philosophical world has become too much interested
in words, linguistic analysis. They don't ask anymore what God is. They don't ask
anymore whether God exists or not. The contemporary philosophers ask, "What does it
mean when you use the word 'God'?" It is not a question of whether God exists or not. Itis not a question of what God is. It is not a question of how to attain God. Now the
question has taken a very new turn: "What do you mean when you use the word
'God'?"
What do you mean when you use the word 'rose'? Now it is easy: you can take hold of
the philosopher, force him to go to the garden, and you can show him the rose: "This is
what I mean when I use the word 'rose'." But this cannot be done with the word 'God' --
and this cannot be done with the word 'meditation' and this cannot be done with the
words 'going in'. These are subtle phenomena. Don't become linguistically interested. I
am not here to teach you linguistic analysis.
My whole approach is existential. If you really want to know what it means to go in, go
in! And the way is: watch your thoughts and don't get identified with them. Just remain
a watcher, utterly indifferent, neither for nor against. Don't judge, because every
judgment brings identification. Don't say, "These thoughts are wrong," and don't say,
"These thoughts are good." Don't comment on the thoughts. Just let them pass as if it is
just traffic passing by, and you are standing by the side of the road unconcerned,
looking at the traffic.
It does not matter what is passing by -- a bus, a truck, a bicycle. If you can watch the
thought process of your mind with such unconcern, with such detachment, that
moment is not very far away when one day the whole traffic disappears...because the
traffic can exist only if you go on giving energy to it. If you stop giving energy to it....
And that's what watching is: stopping giving energy to it, stopping energy moving into
the traffic. It is your energy that makes those thoughts move. When your energy is not
coming they start falling; they cannot stand on their own.
And when the road of the mind is utterly empty, you are in. That's what I mean, Vijen,
when I say "Go in." And that's what Buddha means when he says: FOLLOW YOUR
NATURE.
AN UNREFLECTING MIND IS A POOR ROOF.
PASSION, LIKE THE RAIN, FLOODS THE HOUSE.
BUT IF THE ROOF IS STRONG, THERE IS SHELTER.
AN UNREFLECTING MIND.... Buddha does not mean by "reflection" thinking, mind
you. By "reflection" he simply means reflection, not thinking -- reflection in the sense
that a mirror reflects. When you come before a mirror, the mirror is not thinking about
you. The mirror simply mirrors! That mirroring is what Buddha means.
AN UNREFLECTING MIND -- a mind that has forgotten how to mirror -- IS A POOR
ROOF. And we have forgotten how to mirror. We know how to think, we don't know
how to reflect.
Just think of a child: a child is born, for the first time a child opens his eyes -- he will see
the trees, but he will not be able to say to himself, "These are trees." He will see light,
but he will not be able to say within himself, "This is electric light." He will see the
redness of the rose, but he will not be able to say, "This is a roseflower and the color is
red." He will see everything, but he will not say anything inside. That is mirroring: hewill simply mirror. The trees will still be green, in fact far greener than they will ever be
again, because the mirror is completely pure, crystalline. The mirror has no
dust...thoughts gather dust.
When you go into the garden and you say, "The rose is beautiful," you may not even be
seeing the rose. You may be simply repeating a cliche. Because you have heard it said
that the roses are beautiful you are saying it. Seeing a beautiful sunset, you may not be
seeing it, you may not be attentive, you may not be aware...but unconsciously,
automatically, you simply assert, "It is a beautiful sunset." You don't mean it at all; you
are simply saying it because you have been told. You are repeating somebody else's
statement. If you watch deeply, you may even be able to find whose statement this is --
your mother's, your father's, your teacher's, your friend's. If you watch closely you may
be able to hear the exact voice of who had said for the first time that the sunset is
beautiful...and you are simply repeating it. You have not seen this sunset. You have not
seen the thisness, the present, the immediate beauty of it.
Buddha says: AN UNREFLECTING MIND IS A POOR ROOF. PASSION, LIKE THE
RAIN, FLOODS THE HOUSE.
A mind that has forgotten how to mirror the truth is always a victim of desire -- a victim
of the head, a victim of the future, a victim of constant longing for this and for that. And
no desire can ever be fulfilled. By the time one desire is fulfilled it has created ten more
desires.
And this goes on and on...and life is short, and death may knock you down any
moment.
You come into the world to be fulfilled, but you go empty-handed, you go unfulfilled.
Hence you will have to come again. Unless you learn the lesson you will have to be
thrown back again and again into some womb, you will have to be reborn. You will be
sent back to the school. Millions of times you have been sent, and if you don't pay
attention, this life also you are going to miss the train.
Be aware! Start cleansing your mirror so that you can reflect.
PASSION, LIKE THE RAIN, FLOODS THE HOUSE. BUT IF THE ROOF IS STRONG,
THERE IS SHELTER. If you know how to reflect reality there is shelter. You are secure
because you are in God, because you are part of truth.
WHOEVER FOLLOWS IMPURE THOUGHTS
SUFFERS IN THIS WORLD AND THE NEXT.
IN BOTH WORLDS HE SUFFERS,
AND HOW GREATLY,
WHEN HE SEES THE WRONG HE HAS DONE.
All thoughts are impure. A thought cannot be pure. So let me remind you again:
whenever Buddha says "impure thoughts" he means thoughts. He uses the adjective
'impure' to emphasize it, because if he simply says "thoughts" you may not understand
rightly. So he says "impure thoughts," but he always means thoughts. All thoughts areimpure, because a thought means you are thinking of the other, a desire has arisen. And
whenever he says "a pure thought" he means a no-thought.
Only a no-thought is pure, because then you are utterly yourself, alone, nothing
interfering.
Jean-Paul Sartre says: The other is hell. And he is right in a way, because whenever you
are thinking of the other you are in hell. And all thoughts are addressed to others.
When you are in a state of no-thought you are alone, and aloneness is purity. And in
that aloneness happens all that is worth happening.
BUT WHOEVER FOLLOWS THE LAW
IS JOYFUL HERE AND JOYFUL THERE.
IN BOTH WORLDS HE REJOICES,
AND HOW GREATLY,
WHEN HE SEES THE GOOD HE HAS DONE.
Retrospectively, when you see that you have created a hell for yourself -- nobody else is
responsible but you -- when you see this you will suffer very much, terribly. There is
not even an excuse, you cannot throw the responsibility on somebody else's shoulders:
it is your responsibility.
Suffering will be there and more so, more intensely so, because you will feel also, "I
have been foolish. Nobody has made me suffer. It is because of my thoughts. It is
because of my becoming more and more extrovert, becoming more and more interested
in things of the outside, that I have suffered. I am solely responsible."
This will give you great anguish -- and vice versa. If you follow the law, dhamma, tao, if
you follow your innermost core, your nature, you will be joyful here and there.
Buddha is not much concerned with the "there." But he says if you are joyful here you
are bound to be joyful there. If this moment you are rejoicing, the next moment you will
be rejoicing more, because the next moment is going to be born out of this moment.
And your bliss gathers momentum, it is accumulative. If this moment you are suffering,
the next moment you will be suffering more, because you are learning the ways of
suffering, you are becoming habituated to suffering. You will create more suffering the
next moment because you are becoming more efficient in creating it. So whatsoever the
nature of this moment is, it is going to be strengthened more, deepened, in the next.
But Buddha is not concerned with the next moment at all. He is simply stating a fact.
Don't be bothered with the next moment, or the next life, or the next world. Make this
moment rejoicing, make this moment a moment of bliss, and the next will follow it, and
the next life, and the next world. And everything that you are this moment is going to
become deepened more and more. And when you see that you are responsible for your
bliss, your bliss will be far more. When you see that nobody has given it to you, that
you have not been a beggar, that it is not a gift from somebody else -- because nobody
has given it to you, nobody can take it away -- when you see this you will be far
happier.FOR GREAT IS THE HARVEST IN THIS WORLD,
AND GREATER STILL IN THE NEXT.
HOWEVER MANY HOLY WORDS YOU READ,
HOWEVER MANY YOU SPEAK,
WHAT GOOD WILL THEY DO YOU
IF YOU DO NOT ACT UPON THEM?
But the whole thing depends on action. It is not a question of just thinking beautiful
thoughts. It is not just a question of beautiful desires -- of God, of paradise, of moksha.
It is not a question of thinking of meditation, but acting, doing something about it.
Action and only action can help. You have to become involved, you have to become
committed.
Many people come to me and say, "We love your discourses, but we don't want to
meditate and we don't want to become sannyasins. Isn't it enough," they ask, "just to
listen to your beautiful discourses?" It is utterly futile!
Just to listen to my discourses is very stupid. If you are not going to act, don't waste
time -- it is an exercise in futility! If you just go on listening to me and never act, my
words may be soothing, my words may be consoling, my words may be convincing,
you may enjoy what I am saying intellectually, you may enjoy the space that is created
by my presence, but this alone is not going to help. Action is absolutely needed.
If you are convinced of some truth, act upon it, and act immediately! -- because mind is
very cunning, and the greatest cunningness of the mind is postponement. It says,
"Tomorrow..." and tomorrow never comes. It says, "Yes, we are going to meditate one
day. Let us first understand what meditation is." And then you can go on
understanding what meditation is your whole life, and you will never act. And unless
you act nothing is ever going to happen, no transformation is going to happen.
Sannyas is a commitment. It is actively showing your love towards me. It is getting
involved with my destiny. It is entering into my boat. It is dangerous -- it is safer to
stand on the bank and listen. Then it is a kind of entertainment -- a spiritual
entertainment! -- but utterly useless, just killing time.
And that's what people go on doing in the so-called spiritual gatherings -- satsangs.
They go to the Sunday sermon and they listen very attentively and very seriously, but
out of the church it has no effect on their lives. In fact, even the preacher is not affected
by what he is saying. It is his business to say these things, he is paid for it. He is a
professional. And it is a formality for the listeners -- just to have a good reputation in
the community, that they are religious, that they go to the church every Sunday. And it
is a beautiful social gathering too -- meeting people, talking to people, gossiping. It
gives a good opportunity -- in the name of religion. A social gathering! It is an old kind
of Rotary Club, Lions Club, etcetera. It does not matter, it does not change their lives.Once I used to live in the neighborhood of a Christian priest, a very eloquent speaker.
One day he was showing his garden to me, and we started talking about this and that.
And he said, "Can you help my son?"
I said, "What is the matter with your son?"
He said, "He has started taking my sermons too seriously. I have to preach and I have to
talk about great things. He comes to listen and he has started to take them too seriously.
Now he does not want to get married; he wants to become a holy man. Can't you help
him?"
"I can -- that's my business! I can help -- I help holy people to become unholy again. You
send him to me. I will pull him down."
"But listen," the priest said, "he is taking my words too seriously." Even the priest does
not mean that anybody should take his words too seriously -- and nobody ever does
except a few foolish people.
But when you are around a Buddha, a Jesus, a Krishna, a Mohammed, it is not a
question of taking their words seriously. It is a question of seeing the authenticity of
their words and then acting upon it. If it stirs your heart, if a bell starts ringing in your
heart, then don't stop it. Then follow, then go deeper into it, because that is the only
way to be transformed. That is the only way to know the eternal -- aes dhammo
sanantano. That is the only way to know the eternal harmony of existence.
And to know the eternal harmony is to know bliss, is to know God, is to go beyond
time, is to go beyond death, is to go beyond misery.
Two women are talking in a tea room at four o'clock, over large gooey ice-cream
sundaes and little sugary cakes. They have not seen each other since high-school days,
and one is bragging about her very advantageous marriage.
"My husband buys me whole new sets of diamonds when the ones I have get dirty," she
says. "I never even bother to clean them."
"Fantastic!" says the other women.
"Yes," says the first, "we get a new car every two months. None of this hire-purchase
stuff! My husband buys them outright, and we give them to the Negro gardener and
houseman and like that for presents."
"Fantastic!" says the other.
"And our house," pursues the first, "well, what's the use of talking about it? It's just...."
"Fantastic!" finishes the other.
"Yes, and tell me, what are you doing nowadays?" says the first woman.
"I go to Charm School," says the other.
"Charm School? Why, how quaint! What do you learn there?"
"Well, we learn to say 'Fantastic' instead of 'Bullshit'!"
You can start calling bullshit "fantastic," but it makes no difference. You can learn
religious, spiritual garbage....There are many people here too who are very expert in so-called esoteric jargon. They
always talk of so many planes, so many bodies, so many centers...and they talk so
seriously that it seems they know what they are talking about. Avoid esoteric garbage!
Avoid esoteric knowledge! It is not knowledge, it is just to befool people. If you are
interested in such things you should read the great literature that has been created by
theosophists.
Anything goes, you just have to talk in such a way that it seems otherworldly. It can
neither be proved nor disproved. Now how can you prove how many planes there are?
Seven or thirteen?
One man came to me. His religious sect believes in fourteen planes, and he had a chart,
he had brought the chart. Mahavira has attained only to the fifth plane, Buddha to the
sixth, Kabir, Nanak, to the ninth -- because he was a Punjabi he had been a little
generous with Nanak and Kabir. But his own Radhaswami guru, he has attained to the
fourteenth! Even Buddha is just hanging around the sixth! And Mohammed, do you
know where Mohammed is? -- just the third! A Hindu and a Punjabi, how can you
allow Mohammed to go beyond the third? He keeps him third-rate. Jesus he is a little
more generous with -- on the fourth; he places Jesus on the fourth. But his own guru --
nobody knows about his guru -- he has reached the fourteenth! The fourteenth is called
satch-khand -- the plane of truth.
So I asked him, "What about the other thirteen?"
He said, "They are just coming closer and closer to truth, only approximately true."
Now, can there be an approximate truth? Either something is true or something is not
true. Either I am here in the chair or I am not in the chair -- I cannot be approximately in
the chair. So "approximate truth" is a beautiful name for a lie.
He had come to ask me what my opinion is about the fourteen planes. I said, "I have
reached the fifteenth. And just as you are asking about the planes, your Radhaswami
guru asks me again and again how to enter into the fifteenth."
He was very angry. He said, "Never heard about the fifteenth plane!"
I said, "How can you hear? Your guru has only reached the fourteenth, so you have
heard about fourteen. But I have reached the fifteenth!"
Just nonsense! But it can be presented in such a way that it looks very spiritual. Avoid!
Buddha says: HOWEVER MANY HOLY WORDS YOU READ, HOWEVER MANY
YOU SPEAK, WHAT GOOD WILL THEY DO YOU IF YOU DO NOT ACT UPON
THEM?
Belief remains in the world of words. It is trust, it is deep trust, that takes you into
action. Action is risky. To talk about the other shore is simple, but to swim to the other
shore is dangerous, because no map exists. In fact nobody can be certain about the other
shore, whether it exists or not.
Just ordinary belief won't do. Unless you have a tremendous trust in life, unless you
have a tremendous trust in your own inner voice, you can't go on the journey of the
uncharted sea.But only action will prove that you trust, and only action can transform you.
ARE YOU A SHEPHERD
WHO COUNTS ANOTHER MAN'S SHEEP,
NEVER SHARING THE WAY?
Buddha used to say it again and again: that there are foolish people who go on counting
other people's cows -- that this man has fifteen cows, this man has thirteen cows -- and
they themselves don't have a single one! What is the point of counting other people's
cows or sheep? It is not going to feed you, it is not going to nourish you. It is a sheer
wastage of time!
But this is what happens in the name of religion. What the Vedas say...people waste
their whole lives in trying to decipher the meaning of the Vedas. There are people who
have wasted their whole lives in finding out the true meaning of the Bible. This is
counting other people's sheep!
You can go in and you can hear the Bible arising there -- as Jesus heard it. Jesus has no
privilege over you. Nobody is privileged! Before the eternal law, before dhamma,
everybody is equal. In this world everybody is unequal and can never be equal. In this
world communism is impossible.
But in the inner world everybody is equal -- only communism is possible. Communism
is an inner phenomenon. The efforts that are being made to make the outer world a
communist world are futile; it cannot happen in the very nature of things.
In Soviet Russia now the old classes are not there, but new classes have come up. Old
classes are replaced by new classes. First there were the proletariat and the bourgeoisie;
now there are the people who rule, the rulers, the Communist Party members, and the
people who are ruled. It is the same game played in different names.
In the outer world communism is impossible. Inequality is the law; everybody is
unequal in the outer world. Somebody is stronger than you, somebody is more
intelligent, somebody is more beautiful, somebody is talented, somebody is a genius....
People are different, and they cannot be forced to be equal; that will be destroying
humanity. They will remain unequal.
But in the inner, as you move inwards, inequality starts disappearing. At the innermost
core there is absolute equality. Communism is an inner phenomenon.
That's why I am going to call my new ashram a commune. Communism comes from the
word 'commune'. It is going to be an inner equality. People will remain different, as
much as possible; in fact, as far as the outside world is concerned, everybody should
have his unique individuality, his own flavor, his own signature. On the outside
everybody should be allowed absolute freedom to be himself. In the inner, the ego
disappears, the personality disappears, there is only pure consciousness. And two
consciousnesses are not higher or lower. There is no hierarchy.
Don't go on counting other people's sheep. Go in! Don't go on reading scriptures. Go in!
Don't go on listening to others' words. Share the way! If you come across a buddha you
are fortunate. If you fall in love with a buddha you are blessed. Don't just go onlistening to his words. Follow the way, share the way! Look where he is pointing, don't
start worshipping his finger. Look at the moon!
READ AS FEW WORDS AS YOU LIKE
AND SPEAK FEWER.
BUT ACT UPON THE LAW.
Let me remind you again, because the word 'law' in English has wrong associations. It
is a translation for dhamma: the eternal law, the cosmic law, logos. ACT UPON THE
LAW does not mean act according to the Indian Penal Code. Act according to the law
means act according to your inner nature.
GIVE UP THE OLD WAYS --
PASSION, ENMITY, FOLLY.
KNOW THE TRUTH AND FIND PEACE.
SHARE THE WAY.
GIVE UP THE OLD WAYS.... You have to become discontinuous from the past. You
have to exist in a new way. You have to simply cut yourself from your past with a
single stroke. And that's what sannyas is all about: cutting yourself from your past with
a single stroke of the sword.
What are the old ways? -- the way of desire, the way of hate, and the way of stupidity.
Don't function out of hatred and don't desire things, possessions. And don't be
superstitious, foolish. If you can do this much, if you can take this leap into the
unknown...because the past is known and you are accustomed to doing things in a
certain way. When you drop the past you will be at a loss for a few days, disoriented,
not knowing what to do, how to do it. You will be in a vacuum. That vacuum has to be
passed through. It is painful -- that is the price we have to pay for truth.
Once you have passed that vacuum: KNOW THE TRUTH AND FIND PEACE. Then
truth is known and truth follows peace like a shadow.
SHARE THE WAY, Buddha insists again. But this can't happen just by listening, just by
reading the works of the masters.
SHARE THE WAY.
AES DHAMMO SANANTANO.
Enough for today.The Dhammapada: The Way of the Buddha, Vol 1
Chapter #4
Chapter title: Just lucky, I guess!
24 June 1979 am in Buddha Hall
The first question:
Question 1
BELOVED MASTER,
UPON RETURNING TO HOLLAND LAST YEAR I STARTED COMMUNICATING
ABOUT YOU WITH AN OVERWHELMING SENSE OF URGENCY. I FELT YOU
IMPARTED THIS URGENCY TO ME, BUT IT SEEMED ALSO TO BE A PART OF MY
NATURE.
THIS FEELING OF NOT HAVING A SECOND TO LOSE, THE WISH TO GET MORE
DUTCH PEOPLE TO BECOME SANNYASINS AS SOON AS POSSIBLE, MADE ME
FAR FROM PLAYFUL. THE SERIOUSNESS LED TO MUCH ANGUISH BECAUSE I
WAS CONFRONTED WITH INDIFFERENCE, RIDICULE AND CONTEMPT,
ESPECIALLY FROM THE JOURNALISTS. OBJECTIVELY I DID NOT FAIL -- FAR
FROM IT -- BUT IN TERMS OF BEING, MY TRIP WAS NOT EXACTLY wu-wei. I
SIMPLY COULD NOT COMBINE THIS URGENCY WITH JOY AND RELAXATION.
WILL YOU SAY A FEW WORDS ON THIS URGENCY, EVEN THOUGH YOU HAVE
GIVEN ME SO MUCH ALREADY?
Deva Amrito, the playfulness that I talk about comes very slowly. You cannot just jump
out of your seriousness which you have accumulated for lives. Now it has a force of its
own.
It is not a simple matter to relax; it is one of the most complex phenomena possible,
because all that we are taught is tension, anxiety, anguish. Seriousness is the very core
the society is built around. Playfulness is for small children, not for grown-up people.
And I am teaching you to be children again, to be playful again. It is a quantum leap, a
jump...but it takes time to understand.
And as far as I am concerned, you have been immensely successful: objectively,
certainly, but subjectively too. Unexpectedly you have been successful. Anybody else in
your place would have been in a madhouse.
You were excited, and it is natural to be excited. When somebody understands me, feels
me, he immediately starts feeling an urgency -- not a single moment to lose. And the
word has to be spread. A kind of tremendous immediacy overwhelms. It is natural! It is
true that there is not a single moment to lose. And if you love me, you would like all
those people to come to me, because they may not get the opportunity again -- for
centuries, for lives together!When you love, and you have found a treasure, you would like to share it. And if the
treasure is such that it can disappear any moment, how can you avoid the feeling of
immense urgency? You will have to shout from the tops of the houses.
And the response that you will get is absolutely certain and fixed. The more you would
like people to come to me, the more they will escape -- from you, from the very idea of
coming to me. And the only way to escape is to ridicule you, to laugh at you, to call you
mad. That is their way of defending themselves. If they listen to you understandingly, if
they allow you to overwhelm their being, to overflow into their being, to flood their
being, then they will also find themselves in the same grip. And it will be very difficult
for them to avoid.
Hence, from the very beginning they will ridicule you, criticize you, oppose you, laugh
at you. They will do everything possible to create the feeling in you that you are wrong.
But they failed. They could not create that feeling in you. The more they ridiculed you,
the more they laughed, the more they criticized, the more you tried to convince them.
And you have been objectively successful -- you have convinced thousands of people.
Since your going to Holland, many many Dutch people have arrived, and more are
arriving, and more will go on arriving. You have created a great stir. You have touched
many people's hearts. And it has been a great experience for your inner growth too.
The impact that you created has not got into your head yet; it has not made you more of
an egoist. In fact, it has made you more humble. It may not have been exactly wu-wei,
but it was very close. And I was not expecting it to be absolutely wu-wei, but it has been
more than I was expecting.
I was a little bit afraid, Amrito, that you might go mad. The urgency was such, your
ecstasy was such, you were so passionately in love with me, that I was afraid deep
down. I was sending you with all kinds of apprehensions. But you survived the test.
You have come back. The turmoil that was created around you because of your talking
about me -- in the newspapers, on the radio, the TV -- the way you talked, it gave the
sense of your immense love, it gave the sense that you have found the home.
Many have been convinced. And many who have not been convinced have also started
thinking about it. And even those who have ridiculed you and have opposed you are
impressed; otherwise who cares? Why should you oppose somebody if you are not
impressed? Why should you ridicule and laugh if you are simply alert that he is mad?
Nobody laughs at a madman, nobody ridicules a madman. It is enough to know that he
is mad and everything is finished!
You have created a chain which will go on. And I would like many of my sannyasins to
be so excited, to feel the urgency, to go to their countries and spread the word. And you
will have to shout from the tops of the houses.
And whenever you are in love you look mad -- you are mad. Love is madness...but far
higher than the so-called, mediocre, mundane sanity. And love is blindness, but a
blindness that is capable of seeing the invisible.
Love is not part of the ordinary world that we have created. We have expelled love
from it. So whenever you are in love -- and to be in love with a master, to be in lovewith a buddha, is the ultimate love -- it drives you crazy. It makes you part of the
beyond. Nobody can believe it.
How can your friends, Amrito, believe it, that it has happened to you and it has not
happened to them? It is so much against their egos that you have found and they have
not found yet, and still they are struggling. No, the easier way for them is to deny, to
say that you have not found, that you are in an illusion, that you have been hypnotized,
that you are hallucinating, that you have been drugged. That gives them a consolation,
that gives them a kind of at-easeness. If you have really found, then they will feel very
very uneasy -- then their lives are failures.
It has been a beautiful experience. I know you could not be very playful. It was difficult.
Next time when I send you, you will be more playful. Now don't get afraid! I know that
you don't want to go back again. Enough is enough...but one more time. Next time the
whole project is to be playful. Then people will laugh more and they will think that you
have gone even more mad. But laugh...dance, sing. This time you were arguing. Next
time no arguing -- singing, dancing, hugging people.
But I am absolutely happy. Whatsoever has happened has been good objectively, has
been good for others, has been good for you. It is a device: to send you for a particular
purpose is a device for your inner growth. And you have been successful.
There was every possibility of being a failure.
I am reminded:
Once George Gurdjieff asked P.D. Ouspensky, his chief disciple of those days, to come
from London to a faraway place somewhere in the Caucasus. It was very difficult.
Financially Ouspensky was bankrupt. He had no money, no house to live in, nobody to
support him. And such a long journey! And the times were very dangerous. In those
parts of the world it was dangerous to move, because the Russian revolution was
happening. People were being massacred, killed, murdered. There was no peace. Even
Gurdjieff had to leave Russia, and he was hiding in the mountains of the Caucasus.
It was not a right time to go there; it was very dangerous. The journey was not easy: all
the trains were unsettled, roads were cut, bridges were broken. It was chaos! But when
the master calls, the disciple has to follow. Whatever belongings he had, he sold. He
borrowed money from people, and traveled thousands of miles. It took him almost
thirty days to reach Gurdjieff. Tired, tattered, thinking many times, "What am I doing?
People are escaping from Russia, and I am going there!" And he was on the blacklist of
the communists, because he was a well-known figure -- chief disciple of George
Gurdjieff, a well-known, world-famous mathematician, a great author, one of the
greatest the world has ever known. His books were translated into almost all the
languages of the world. Going back to Russia was dangerous. He could be caught,
imprisoned, killed. He was anticommunist! -- no sensible person can be a communist,
because the whole idea is nonsense. But he traveled...and when he reached Gurdjieff,
Gurdjieff looked at him and the first thing that he said was, "Go back to London and
start work again."Now that was too much. Ouspensky failed. He could not trust this man. Now what
kind of a joke is this? Playing with somebody's life in such a way...and immediately he
said, "Go back right now! I have nothing else to say."
Ouspensky went back -- turned against Gurdjieff, became an enemy. That was a great
device of a great master. If he had trusted, he would have become enlightened. He
missed the opportunity. He died an unenlightened person.
When things are going smooth and easy, trust is easy -- but it is worthless. When things
become difficult, arduous, impossible, and you can still trust, when it becomes
absolutely illogical to trust and you can still trust, only such a trust becomes a
transforming force.
Amrito, I am going to send you one more time. And remember, I am not a very
consistent man: it may be twice, thrice...it depends. But for the moment, one time I am
going to send you -- that much is certain.
And this time the project is being playful.
The second question:
Question 2
BELOVED MASTER,
WHY ARE THERE SO MANY RELIGIONS IN THE WORLD, AND WHY DO THESE
RELIGIONS CONTINUOUSLY QUARREL WITH EACH OTHER?
Geetam, it is natural that there should be so many religions. In fact, more are needed.
As I see it, each individual should have his own religion; there should be as many
religions as there are people. The number is not so much: there are only three hundred
religions -- and how many people on the earth?
Each individual should have his own religion, because each individual is so unique, so
different from anybody else. How can two persons have one religion? It is impossible.
But we have been asking the impossible. Each individual has to reach God in his own
way, and that way is never going to be traveled by anybody else again.
Hence, buddhas can only indicate, can only give you hints. They cannot provide you
with certain, absolutely certain maps -- just hints, a few hints. And those hints have not
to be taken very seriously -- very playfully. You are not to become a fanatic. If you
become a fanatic you are no longer religious.
A religious person is humble, available to all kinds of hints; he is a seeker, a searcher, an
explorer, and he will learn from every possible source. He will learn from the Bible, and
he will learn from the Vedas, and he will learn from THE DHAMMAPADA. He will
listen to Buddha, to Jesus, to Zarathustra. He will learn from all possible sources, but
still he will remain himself. He will not become an imitation, he will not become a
carbon copy. He will retain his authenticity. He will be humble, sincere, authentic; he
will not become pseudo. He will not be a follower, he will be a lover.
He will love the buddha, but he will not follow him; he will not follow him in the
details. How can you follow a buddha in the details? He is a totally different kind ofperson. You have never been before, nobody like you has ever been before, and nobody
who is exactly like you will ever be there again. Hence your religion has to be your
religion, your truth has to be your truth.
And that is the beauty of truth, that it always comes in such a unique form that you can
say, "This is a special gift from God to me." Hence there are so many religions. And it is
beautiful! -- there should be many more. Many people have been trying to make one
religion; that is utter stupidity. You cannot create one religion. You can enforce one
religion on people, but that will destroy their spirit, their freedom; that will cripple their
being and paralyze their growth.
Just as there are so many languages, there are so many religions. The variety is
beautiful, the variety makes it possible for you to choose according to your type.
Religion is not and cannot be decided by birth, and those who decide their religion by
their birth are utter fools. You cannot be born a Hindu and you cannot be born a
Christian; birth has nothing to do with your religion. Religion is an inquiry. You may be
born to Hindu parents -- that is one thing -- but if your parents really love you they will
not convert you into a Hindu. Of course they will tell you all they have known and
experienced, but they will leave you free. And they will tell you, "Become more alert,
watchful, mature, and when you are mature enough and you want to decide, choose
your own religion."
Go to the mosque, go to the church, go to the temple, go to the gurudwara. Listen to all
kinds of things, see all kinds of flowers: the garden of God is so full of variety, is so rich
because of variety. There are roses and lotuses and a thousand and one other flowers.
Go and choose your own perfume, your own fragrance, because unless you yourself
choose you will not be dedicated to it, you will not be surrendered to it.
The world is not religious because religion is imposed upon us. The parents are in a
hurry to impose; the church, the state, the country -- everybody is in a hurry to impose a
certain religion on the child. How foolish! How stupid! Religion needs maturity, great
understanding, before one can choose.
Nobody is born a Hindu or a Mohammedan or a Parsi. Everybody is born clean,
innocent, a TABULA RASA, and then everyone has to seek and search. This is the
beauty of life because life is an inquiry. And don't be settled too early; there is no need.
It is possible that no existing religion may satisfy you. But that is good; that means a
new religion is born in you. The world becomes richer: one more religion, one more
flower, one more tree -- a new phenomenon.
Buddha brings a new religion into the world; the world was poorer before Buddha
because it was missing Buddhism. Buddha could have followed the religion of his
parents; then the world would have been still poor. The world would have missed
something immensely valuable, a new door to God. Buddha opened a new door, a new
vision, a new insight. He was not convinced by his parents' religion; otherwise, he
would have remained a Hindu. He rebelled. All religious people are rebellious people.
He went on an individual search -- all religious people are explorers, all religious
people are adventurers. It would have been easy and convenient and comfortable to
believe in the religion that had been believed in by the parents and the parents' parents,and for centuries. It would have been more convenient because you need not inquire,
you need not go through the whole effort of finding the truth. It has been found by
some seer in the past -- you can simply borrow it. But a borrowed truth is not a truth at
all. A borrowed truth is a lie.
Buddha went on a search; arduous was the inquiry. He risked all -- his kingdom, his
life. But when you risk so much, life showers new treasures on you. A new religion, a
new insight, a new vision, was born into the world.
Mohammed could have followed his parents' religion. Jesus could have followed
Judaism. Become a Jesus, become a Buddha, become a Mohammed! Don't be a
Mohammedan and don't be a Buddhist and don't be a Christian -- explore! Don't waste
life in imitating, because then you will remain pseudo. And a pseudo person cannot be
religious. Great authenticity, sincerity is needed.
So, Geetam, it is good that there are three hundred religions -- there should be more! I
am always for variety. I want the world richer in every possible way. Would you like
the whole world to have only one kind of flower -- just roses, or just lotuses? Will it not
be an impoverished world, very poor? Would you like the world to have only one
language? Then the different nuances of the different languages will disappear.
There are things which can be said only in Arabic and cannot be said in any other
language; and there are things which can be said only in Hebrew and cannot be said in
any other language. There are things which can be said only in Chinese and cannot be
said in any other language. If the world has only one language, many many beautiful
things will remain unsaid.
Lao Tzu can speak only Chinese. You may not have pondered over the problem: just
think of Lao Tzu writing his TAO TEH CHING in English...and the book will be totally
different. It will miss something of immense value; it will have something different, a
totally different color to it, but it will miss the flavor that it has in Chinese.
Now, Chinese has no alphabet; it is written in symbols. Because there is no alphabet,
symbols can be interpreted in a thousand and one ways; symbols are more fluid, less
fixed, more poetic, less prosaic. One symbol can mean many things. It is not scientific; it
is very difficult to write scientific treatises in Chinese. For that, English is a far more
adequate language.
But what Lao Tzu has given to the world would not have been possible without
Chinese. Each symbol has many meanings, a multiplicity of meanings. You can choose
your meaning according to your state of mind. Each symbol has many layers of
meaning. As you grow in your understanding, the meaning of the symbols changes.
Hence, in the East a totally different kind of reading has existed which is nonexistent in
the West. You would not like to read the same Bernard Shaw book again and again and
again, or would you? Unless you are insane you would not like to read it again and
again and again. What is the point? Once you have read it, it is finished! That's why the
paperback has come into existence: read it and throw it. But in the East a different kind
of reading exists: the same book is read again and again the whole life long.
The TAO TEH CHING is not a book which can be published in paperback -- they are
doing that now. It should not be published in paperback -- it cannot be, because it is atotally different kind of book. It has layers and layers of meaning. When for the first
time you read it, it is one book because you know only one meaning, the superficial.
After meditating for a few months you read it again; another meaning reveals itself;
after meditating a few months more you read it again...a third meaning. It has to go on,
it has to become a life's study.
And you will go on finding the meanings -- they are inexhaustible. Aes dhammo
sanantano: the ultimate is eternal and inexhaustible. It is not a fiction; you cannot just
read it and be finished with it. One reading is not going to help you at all; it simply
introduces you, it does not give you the core of it. It takes a whole life to come to the
core of it.
Now we need all kinds of languages. English is needed for its definiteness, for its
certainty. Each word has a definition. Science cannot develop without such a language.
Science could not be born in India because of the language; Sanskrit is a poetic
language. You can sing it -- it has that quality -- you can chant it, but you cannot make
much of a syllogism out of it. Many songs, certainly, but it is not argumentative;
expressive but nonargumentative.
Arabic has a very haunting quality. If you chant it, it will become a haunting in your
heart. Stop chanting it and the chanting continues in the heart. Arabic has that quality in
it because it is a desert language; desert languages have a haunting quality. When you
are calling somebody in a desert, far away, you have to call in a certain way -- and in a
desert you can call people who are very far away; if you call them in a rhythmic way
your sound will reach them.
Hence the beauty of the Koran. It is not a book to be read -- those who read the Koran
will miss its meaning -- it is a book to be sung. It is not a book to be studied: it is a book
to be danced, only then will you reach its inner spirit.
It is beautiful that there are many languages because there are many things to be said,
expressed, communicated. And as the world grows, many more languages are needed,
because as the world grows, many more things people are feeling, people are going
through, people are reaching.
Religion is nothing but a language for expressing the ultimate. Geetam, there is nothing
wrong in there being many religions. Of course, there is certainly something wrong in
their constant quarreling with each other. That shows that the so-called religions have
lost their religious quality, they have become political; that these so-called religions no
longer have alive masters in them but only dead, dull, mediocre priests. They go on
quarreling, they go on trying to convert, because numbers create power. If there are
more Christians then Christianity has more power and the pope in the Vatican becomes
more powerful. If Hindus are more in number, of course they are more in power.
Numbers give power. So Christianity wants everybody to be a Christian, and
Mohammedans would like everybody to be a Mohammedan, Their ways and means
may differ, but the effort and the desire is the same, a very deep political desire -- it is
power politics. Then naturally quarreling will arise. Politics is quarreling; it has nothing
to do with religion.Religions should be as many as possible. And there is no question of any conflict: it is a
question of like and dislike. If I like roses, you don't try to come and convince me that I
should like marigolds -- you simply accept my liking. And if you like marigolds, it's
perfectly okay; there is no question of arguing, quarreling. We need not fight with each
other -- actually or intellectually. I can leave you to your choice, and I don't feel
offended because you like marigolds and I don't like them.
Likes and dislikes are individual affairs. One may like the Bhagavadgita, another may
like the Koran, somebody else may like THE DHAMMAPADA -- it's perfectly okay,
absolutely okay. We should share our likings with each other, but we should not try to
convert the other, to force the other into our fold. Yes, share by all means, because
sharing shows your love. If you have found a source, share! But the sharing should be
out of love, not for power politics. It is not to convince the other and to drag him into
your fold. Religions have been doing such ugly things. People have been converted at
the point of the bayonet; people are being converted by money, by bribing them...by
any means, right or wrong. Become a Christian! Become a Mohammedan! Become a
Hindu! Grab more and more people so you become more powerful, and don't allow
anybody else to leave your fold.
Mulla Nasruddin's son was asking him, "Papa, when a Christian becomes a
Mohammedan, what do you call him?"
Nasruddin smiled and said, "He has come to his senses, he is a man of understanding,
wisdom. He has understood what is false as false and what is truth as truth."
The boy asks again, "And Papa, if a Mohammedan becomes a Christian what do you
call him?"
Nasruddin was very angry and said, "He is a traitor! He has betrayed. He is stupid!"
Now, if a Christian becomes a Mohammedan, he is a man of intelligence, a wise man;
and if a Mohammedan becomes a Christian he is a traitor, stupid. And the same is the
situation if you ask the Christian.
A Hindu became a Christian. All the Hindus were against him, naturally -- he had
betrayed them! But Christians made him a saint. Sadhu Sunder Singh was his name.
They almost worshipped him as if he was an incarnation of Jesus, because he proved
the truth of Christianity. And Hindus? -- they were so angry with the man that they
wanted to kill him. And there is every possibility that they did kill him, because one
day he suddenly disappeared and his body has not been found since then. It is still a
mystery what happened to Sadhu Sunder Singh.
I know a man who was a Hindu and became a Jaina. Hindus were very much against
him, naturally, obviously. They tried in every way to destroy the man, but he became
the most famous Jaina saint. Ganesh Varni was his name. He defeated all other Jaina
saints; he reached the highest pinnacle. What was his real quality? Why did he reach the
highest pinnacle? Because basically he was a Hindu and became a Jaina. "He proved
that Jainism is far higher than Hinduism; otherwise, why has this man, such a wise
man, come to our fold?"Geetam, these religions quarrel because they are not religious; they have become more
and more political. And when you quarrel, then everything is right -- in love and war
everything is right.
A Catholic is trying to convert a Jew and tells him that if he becomes a Catholic his
prayers will certainly be answered -- because the priest will give them to the bishop,
who will give them to the cardinal, who will give them to the pope, who will shove
them up into heaven through a hole at the top of the Vatican, which just matches a hole
in the floor of heaven, where Saint Peter will take them to the Virgin Mary, who will
intercede on their behalf with Jesus, who will say a good word for them to God.
The Jew repeats this whole itinerary with an astonished air, ending, "You know it must
be true, because I have always wondered what they do with all the shit in heaven. They
must throw it down that little hole in the Vatican, where the pope gives it to the
cardinal, who gives it to the bishop, who gives it to the priest, who gives it to you -- and
you are trying to hand it to me?"
Religions are good -- many more are needed -- but quarreling religions are not religions.
The very quarreling attitude makes them political. And the priest and the politician
have been in a very subtle conspiracy down the ages -- because the politician can
dominate the people through the priest very easily. The priest possesses the souls of the
people and the politician possesses the bodies of the people. Both are oppressors,
exploiters. Both are in the same business, both are partners. Both can help each other.
The politician can help the priest because he has temporal power, and the priest can
help the politician because people listen to him, worship him, take his word as divine.
Do you know, Buddhism did not become a great religion because of Buddha; it became
a great religion because of the emperor Ashoka. It was not because of Buddha that
millions of people became Buddhists, no. While Buddha was alive, only a few, a few
chosen people were courageous enough to walk with him in his light, to commune with
him. And they were courageous -- because they had to suffer, they had to suffer much
ridicule, opposition, because the established Hindu church was against this man
Buddha.
Buddhism became a world religion not because of Buddha but because of the emperor
Ashoka. When the Buddhist priests joined hands with the emperor Ashoka, then the
religion became a world religion. The whole of Asia was converted. Now the priests
would help Ashoka to retain his power, and Ashoka would help the priests become
more and more powerful.
Christianity became a world religion not because of Jesus. Jesus was very alone -- only a
few disciples, twelve disciples, and a few hundred sympathizers, that's all. And even
those disciples disappeared when Jesus was being crucified, and the sympathizers
simply forgot about him; they stopped talking about the man because it was dangerous
even to show sympathy.
It is said that the people who had sympathized with Jesus came to spit on his face while
he was dying to show the people, "We are against, we are not for him." To prove to thepeople...because this man is dying -- now they will be in trouble. They have to live, they
still have to live. They have to give some proof that they are against this man.
They denied Jesus while he was dying. They threw mud, stones, they spat on his face,
just to show the crowds, "See, isn't this enough proof that the rumors that you have
heard that we are sympathizers are absolutely wrong, unfounded? We are against him
as much as you are -- in fact, we are more against him than you are."
The enemies were not spitting on him but the friends. Jesus became a world force not
because of himself but only when the Roman emperors and Christian priests joined
hands. Now, this is an irony. Jesus was crucified by a Roman emperor -- see how
history moves! Pontius Pilate was just a representative of the Roman power, of the
Roman emperor; he simply followed the orders from Rome. Who would ever have
thought that Rome would become the central place of Christianity? Who would ever
have thought while Jesus was being crucified that Rome would be the residence of the
pope? But that's how it happened. When priests joined hands with Emperor
Constantine and other Roman emperors, Christianity became a world force.
Christianity, Buddhism, Hinduism, Jainism -- they have all depended on politics. They
are not true religions anymore but political games being played in the name of religion.
I would like the world to have many more religions, so many that each individual has
his own religion -- then no priest will be needed. That is the only way to drop the
priests. If you have your own religion, no priest is needed -- you are the priest and you
are the follower and you are everything.
You have to listen to your inner voice. Buddha says: Follow your own nature; there is
no need for anybody to intercede on your behalf.
But I am not in favor of creating one religion; enough of that nonsense! In the past we
have been trying to do that: make one religion so that quarreling can stop. But it is not
possible. Even if you can enforce one religion, if the whole world becomes Christian,
then again there will be Protestants and Catholics and a thousand and one sects. And
the same game will start again: people will start quarreling -- because their needs are
different, their understandings are different.
I have heard:
A beautiful young woman came home from London. She belonged to a small village,
was from a Catholic family. After three or four years of living in London she had
become very rich; she came back to see her parents. The mother could not believe her
eyes. She asked, "How did you manage? You have become so rich -- such beautiful
clothes, a diamond ring, a beautiful car!"
And the girl said, "Mother, I have become a prostitute."
Just hearing this the mother fainted, became unconscious. When she came back she
asked again, "What did you say?"
The girl said, "Mother, I said I have become a prostitute."
And the mother started laughing and she said, "I misunderstood you -- I thought you
said you had become a Protestant."To be a prostitute is okay, but to become a Protestant...? The same quarreling will start.
Even small religions -- for example, Jainism, one of the smallest religions in the world --
have so many sects, sects within sects. In fact, we have not yet become aware of the
great necessity that each individual needs his own version of God, and each individual
has his own way of approaching God.
A man picked up by a prostitute in a bar is amazed by the college pennants and
diplomas ornamenting the walls of her room.
"Are these your diplomas?" he asks.
"Sure," she says airily. "I have my Master of Arts from Columbia, and took my Ph.D. in
Shakespeare at Oxford."
The man is incredulous. "But how did a girl like you get into a profession like this?"
"I don't know," she says. "Just lucky, I guess."
People have different understandings, different ways of looking at things, different
interpretations. And they have to be allowed this freedom.
The third question:
Question 3
BELOVED MASTER,
MY PARENTS WERE CHRISTIAN MISSIONARIES IN INDIA FOR TWENTY-FIVE
YEARS. MY BROTHER WAS A JUNKIE, MY SISTER A COMPULSIVE LIAR. AS FOR
ME, I AM SO SERIOUS THAT IF I SMILE MY MOUTH HURTS. HOW DID I END UP
HERE?
Prem Parijat, just lucky, I guess! You will live in ecstasy and you will die in ecstasy.
Did you hear about the man eighty-seven years of age who married a nineteen-year-old
girl?
He died of a new disease called ecstasy. It took them three days to wipe the smile off his
face.
Now, this is going to happen to you too: living your life will be a laughter; dying, it will
be difficult for the people to wipe off your smile.
It may be just because your parents are Christian missionaries that you have landed
here, because to be born to any kind of missionaries -- Christian, Hindu or
Mohammedan -- is to be fed up with all that nonsense. To be born to a priest is to know
one thing for certain: that priests don't believe in God. It is their business; they pretend.
It is a rare opportunity to be born in the house of a priest, because children are very
perceptive and they can see through and through that all that nonsense that their father
in preaching is just preaching -- he does not mean it because he never practices it. The
children of the priests are bound to become aware of the hypocrisy of the so-called
religious people.
It may be just because of it, because it is almost impossible to be in the house of a priest
and not to know that he is the most irreligious person possible in the world.Priests are exploiting religion. They are exploiting people's trust. They are the greatest
cheaters in the world, because to exploit people's trust is the greatest crime. You are
destroying their trust. But they live on that kind of cheating; that is their whole trade
secret.
The bishop was very proud of an elegant mansion he had constructed as his official
residence. One day, a friend and the bishop were engaged in conversation and the
bishop was pursuing a seemingly atheistic train of thought....
That kind of thinking is becoming very prevalent in Christian circles: religionless
religion, Godless Christianity -- these are being talked about, discussed. After Friedrich
Nietzsche, who declared that God is dead, Christianity has been in a turmoil -- what to
do now? They have been trying every possible way to create a Christianity which does
not need God anymore, so that the profession can expand again.
Now God has become a barrier; the moment you assert the word 'God', you put people
off. So Christian theologians are discussing, thinking, meditating, how to create a
Christianity that does not need God at all. And it is possible! -- because Buddhism is
there without any God, and Jainism is there without any God, so why can't there be a
Christianity without God?
...This bishop was pursuing a seemingly atheistic train of thought. The friend asked
him, "Bishop, do you believe in God or not? Say it exactly, say it in short. Don't go
round and round. Say simply yes or no -- do you believe in God?"
After a long hesitation, the bishop replied, "Of course I do! Who do you think paid for
this house?"
Now, the house that he has made, a beautiful mansion, is possible only because people
still believe in God; and because they believe in God, they believe in the bishop. He
cannot publicly declare there is no God. If you drop God, then Jesus is no longer the Son
of God, then the pope is no longer the representative of Jesus, and so on and so forth.
And they all go down the drain. It needs a hierarchy: God at the top and the priest at
the bottom, the whole ladder.
And the priest certainly knows that there is no God. If he was aware that there is a God,
he would not have been a priest in the first place -- he would be a Jesus, he would be a
Buddha, but not a priest. He would be a prophet but not a priest. He would bring
something of the unknown into people's lives, but he would not be part of a status quo,
he would not be part of the established church. No man of understanding, no man who
has some religious consciousness and experiences, can be part of any established
church. It has never happened. Buddha has to leave his fold, Jesus has to leave his fold,
Mohammed has to leave his fold -- this has always been so. Whenever a religious man
is born, he has to leave his fold, because the fold is already in the hands of the
politicians and the priests, whose whole interest is in exploiting people.
Anand Moksha has written to me:During the time of the major earthquakes in Guatemala in 1976, the Catholic bishop at
Lake Atitlan befriended me and allowed me to stay in his garden for a while.
A few months passed and after-shock tremors were still common. At that time I
discovered that a beautiful house on a hillside was for rent for very little money. The
reason was that a large boulder ominously overhung the house and people were afraid.
I felt the vibes and it seemed okay to me -- so I rented the place.
When I told the bishop, he reacted with nervous dismay and swung his arms about,
saying, "Aren't you worried about that rock tumbling down on the house?"
I replied, "If the Lord wants to take me, he will."
The bishop shrugged his shoulders and said, "You don't believe that, do you?"
It may be simply, Parijat, that just because you were born of Christian missionaries it
became possible for you to be here. Christian missionaries, and twenty-five years in
India! -- that is too much. In the first place, Christian missionaries and in the second
place, twenty-five years in India...that is enough, more than enough, to convince the
children that their parents are pseudo, that they are talking business, that they don't
believe.
It is not a question of belief at all.
I have heard a small story:
In a school, a Christian missionary school, the teacher asked the children, "Who is the
greatest man in history?"
An American boy says, "Abraham Lincoln."
A Mohammedan boy says, "Hazrat Mohammed."
A Hindu girl says, "Lord Krishna."
And so on and so forth...and finally, the little Jewish boy stands up and says, "Jesus
Christ."
The teacher could not believe her ears -- the Jew and saying Jesus Christ? She asked,
"Do you really mean that?"
He said, "That is not the question. In my heart of hearts I know it is Moses -- but
business is business."
To be with Christian missionaries for twenty-five years, and in India, and seeing what
they are doing, is enough to disillusion you. The whole credit goes to your parents and
their twenty-five years in India. They have brought you here -- be thankful to them.
The fourth question:
Question 4
BELOVED MASTER,
I FEEL THAT I AM A VERY SPECIAL PERSON. I AM SO SPECIAL THAT I WANT
JUST TO BE ORDINARY. PLEASE CAN YOU SAY SOMETHING ABOUT THIS?Anand Sangito, everybody here thinks exactly the same. And not only here, but
everywhere else. Everyone deep in their heart knows that he is special. This is a joke
God plays on people. When he makes a new man and pushes him down towards the
earth, he whispers in his ear, "You are special. You are incomparable, you are just
unique!"
But this he goes on doing to everybody and everybody goes on carrying it deep in the
heart, although people don't say it as loudly as you are doing, because they are afraid
others may feel offended. And nobody is going to be convinced, so what is the point of
saying it? If you tell somebody, "I am special," you cannot convince him because he
himself knows that he is special. How can you convince anybody? Yes, maybe
sometimes somebody may be convinced, at least pretend to be convinced. If he has
some work with you, as a bribe he may say, "Yes, you are special, you are great." But
deep down he knows business is business.
A braggart is telling his friend about his three cars, etcetera, etcetera. When he also
mentions that he has two kept mistresses in New York, but that he has made his
ravishingly beautiful and terribly passionate private secretary pregnant, and must
therefore take his gorgeous blond stenographer with him on his business trip to Rio de
Janeiro to see the carnival, the listener suddenly begins to pant, grabs at his own
necktie, and has a heart attack.
The braggart interrupts his tale, gets water, pats the victim on the back, etcetera,
etcetera, and he asks solicitously what the matter is. "Can I help it?" the man gasps. "I
am allergic to bullshit."
It is better to keep such bullshit hidden deep down inside yourself, because people are
allergic. But in a way it is good that you exposed your mind.
If you think you are special then you are bound to create misery for yourself. If you
think that you are higher than others, wiser than others, then you will attain to a very
strong ego. And the ego is poison, pure poison. And the more egoistic you become, the
more it hurts, because it is a wound. The more egoistic you become, the more you
become unbridged from life. You fall separate from life; you are no longer in the flow of
existence, you have become a rock in the river. You have become ice-cold, you have lost
all warmth, all love. A special person cannot love, because where are you going to find
another special person?
I have heard about a man who remained unmarried his whole life, and when he was
dying, ninety years old, somebody asked him, "You have remained unmarried your
whole life, but you have never said what the reason was. Now you are dying, at least
quench our curiosity. If there is any secret, now you can tell it, because you are dying;
you will be gone. Even if the secret is known, it can't harm you."
The man said, "Yes, there is a secret. It is not that I am against marriage, but I was
searching for a perfect woman. I searched and searched, and my whole life slipped by."The inquirer asked, "But upon this big earth, so many millions of people, half of them
women, couldn't you find one perfect woman?"
A tear rolled down from the eye of the dying man. He said, "Yes, I did find one."
The inquirer was absolutely shocked. He said, "Then what happened? Why didn't you
get married?"
And the old man said, "But the woman was searching for a perfect husband."
Your life will become very difficult if you live with such ideas. And yes, the ego is so
tricky, so cunning, it can give you, Sangito, this new project: "You are so special, become
just ordinary." But in your ordinariness you will know you are the most extraordinarily
ordinary man. Nobody is more ordinary than you! It will be the same game,
camouflaged.
That's what so-called humble people go on doing. They say, "I am the most humble
man. I am just the dust on your feet." But they don't mean it! Don't say, "Yes, I know
you are," otherwise they will never be able to forgive you. They are waiting for you to
say, "You are the most humble man I have ever seen, you are the most pious man I have
ever seen." Then they will be satisfied, contented. It is ego hiding behind humbleness.
You cannot drop the ego in this way.
You ask, "I feel that I am a very very special person. I am so special that I want just to be
ordinary. Please can you say something about this?"
No one is special, or, everyone is special. No one is ordinary, or everyone is ordinary.
Whatsoever you think about yourself, please think the same about everyone else, and
the problem will be solved. You can choose. If you want the word 'special', you can
think you are special -- but then everybody is special. Not only people, but trees, birds,
animals, rocks -- the whole existence is special, because you come out of this existence
and you will dissolve into this existence. But if you love the word 'ordinary' -- which is
a beautiful word, more relaxed -- then know that everybody is ordinary. Then the
whole existence is ordinary.
One thing to be remembered: whatsoever you think about yourself, think the same for
everybody else and the ego will disappear. The ego is the illusion that is created by
thinking about yourself in one way and thinking about others in another. It is double
thinking. If you drop the double thinking, ego dies of its own accord.
The last question:
Question 5
BELOVED MASTER,
WHEN I CAME HERE I FELT GOD TO BE VERY NEAR -- ANY MOMENT AND I
WOULD BE WITH HIM -- BUT AS TIME PASSES IT SEEMS IMPOSSIBLE. HE IS NOT
AROUND; IT IS DIFFICULT TO SEE HIM.
WHY IS IT SO? PLEASE SAY SOMETHING ABOUT THIS.
Vedant Bharti, you must be carrying a certain image of God in your mind; hence you
are missing. And unless you drop that image you are going to miss. God has noobligation to fulfill your idea of him. You must be carrying a certain idea that "God
looks like this, behaves like this...." That's why it is becoming impossible: you are
making it impossible.
God can be known only by those who are capable of dropping all ideas about God. Any
idea that you have accumulated in yourself in your ignorance is a hindrance. Drop all
ideas about God and you will be surprised, you will be shocked, you will not be able to
believe your eyes...because only God is! Then you will never ask, "Where is God?" You
will ask, "Is there any place where God is not?"
Then in the very ordinariness of things you will see something tremendously
extraordinary. Then ordinary pebbles are transformed into diamonds. Then ordinary
humanity is no longer ordinary -- then something luminous is in everybody's heart.
Then man comes closer to the divine, and the divine comes closer to man; the human
and the divine disappear into each other, the world and God disappear into each other.
Then you are not searching for a God who is separate and high and far away, living in
the seventh heaven; then he lives in your neighborhood as your neighbor. Then he is
human, he is animal, he is vegetable, he is mineral...he is all.
And when you can see that he surrounds you, not as a person but as a presence, then
only does your inquiry come to a fulfillment. God is not hiding from you but you are
keeping your eyes closed because of so many prejudices. Somebody has a Hindu idea of
God, and somebody has a Christian idea of God, and somebody else a Mohammedan
idea of God. Now, God is neither Mohammedan, nor Christian, nor Hindu, so all these
people who are carrying these ideas are bound to go on stumbling in darkness and
more darkness. From darkness to darkness will be their journey, from death to death
they will move. They will never know the light.
A Hindu cannot know God, a Mohammedan cannot know God. First you will have to
cleanse your mind completely of all Hinduism, all Mohammedanism, all Buddhism.
When you are utterly thoughtless, just alert, aware, watchful, then God explodes. And
he explodes all over the place.
Vedant Bharti, you say, "When I came here I felt God to be very near." That was your
imagination.
"...Any moment and I would be with him." That was your wish.
"...But as time passes it seems impossible" -- because no imagination can ever become
real. No dream of yours can ever be fulfilled. Reality has to be discovered, not
imagined.
Now you say, "He is not around; it is difficult to see him."
Only he is around. It is difficult to see him because your eyes are too burdened with
your own prejudices, concepts, systems of thought. Be a little more childlike, be a little
more innocent. God comes only when the heart is innocent. God comes only when you
are utterly empty of all ideas. He is always ready to come, he is standing at the door,
but you cannot hear because your mind is so full of turmoil, full of thoughts, millions of
thoughts clamoring around. Your mind is so noisy you cannot hear the silent knock on
the door.
Be silent, be innocent. God is. Only God is.The Dhammapada: The Way of the Buddha, Vol 1
Chapter #5
Chapter title: Wakefulness is life
25 June 1979 am in Buddha Hall
WAKEFULNESS IS THE WAY TO LIFE.
THE FOOL SLEEPS
AS IF HE WERE ALREADY DEAD,
BUT THE MASTER IS AWAKE
AND HE LIVES FOREVER.
HE WATCHES.
HE IS CLEAR.
HOW HAPPY HE IS!
FOR HE SEES THAT WAKEFULNESS IS LIFE.
HOW HAPPY HE IS,
FOLLOWING THE PATH OF THE AWAKENED.
WITH GREAT PERSEVERANCE
HE MEDITATES, SEEKING
FREEDOM AND HAPPINESS.
SO AWAKE, REFLECT, WATCH.
WORK WITH CARE AND ATTENTION.
LIVE IN THE WAY
AND THE LIGHT WILL GROW IN YOU.
BY WATCHING AND WORKING
THE MASTER MAKES FOR HIMSELF AN ISLAND
WHICH THE FLOOD CANNOT OVERWHELM.
One of the most important things to be understood about man is that man is asleep.
Even while he thinks he is awake, he is not. His wakefulness is very fragile; his
wakefulness is so tiny it doesn't matter at all. His wakefulness is only a beautiful name,
but utterly empty.
You sleep in the night, you sleep in the day; from birth to death you go on changing
your patterns of sleep, but you never really awake. Just by opening the eyes don't befool
yourself that you are awake. Unless the inner eyes open, unless your inside becomes
full of light, unless you can see yourself, who you are, don't think that you are awake.That is the greatest illusion man lives in. And once you accept that you are already
awake, then there is no question of making any effort to be awake.
The first thing to sink deep in your heart is that you are asleep, utterly asleep. You are
dreaming, day in, day out. You are dreaming sometimes with open eyes and sometimes
with closed eyes, but you are dreaming, you are a dream. You are not yet a reality.
And, of course, in a dream whatsoever you do is meaningless, whatsoever you think is
pointless, whatsoever you project remains part of your dreams and never allows you to
see that which is. Hence Buddha's insistence...and not only Gautama the Buddha but all
the buddhas have insisted on only one thing: Awake! Continuously, for centuries, their
whole teaching can be contained in a single word: Be awake!
And they have been devising methods, strategies, they have been creating contexts and
spaces, and energy fields in which you can be shocked into awareness. Yes, unless you
are shocked, shaken to your very foundations, you will not awaken. The sleep has been
so long, it has reached to the very core of your being; you are soaked in it. Each cell of
your body and each fiber of your mind has become full of sleep. It is not a small
phenomenon. Hence great effort is needed to be alert, to be attentive, to be watchful, to
become a witness.
If on any one single theme all the buddhas of the world agree, this is the theme: that
man as he is is asleep, and man as he should be should be awake. Wakefulness is the
goal, and wakefulness is the taste of all their teachings. Zarathustra, Lao Tzu, Jesus,
Buddha, Bahauddin, Kabir, Nanak -- all the awakened ones have been teaching one
single theme, in different languages, in different metaphors, but their song is the same.
Just as the sea tastes of salt -- whether the sea is tasted from the north or from the east or
from the west, the sea always tastes of salt -- the taste of buddhahood is wakefulness.
But you will not make any effort if you go on believing that you are already awake;
then there is no question of making any effort. Why bother? And you have created
religions, gods, prayers, rituals, out of your dreams -- your gods are as much part of
your dreams as anything else. Your politics is part of your dreams, your religions are
part of your dreams, your poetry, your painting, your art -- whatsoever you do, because
you are asleep, you make it according to your own state of mind.
The Bible says God created man in his own image -- the truth seems to be just the
opposite: man has created God in his own image. Your gods are false because you are
false. Your religion is pseudo because you are pseudo. Your scriptures cannot have any
significance because you don't have any significance.
Two priest are playing golf. The younger one misses an easy putt and says, "Shit!" The
older one berates him for this, saying that if he continues to use profanity like that God
will certainly blast him with a thunderbolt. They keep playing and the younger priest
misses another putt, and again says, "Shit!"
The skies suddenly open: a thunderbolt flashes out, and strikes the older priest dead.
There is a pause, and the heavenly voice is heard saying in accents of thunder, "Shit!"Your gods cannot be different from you. Who will create them? Who will give them
shape and color and form? You create them, you sculpt them; they have eyes like you,
noses like you -- and minds like you! The Old Testament God says, "I am a very jealous
God!" Now who has created this God who is jealous? God cannot be jealous. And if God
is jealous, then what is wrong in being jealous? If even God is jealous, why should you
be thought to be doing something wrong when you are jealous? Then jealousy is divine.
The Old Testament God says, "I am a very angry God! If you don't follow my
commandments, I will destroy you. You will be thrown into hellfire for eternity. And
because I am very jealous," the God says, "don't worship anybody else. I cannot tolerate
it."
Who created such a God? It must be out of our own jealousy, out of our own anger, that
we have created this image.
A Jew who has a long run of bad luck goes out into the woods and lifts his voice in
prayer and recrimination. "Oh, God," he asks heaven tearfully, "haven't I always been a
good Jew? Haven't I always given charity, even to those damn goyim? Didn't I bring up
my family decent? Never drink, swear, gamble; no bad women, nothing! Why do you
do this to me God? Why? Why?"
A dark cloud suddenly appears overhead, and a tremendous voice replies, "You piss me
off!"
The God certainly cannot be different from you. It is your projection, it is your shadow.
It echoes you and nobody else. That's why there are so many gods in the world. The
Hindus have a certain idea about God -- the Hindu idea -- it reflects the Hindu mind.
If you go back into Hindu scriptures you will be surprised. You will not be able to
believe what kind of gods Hindus have created -- very sexual. Adultery is very common
amongst Hindu gods, and not only do they play their games of adultery in the Hindu
paradise, they can't even leave the earth alone; they come to the earth too, to rape
women, to seduce simple women. They don't even leave the wives of the great seers
alone. And because they have infinite power they can even appear as the husbands,
they can look like the husbands. And the women have no idea who is hiding behind the
facade.
Who has created these gods? -- it must have been deep down a very sexual mind.
And the same is the case with all other gods of all other religions. It is because of this
that Buddha never talked about God. He said: What is the point of talking about God to
people who are asleep? They will listen in their sleep. They will dream about
whatsoever is said to them, and they will create their own gods -- which will be utterly
false, utterly impotent, utterly meaningless. It is better not to have such gods.
That's why Buddha is not interested in talking about gods. His whole interest is in
waking you up.It is said about a Buddhist enlightened master who was sitting by the side of the river
one evening, enjoying the sound of the water, the sound of the wind passing through
the trees.... A man came and asked him, "Can you tell me in a single word the essence of
your religion?"
The master remained silent, utterly silent, as if he had not heard the question. The
questioner said, "Are you deaf or something?"
The master said, "I have heard your question, and I have answered it too! Silence is the
answer. I remained silent -- that pause, that interval, was my answer."
The man said, "I cannot understand such a mysterious answer. Can't you be a little
more clear?"
So the master wrote on the sand "meditation," in small letters with his finger. The man
said, "I can read now. It is a little better than at first. At least I have got a word to
ponder over. But can't you make it a little more clear?"
The master wrote again "MEDITATION." Of course this time he wrote in bigger letters.
The man was feeling a little embarrassed, puzzled, offended, angry. He said, "Again
you write meditation? Can't you be a little clear for me?"
And the master wrote in very big letters, capital letters, "M E D I T A T I O N."
The man said, "You seem to be mad."
The master said, "I have already come down very much. The first answer was the right
answer, the second was not so right, the third even more wrong, the fourth has gone
very wrong" -- because when you write "MEDITATION" with capital letters you have
made a god out of it.
That's why the word 'God' is written with capital 'G'. Whenever you want to make
something supreme, ultimate, you write it with a capital letter.
The master said, "I have already committed a sin." He erased all those words he had
written, and he said, "Please listen to my first answer -- only then I am true."
Silence is the space in which one awakens, and the noisy mind is the space in which one
remains asleep. If your mind continues chattering, you are asleep. Sitting silently, if the
mind disappears and you can hear the chattering birds and no mind inside, a
silence...this whistle of the bird, the chirping, and no mind functioning in your head,
utter silence...then awareness wells up in you. It does not come from the outside, it
arises in you, it grows in you. Otherwise remember: you are asleep.
A husband and wife were asleep. About 3 AM the wife dreamt of secretly meeting
another man. Then she dreamt she saw her husband coming.
In her sleep she shrieked, "Heavens, my husband!"
Her husband, waking suddenly, leapt out of the window.
And remember, it is not a laughing matter; it is the reality, it is how you are living. It is
how man exists in his ordinary state.A wife tries to win back her husband's love, on the advice of a woman friend, by
bringing him his slippers and pipe when he comes home late one night, giving him a
tall drink, cuddling up in his lap dressed only in a silk dressing gown, and ending with
the murmured offer, "Let's go upstairs, darling!"
"I might as well," says her bemused husband, "I'll get hell when I get home anyway!"
We go on living absolutely inattentive to what is happening around us. Yes, we have
become very efficient in doing things. What we are doing, we have become so efficient
in doing that we don't need any awareness to do it. It has become mechanical,
automatic. We function like robots. We are not men yet; we are machines.
That's what George Gurdjieff used to say again and again, that man as he exists is a
machine. He offended many people, because nobody likes to be called a machine.
Machines like to be called gods; then they feel very happy, puffed up. Gurdjieff used to
call people machines, and he was right. If you watch yourself you will know how
mechanically you behave.
The Russian psychologist Pavlov, and the American psychologist Skinner, are ninety-
nine point nine percent right about man: they believe that man is a beautiful machine,
that's all. There is no soul in him. I say ninety-nine point nine percent they are right;
they only miss by a very small margin. In that small margin are the buddhas, the
awakened ones. But they can be forgiven, because Pavlov never came across a buddha -
- he came across millions of people like you.
Skinner has been studying men and rats and finds no difference. Rats are simple beings,
that's all; man is a little more complicated. Man is a highly sophisticated machine, rats
are simple machines. It is easier to study rats; that's why psychologists go on studying
rats. They study rats and they conclude about man -- and their conclusions are almost
right. I say "almost," mind you, because that point one percent is the most important
phenomenon that has happened: a Buddha, a Jesus, a Mohammed. These few
awakened people are the real men, but where can B.F. Skinner find a buddha? Certainly
not in America.
I have heard:
A man asked a rabbi, "Why didn't Jesus choose to be born in twentieth-century
America?"
The rabbi shrugged his shoulders and said, "In America? It would have been
impossible. Where can you find a virgin, firstly? And secondly, where will you find
three wise men?"
And without a virgin mother and three wise men, how can Jesus be born?
I have heard:
In a church, the priest asked the audience, "Please stand up, all the women who are
virgins!"Just one woman with a small baby girl stood up. Certainly she was a mother, and the
priest said, "Do you think yourself to be a virgin? You are a mother!"
She said, "Yes, I am -- but this girl is a virgin, and she cannot stand on her own."
Where is B.F. Skinner going to find a buddha? And even if he can find a buddha, his
preconceived prejudices, ideas, will not allow him to see. He will go on seeing his rats.
He cannot understand anything that rats cannot do. Now, rats don't meditate, rats don't
become enlightened. And his conception of man is only a magnified form of a rat. And
still I say that he is right about the greater majority of people; his conclusions are not
wrong. And buddhas will agree with him about the so-called normal humanity: the
normal humanity is utterly asleep. Even animals are not so asleep.
Have you seen a deer in the jungle -- how alert he looks, how watchfully he walks?
Have you seen a bird sitting on the tree -- how intelligently he goes on watching what is
happening all around? You move towards the bird -- there is a certain space he allows;
beyond that, one step more, and he flies away. He has a certain alertness about his
territory. If somebody enters into that territory then it is dangerous.
If you look around you will be surprised: man seems to be the most asleep animal on
the earth.
A woman buys a parrot at an auction of the furnishings of a fancy whorehouse, and
keeps the parrot's cage covered for two weeks to make it forget its profane vocabulary.
When the cage is finally uncovered, the parrot looks around and remarks, "Awrrk! New
house. New madam." When the woman's daughters come in, he adds, "Awrrk! New
girls."
When her husband comes home that night, the parrot says, "Awrrk! Awrrk! Same old
customers. Hello, Joe!"
Man is in a very fallen state. In fact, that is the meaning of the Christian parable of the
fall of Adam, his expulsion. But why were Adam and Eve expelled from paradise? They
were expelled because they had eaten the fruit of knowledge. They were expelled
because they had become minds, and they had lost their consciousness. If you become a
mind you lose consciousness -- mind means sleep, mind means noise, mind means
mechanicalness.
If you become a mind you lose consciousness. Hence, the whole work that has to be
done is: how to become consciousness again and lose the mind. You have to throw out
of your system all that you have gathered as knowledge. It is knowledge that keeps you
asleep; hence, the more knowledgeable a person is, the more asleep.
That has been my own observation too. Innocent villagers are far more alert and awake
than the professors in the universities and the pundits in the temples. The pundits are
nothing but parrots; the academicians in the universities are full of nothing but holy
cow dung, full of absolutely meaningless noise -- just minds and no consciousness.
People who work with nature -- farmers, gardeners, woodcutters, carpenters, painters --
they are far more alert than the people that function in the universities as deans andvice-chancellors and chancellors. Because when you work with nature, nature is alert,
trees are alert; their form of alertness is certainly different, but they are very alert.
Now there are scientific proofs of their alertness. If the woodcutter comes with an axe in
his hand and with the deliberate desire to cut the tree, all the trees that see him coming
tremble. Now there are scientific proofs about it; I am not talking poetry, I am talking
science when I say this. Now there are instruments to measure whether the tree is
happy or unhappy, afraid or unafraid, sad or ecstatic. When the woodcutter comes, all
the trees that see him start trembling. They become aware that death is close by. And
the woodcutter has not cut any tree yet -- just his coming....
And one thing more, far more strange: if the woodcutter is simply passing by there with
no deliberate idea to cut a tree, then no tree becomes afraid. It is the same woodcutter,
with the same axe. It seems that his intention to cut a tree affects the trees. It means that
his intention is being understood; it means the very vibe is being decoded by the trees.
And one more significant fact has been observed scientifically: that if you go into the
forest and kill an animal, it is not only the animal kingdom around that becomes
shaken, but trees also. If you kill a deer, all the deer that are around feel the vibe of
murder, become sad; a great trembling arises in them. Suddenly they are afraid for no
particular reason at all. They may not have seen the deer being killed, but somehow, in
a subtle way, they are affected -- instinctively, intuitively. But it is not only the deer
which are affected -- the trees are affected, the parrots are affected, the tigers are
affected, the eagles are affected, the grass leaves are affected. Murder has happened,
destruction has happened, death has happened -- everything that is around is affected.
Man seems to be the most asleep....
These sutras of Buddha have to be meditated on deeply, imbibed, followed.
WAKEFULNESS IS THE WAY TO LIFE.
You are alive only in the proportion that you are aware. Awareness is the difference
between death and life. You are not alive just because you are breathing, you are not
alive just because your heart is beating. Physiologically you can be kept alive in a
hospital, without any consciousness. Your heart will go on beating and you will be able
to breathe. You can be kept in such a mechanical arrangement that you will remain
alive for years -- in the sense of breathing and the heart beating and the blood
circulating. There are now many people around the world in advanced countries who
are just vegetating in the hospitals, because advanced technology has made it possible
for your death to be postponed indefinitely -- for years, for centuries, you can be kept
alive. If this is life, then you can be kept alive. But this is not life at all. Just to vegetate is
not life.
Buddhas have a different definition. Their definition consists of awareness. They don't
say you are alive because you can breathe, they don't say you are alive because your
blood circulates; they say you are alive if you are awake. So except for the awakenedones nobody is really alive. You are corpses -- walking, talking, doing things -- you are
robots.
WAKEFULNESS IS THE WAY TO LIFE, says Buddha. Become more wakeful and you
will become more alive. And life is God -- there is no other God. Hence Buddha talks
about life and awareness. Life is the goal and awareness is the methodology, the
technique to attain it.
THE FOOL SLEEPS....
And all are asleep, so all are foolish. Don't feel offended. The facts have to be stated as
they are. You function in sleep; that's why you go on stumbling, you go on doing things
you don't want to do. You go on doing things you have decided not to do. You go on
doing things you know are not right to do, and you don't do things which you know are
right.
How is this possible? Why can't you walk straight? Why do you go on getting trapped
into bypaths? Why do you go on going astray?
A young man with a fine voice is asked to take part in a pageant play, though he tries to
beg off, saying he always gets embarrassed under such circumstances. He is assured it
will be very simple, and he will have only one line to say: "I come to snatch a kiss, and
dart into the fray. Hark! I hear a pistol shot..." and then stride offstage.
At the performance he comes onstage, very embarrassed already by the tight-fitting
colonial knee-breeches he has been made to put on at the last moment, and becomes
completely unstrung at the sight of the beautiful heroine lying back on a garden seat,
awaiting him, in a white gown. He clears his throat and announces: "I come to kiss your
snatch -- no! -- snatch a kiss, and fart into the dray -- I mean, dart into the fray! Hark! -- I
hear a shistol pot -- no! -- a shostil pit, a pistil shit. Oh, bat shit, rat shit, shit on you all! I
never wanted to be in this damned play anyhow!"
This is what is happening. Watch your life: everything that you go on doing is so
confused and so confusing. You don't have any clarity, you don't have any
perceptiveness. You are not alert. You can't see! You can't hear! Certainly, you have ears
so you can hear, but there is nobody inside to understand it. Certainly you have eyes so
you can see, but there is nobody present inside. So your eyes go on seeing and your ears
go on listening, but nothing is understood.
If you really had eyes you would see God everywhere. And if you could hear you
would hear the celestial music, you would hear the harmony of existence.
And on each step you stumble, on each step you commit something wrong. And still
you go on believing that you are aware. Drop that idea completely. Dropping it is a
great leap, a great step, because once you drop the idea that "I am aware" you will start
seeking and searching for ways and means to be aware. So the first thing to sink into
you is that you are asleep, utterly asleep.Modern psychology has discovered a few things which are significant; although they
have been discovered only intellectually, still it is a good beginning. If intellectually
they have been discovered, then sooner or later existentially also they will be
experienced.
Freud is a great pioneer; of course, not a buddha, but still a man of great significance,
because he was the first to make the idea accepted by the larger part of humanity that
man has a great unconscious hidden in him. The conscious mind is only one tenth, and
the unconscious mind is nine times bigger than the conscious.
Then his disciple, Jung, went a little further, a little deeper, and discovered the
collective unconscious. Behind the individual unconscious there is a collective
unconscious. Now somebody is needed to discover one thing more which is there, and I
hope.... Sooner or later the psychological investigations that are going on, on both sides
of the Iron Curtain, are bound to discover it -- the cosmic unconscious. Buddhas have
talked about it.
So we can say: the conscious mind, a very fragile thing, a very small part of your being.
Behind the conscious is the subconscious mind -- vague. You can hear its whispering
but you cannot figure it out. It is always there, behind the conscious, pulling its strings.
Third: the unconscious mind which you come across only in dreams or when you take
drugs. Then, the collective unconscious mind. You come across it only when you go
into a very deep inquiry into your unconscious mind; then you come across the
collective unconscious. And if you go still further, deeper, you will come to the cosmic
unconscious.
The cosmic unconscious is nature. The collective unconscious is the whole of humanity
that has lived up to now, it is part of you. The unconscious is your individual
unconscious that the society has repressed in you, that has not been allowed expression.
Hence it comes by the back door in the night, in your dreams. And the conscious
mind...I will call it the so-called conscious mind because it is only so-called. It is so tiny,
just a flicker, but even if it is just a flicker it is important because it has the seed; the
seeds are always small. It has great potential.
Now a totally new dimension is opening up. Just as Freud opened the dimension below
the conscious, Sri Aurobindo opened the dimension above the conscious. Freud and Sri
Aurobindo are the two most important people of this age. Both are intellectuals, neither
of them is an awakened person, but both have done a great service to humanity.
Intellectually they have made us aware that we are not so small as we appear from the
surface, that the surface is hiding great depths and heights.
Freud went into the depths, Sri Aurobindo tried to penetrate into the heights. Above
our so-called conscious mind is the real conscious mind; that is attained only through
meditation. When your ordinary conscious mind is added to meditation, when the
ordinary conscious mind is plus meditation, it becomes the real conscious mind.
Beyond the real conscious mind is the superconscious mind.
When you are meditating you have only glimpses. Meditation is a groping in the dark.
Yes, a few windows open up, but you fall back again and again. Superconscious mind
means samadhi -- you have attained a crystal-clear perceptiveness, you have attained anintegrated awareness. Now you cannot fall below it; it is yours. Even in sleep it will
remain with you.
Beyond the superconscious is the collective superconscious; the collective
superconscious is what is known as "gods" in religions. And beyond the collective
superconscious is the cosmic superconscious which even goes beyond gods. Buddha
calls it nirvana, Mahavira calls it kaivalya, Hindu mystics have called it moksha; you
can call it the truth.
These are the nine states of your being, and you are just living in a small corner of your
being -- the tiny conscious mind; as if somebody has a palace and has completely
forgotten about the palace and has started living on the porch -- and thinks this is all.
Freud and Sri Aurobindo are both great intellectual giants, pioneers, philosophers, but
both are doing great guesswork. Instead of teaching students the philosophy of
Bertrand Russell, Alfred North Whitehead, Martin Heidegger, Jean-Paul Sartre, it
would be far better if people were taught more about Sri Aurobindo, because he is the
greatest philosopher of this age. But he is completely neglected, ignored by the
academic world -- for a certain reason.
The reason is, even to read Sri Aurobindo will make you feel that you are unaware; and
he himself is not a buddha yet, but still he will create a very embarrassing situation for
you. If he is right, then what are you doing? Then why are you not exploring the
heights of your being?
Freud was accepted with great resistance, but finally he was accepted. Sri Aurobindo is
not even accepted yet. In fact there is not even any opposition to him; he is simply
ignored. And the reason is clear. Freud talks about something below you -- that is not so
embarrassing; you can feel good knowing that you are conscious, and below your
consciousness there is subconsciousness and unconsciousness and collective
unconsciousness. But those states are all below you; you are at the top, you can feel very
good. But if you study Sri Aurobindo, you will feel embarrassed, offended, because
there are higher states than you -- and man's ego never wants to accept that there is
anything higher than him. Man wants to believe that he is the highest pinnacle, the
climax, the Gourishankar, the Everest -- that there is nothing higher than him....
That's why the modern man wants to deny God, because to accept God means you have
to accept something higher than you. And the modern ego is so puffed up that the
modern mind says there is no God and there is no beyond and there is no afterlife. And
it feels very good -- denying your own kingdom, denying your own heights, you feel
very good. Look at the foolishness of it.
Buddha is right. He says:
THE FOOL SLEEPS
AS IF HE WERE ALREADY DEAD,
BUT THE MASTER IS AWAKE
AND HE LIVES FOREVER.Awareness is eternal, it knows no death. Only unawareness dies. So if you remain
unconscious, asleep, you will have to die again. If you want to get rid of this whole
misery of being born and dying again and again, if you want to get rid of the wheel of
birth and death, you will have to become absolutely alert. You will have to reach higher
and higher into consciousness.
And these things are not to be accepted on intellectual grounds; these things have to
become experiential, these things have to become existential. I am not telling you to be
convinced philosophically, because philosophical conviction brings nothing, no harvest.
The real harvest comes only when you make great effort to wake yourself up.
But these intellectual maps can create a desire, a longing in you; can make you aware of
the potential, of the possible; can make you aware that you are not what you appear to
be -- you are far more.
THE FOOL SLEEPS AS IF HE WERE ALREADY DEAD, BUT THE MASTER IS
AWAKE AND HE LIVES FOREVER.
HE WATCHES.
HE IS CLEAR.
Simple and beautiful statements. Truth is always simple and always beautiful. Just to
see the simplicity of these two statements...but how much they contain -- worlds within
worlds, infinite worlds. HE WATCHES. HE IS CLEAR.
The only thing that has to be learned is watchfulness. Watch! Watch every act that you
do. Watch every thought that passes in your mind. Watch every desire that takes
possession of you. Watch even small gestures -- walking, talking, eating, taking a bath.
Go on watching everything. Let everything become an opportunity to watch.
Don't eat mechanically, don't just go on stuffing yourself -- be very watchful. Chew well
and watchfully...and you will be surprised how much you have been missing up to
now, because each bite will give you tremendous satisfaction; if you eat watchfully, it
will become more tasteful. Even ordinary food tastes if you are watchful; and if you are
not watchful, you can eat the most tasteful food but there will be no taste in it, because
there is nobody to watch. You simply go on stuffing yourself.
Eat slowly, watchfully; each bite has to be chewed, tasted. Smell, touch, feel the breeze
and the sunrays. Look at the moon and become just a silent pool of watchfulness, and
the moon will be reflected in you with tremendous beauty. Move in life remaining
continuously watchful.
Again and again you will forget. Don't become miserable because of that; it is natural.
For millions of lives you have never tried watchfulness, so it is simple, natural, that you
go on forgetting again and again. But the moment you remember, again watch.
Remember one thing: when you remember that you have forgotten watching, don't
become repentful, don't repent; otherwise, again you are wasting time. Don't feel
miserable: "I missed again." Don't start feeling, "I am a sinner." Don't start condemning
yourself, because this is a sheer waste of time. Never repent for the past! Live in themoment. If you had forgotten, so what? It was natural -- it has become a habit, and
habits die hard. And these are not habits imbibed in one life; these are habits imbibed in
millions of lives. So if you can remain watchful even for a few moments, feel thankful to
God -- feel thankful. Even those few moments are more than expected.
HE WATCHES. HE IS CLEAR.
And when you watch, a clarity arises. Why does clarity arise out of watchfulness?
Because the more watchful you become, the more all your hastiness slows down. You
become more graceful. As you watch, your chattering mind chatters less, because the
energy that was becoming chattering is turning and becoming watchfulness -- it is the
same energy! Now more and more energy will be transformed into watchfulness and
the mind will not get its nourishment. Thoughts will start becoming thinner, they will
start losing weight. Slowly slowly, they will start dying. And as thoughts start dying,
clarity arises. Now your mind becomes a mirror.
HOW HAPPY HE IS! And when one is clear, one is blissful. It is confusion that is the
root cause of misery; it is clarity that is the foundation of blissfulness.
HOW HAPPY HE IS!
FOR HE SEES THAT WAKEFULNESS IS LIFE.
And now he knows there is no death, because wakefulness can never be destroyed.
When death comes, you will watch it too. You will die watching; watching will not die.
Your body will disappear, dust unto dust, but your watchfulness will remain; it will
become part of the cosmic whole. It will become cosmic consciousness.
In these moments the seers of the Upanishads declare, "Aham brahmasmi! -- I am the
cosmic consciousness!" It is in such spaces that al-Hillaj Mansoor announced, "Ana'l
haq! -- I am the truth!"
These are the heights which are your birthright. If you are not getting them, only you
are responsible and nobody else.
HOW HAPPY HE IS! FOR HE SEES THAT WAKEFULNESS IS LIFE.
HOW HAPPY HE IS,
FOLLOWING THE PATH OF THE AWAKENED.
WITH GREAT PERSEVERANCE
HE MEDITATES, SEEKING
FREEDOM AND HAPPINESS.
Listen to these words very attentively: WITH GREAT PERSEVERANCE.... Unless you
bring total effort to waking yourself up it is not going to happen. Partial efforts are
futile. You cannot be just so-so, you cannot be just lukewarm. It is not going to help.
Lukewarm water cannot evaporate, and lukewarm efforts to be alert are bound to fail.
Transformation happens only when you put your total energy into it. When you areboiling at a hundred degrees heat, then you evaporate, then the alchemical change
happens. Then you start rising up.
Have you not watched? -- water flows downwards, but vapor rises upwards. Exactly
the same happens: unconsciousness goes downwards, consciousness goes upwards.
And one thing more: upwards is synonymous with inwards, and downwards is
synonymous with outwards. Consciousness goes inwards, unconsciousness goes
outwards. Unconsciousness makes you interested in others -- things, people, but it is
always the others. Unconsciousness keeps you completely in darkness; your eyes go on
being focused on others. It creates a kind of exteriority, it makes you extroverts.
Consciousness creates interiority, it makes you introverts; it takes you inward, deeper
and deeper.
And deeper and deeper also means higher and higher; they grow simultaneously, just
as a tree grows. You only see it going upwards, you don't see the roots going
downwards. But first the roots have to go downwards, only then can the tree go
upwards. If a tree wants to reach the sky, then it will have to send roots to the very
bottom, to the lowest depths possible. The tree grows simultaneously in both directions.
In exactly the same way consciousness grows upwards...downwards, it sends its roots
into your being.
I talked about nine states of consciousness. Your branches of consciousness will go
upwards, from conscious -- so-called conscious -- to real conscious, from real conscious
to superconscious, from superconscious to collective conscious, from collective
conscious to cosmic conscious. And your roots will be growing from so-called conscious
to subconscious, from subconscious to unconscious, from unconscious to collective
unconscious, from collective unconscious to cosmic unconscious. The moment your
roots reach nature, your flowers start blooming in God. Hence nature and God are not
divided -- in the awakened one they are bridged.
The really awakened one is not against nature, cannot be; he is all for nature. In fact, he
helps you to go both ways -- on one side into nature, on the other side into God. That's
my effort here. I would like you to be natural, so natural that your roots go to the
deepest core of your being -- because that is the only way to help you grow upwards.
Roots have to be strongly in the soil, so strong that they can support a high-rising cedar
of Lebanon. If it has to go hundreds of feet upwards, it will need great roots. Because of
this I am being misunderstood all over this country particularly, and all over the world
in general.
Roots have to reach to the sex energy, because that is the lowest, the bottom in you; only
then can your flowers bloom in superconsciousness, in samadhi. The lotus can bloom
only if it is rooted in the mud deep down in the lake. This is possible only with great
perseverance. Man as he is is very lazy; because he is asleep he is lazy.
This story is of a husband and wife who agree that whoever speaks first will have to
close the street door which has accidentally been left open. Robbers find the open door,
enter, and seeing the silent couple making no move, eat the food on the table, take all
the valuables, and finally rape the wife, and propose to shave off the husband's beard."Alright," the husband cries at that point, "I'll close the goddamn door!"
People are really lazy, utterly lazy. Laziness is part of sleep. Hence, perseverance, effort,
continuous effort, constant effort, will be needed. You will fall back again and again.
You are in the state of a drunkard; hence falling backward is forgivable. But the
moment you recognize, whenever a ray of light happens and you remember, put your
total energy into it again. Don't remain a fool, don't remain asleep, don't remain a
drunkard.
There were these three drunkards walking down the street. One was carrying a loaf of
bread, the other a jug of wine and the third a car door. As they were walking along, a
policeman stopped them and asked, "Where are you going?"
"On a picnic," replied the man with the bread.
"On a picnic?" said the cop. "The bread I can understand -- you can eat it when you get
hungry; the wine you can drink when you get thirsty. But why the car door? -- that I
can't understand."
"Well," said the man with the door, "if it gets too cold I can roll up the window."
You will have to come out of many layers of drunkenness. Greed is a state of
drunkenness, and everybody is greedy -- greedy for more. Mind continuously asks for
more and more, and the demand is never-ending. If you are after money, more money.
If you are after political power, more power. If you are after prestige, more prestige. If
you are interested in becoming humble, then more humbleness, because you have to be
the most humble man in the world. If you are after renunciation, then more and more
renunciation. There is never any end to this constant demand of the mind -- more....
Greed is a drunkenness, it is a sleep. So is anger. Have you not observed that in anger
you can do things which you cannot do ordinarily? You say things for which you
repent later on. And you cannot believe later on that you uttered such nonsense, that
you are capable of uttering such nonsense. What happens when you are angry? You are
in a state of drunkenness.
Become more watchful and anger will be less and greed will be less and jealousy will be
less.
I don't say to you: Don't be angry, because that's what has been said to you down the
ages. Your so-called saints have been telling you, "Don't be angry!" so you have learned
ways of repressing anger. But the more you repress anger, the bigger the unconscious
you are creating in yourself. You are throwing things into the basement, and then you
will be afraid to enter into the basement, because all these things -- anger and greed and
sex -- are there. You know! You have been throwing them there. All kinds of rubbish are
there, and dangerous, poisonous. You will not be ready to go in.
That's why people don't want to go in, because going in means encountering all these
things. And nobody wants to encounter these things; one wants to avoid them. For
thousands of years you have been told to repress, and because of repression you have
become more and more unconscious. I cannot say to you repress. I would like to say toyou just the opposite: don't repress -- watch, be alert. When anger arises, sit down in
your room, close your doors and watch it.
You know only two ways: either to be angry, be violent, destructive, or to repress it.
You don't know the third way, and the third way is the way of the buddhas: neither
indulge nor repress -- watch. Indulgence creates habit. If you become angry today and
again tomorrow, and the day after tomorrow again, you are creating a habit; you are
conditioning yourself to be more and more angry.
So indulgence cannot take you out of it. That's where the modern growth movement is
stuck. Encounter groups, primal therapy, gestalt, bioenergetics...and so many beautiful
things are happening in the world, but they are stuck at a certain point. Their problem
is: they teach expression -- and it is good, it is far better than repression. If there is only
this choice, repress or express, then I would suggest express. But this is not the real
choice; there is a third alternative far more important than both these. If you express,
you become habitual; you learn by doing it again and again -- you can't get out of it.
In this commune there are at least fifty therapy groups running, for a certain reason. It
is just to balance the thousands of years of repression; it is just to balance. It is just to
bring to light all that you have repressed as Christians, Hindus, Mohammedans, Jainas,
Buddhists. It is just to undo the centuries' old harm that has been done to you.
But remember, these groups are not the end; they only prepare you for meditation.
They are not the goal; they are just simple means to undo the wrong of the past. Once
you have thrown out of your system all that you have been repressing all along, I have
to lead you into watchfulness. Now it will be easier to watch.
But you are not to become a group-addicted person, you are not to become a groupie.
There are people now in the world who are group-addicted; they go from one group to
another. One encounter finishes -- then another marathon, then gestalt, then this and
that.... After just a few days the itch arises -- because where to express? In the normal
society they cannot express, they have to repress.
So the group becomes just an outlet. The normal society forces you to repress, the group
helps you to express but you are not really growing. Again you will be back in the
normal society, again repressing. And if you express in the normal society, you will be
getting into far more dangerous situations. You may murder somebody -- you have so
much anger. You will be in jail, imprisoned forever. Or if you go on fighting with
everybody -- if you slap the boss in the office, if you beat your wife, your children, your
husband -- then your whole life will become a chaos, it will be impossible to live it. So
after a few days of accumulation you need another encounter. A few days of
encountering and you feel unburdened; back in society you will be burdened again.
This is not going to help. This is a temporary relief. You can scream to your heart's
desire in a primal therapy group, but if you start screaming on the road, then you will
be taken to the police station. You can scream in a group context -- it is allowed, helped,
provoked; you are persuaded to scream, because since your childhood you have been
repressing it. It has become a wound; it needs to be opened. If the pus oozes out and the
wound is left open to the winds and to the sun and to the rain, it will heal itself, because
you have a healing energy; it is inbuilt. But back in the society again...how long can youremain in a primal therapy group? Back in the same old society again, you will have to
repress; you cannot go on screaming there.
Then the scream gathers, then the steam gathers. Then one day you have to go into the
group again. This is a temporary relief; good as far as it goes, but it cannot make you a
buddha. That's where this commune is different from institutes like Esalen. They end
with groups -- we begin with groups. Where they end, that's exactly the point from
where we begin.
And it is not a coincidence that thousands of therapists have become interested in my
work. They have come here.... Among my sannyasins, the greatest group from any
profession is that of psychotherapists. A great need is felt now all over the world that
encounter, primal therapy, gestalt, can help a little bit to unburden people, but they
cannot help to make them buddhas -- they cannot help them to become awakened.
Indulgence creates habit, repression gathers the poison within. In indulgence you throw
the poison on others, but they are not going to remain silent -- they will throw it back. It
becomes a match: you throw your anger on others, they throw their anger on you -- but
nobody is helped, everybody is harmed and hurt.
And if you repress.... Because of this futility of indulgence, priests invented repression.
It keeps you out of danger. Repression keeps you a good citizen, a gentleman. It keeps
you out of the dangers of getting caught by the law, getting caught into enmity; it keeps
you smooth. Repression helps you to become a better social person, that's true. But it
makes you a wound inside, just a wound, and the pus goes on gathering inside. Outside
it functions as a lubricating agent, but inside you become more and more mad.
If this society and this century are the maddest in the whole history, the credit goes to
the past. Five thousand years of saintly advice to people -- the credit goes to those
saints. If people are becoming mad, if people are becoming insane, if people are
committing suicide, if people are becoming murderous, the credit certainly goes to all
your so-called saints, priests, preachers, leaders. They are responsible for it.
Just the other day I was telling you the Canadian government wants to investigate,
make a deep investigation of this commune because one American citizen who was a
sannyasin has committed suicide, and another American who was a sannyasin has gone
mad too. Now, I wonder: the person who has committed suicide was sixty years old. He
has been a Christian for sixty years, but Christianity is not investigated. And he has
been a sannyasin for not even sixty days! The credit goes to Christianity, not to me.
The man who went mad was a Protestant. Now, I am condemned because he was a
sannyasin, but the Protestant church is not condemned. And he was brought up as a
Protestant, he lived as a Protestant for thirty-five years, and for just a few days he was a
sannyasin. Now, American society is not condemned.
This is strange logic...and I am trying to help people. When he had come here, he was
already mad. He has come here after six years of psychoanalysis; because
psychoanalysis could not help him he had come here and became a sannyasin. Because
the Protestant church and the priests could not help him, he had come here and become
a sannyasin. But they had done such a good job that it was difficult to bring him back
down to earth.And he did not remain here for long; he was here for only three weeks. Now, the credit
cannot go to me. If he becomes mad, I cannot be held responsible. But this strange logic
is there.
Here, also, the same logic continues. If a sannyasin misbehaves, I am condemned. But
so many Hindus are put in jail every day -- Hinduism is not condemned. So many
Mohammedans misbehave, but Mohammedanism is not condemned. If a Sikh murders
somebody, Sikhism is not condemned. This is a very stupid and absurd world.
People come to me for help. Many are helped. Ninety-nine percent of people are helped.
But the one percent has been damaged so much that it is almost impossible to help
them. They can also be helped, but I am not allowed to help them.
For example, an exhibitionist comes here who once in a while exposes himself naked.
Now, he can be helped, easily helped -- if he is allowed to move naked. He is not
dangerous; he is not doing any harm to anybody. He simply has this eccentric idea...he
enjoys it to shock you. This is the way of shocking you, this is the way of gaining
attention: he exposes himself naked. If he is simply allowed to move naked and nobody
pays any attention to him, he will be cured.
The cure is simple, very simple! Don't be shocked, and don't pay attention. It is to shock
you and to get your attention that he is an exhibitionist. If nobody pays any attention, if
he comes naked to you and you talk to him as if he is not naked, he will be puzzled. He
will not be able to believe what is happening. He will go and look in the mirror to see
whether he is naked or not! And what is the point? If nobody pays any attention and
nobody is shocked, he may try wearing clothes -- maybe these are strange people and
they can be shocked by wearing clothes!
People can be helped, but the society does not allow me to help them. Even that one
percent can be cured, because nobody is really incurable. But time will be needed,
perseverance will be needed.
Buddha says: WITH GREAT PERSEVERANCE HE MEDITATES, SEEKING FREEDOM
AND HAPPINESS.
Meditate -- meditation means watchfulness -- and you will attain to freedom and bliss.
SO AWAKE, REFLECT, WATCH.
WORK WITH CARE AND ATTENTION.
LIVE IN THE WAY
AND THE LIGHT WILL GROW IN YOU.
The light grows of its own accord. You simply become more silent, more watchful,
more meditative, and the light descends in you -- of its own accord. You need not go
anywhere.
BY WATCHING AND WORKING
THE MASTER MAKES FOR HIMSELF AN ISLAND
WHICH THE FLOOD CANNOT OVERWHELM.Your watchfulness becomes an island, a citadel, which no passion, no lust, no greed, no
anger, can possess. With that island, for the first time you become an integrated
individual. For the first time you become a human being.
This human being is absolutely needed today, this new human being -- homo novus.
Enough for today.The Dhammapada: The Way of the Buddha, Vol 1
Chapter #6
Chapter title: Through a glass darkly
26 June 1979 am in Buddha Hall
The first question:
Question 1
BELOVED MASTER,
I FEEL LIKE I KNOW THE ANSWERS. WHY DO I STILL ALLOW THE QUESTIONS
TO BECOME PROBLEMS?
Savita, there are not answers, there is only the answer. And that answer is not of the
mind, that answer cannot be of the mind. Mind is a multiplicity. Mind has answers and
answers, but not the answer.
That answer is a state of no-mind. It is not verbal. You can know it but you cannot
reduce it to knowledge. You can know it, but you cannot say it. It is known in the
innermost recesses of your being. It is light that simply illuminates your interiority.
It is not an answer to any particular question. It is the end of all questioning, it refers to
no question at all. It simply dissolves all the questions and a state is left without any
question...that's the answer. Unless that is known, nothing is known.
Hence, you may feel that you know the answers, but still questions will go on popping
up, still questions will go on torturing you. Still questions are bound to arise because
the root is not cut yet. New leaves will be sprouting, new branches will be arising.
The root is cut only when you disconnect yourself from the mind, when you become so
aware, so watchful that you can see the mind as separate from you. When all identity
with the mind is dropped, when you are a watcher on the hills and the mind is left deep
down in the darkness of the valleys, when you are on the sunlit peaks, just a pure
witness, seeing, watching, but not getting identified with anything -- good or bad,
sinner or saint, this or that -- in that witnessing all questions dissolve. The mind melts,
evaporates. You are left as a pure being, just a pure existence -- a breathing, a beating of
the heart, utterly in the moment, no past, no future, hence no present either.
Unless that state arrives you will feel many times that you know the answers, but each
answer will only create new questions. Each answer will trigger new chains of
questions in you. You can read, you can study, you can think, but you will get more and
more in the mire of the mind, more entangled, more entrapped. Slip out of the mind!
Hence, I am not giving you answers, I am trying to point out the answer. You cannot
use the plural for it because it is one. It is a state of utter silence, peace, no-thought.
Buddha calls it right mindfulness -- sammasati. And he says that those who are rightly
mindful, alert, aware, the truth comes to them of its own accord. You need not go
anywhere, it comes. You need not even seek and search, because how can you seek and
search? Out of your ignorance, whatsoever you do will bring more ignorance. Out ofyour ignorance, wherever you go you will go astray. Out of your confusion, how can
you find clarity? Out of your confusion you will become more and more confused -- in
search of clarity.
Hence Buddha says: The master watches, the master is clear. Aes dhammo sanantano --
this is the law, the ultimate, eternal, inexhaustible law.
To be silent is to have the answer. To be silent is to be without questions...and the root is
cut, then no leaves arrive anymore.
Savita, you say, "I feel like I know the answers."
That is only an illusion. And the mind is very clever in creating new illusions. The mind
is very deceptive: it can deceive you in knowledge too. It can deceive you in everything!
It can even make you believe that you are enlightened, that you are a buddha already.
Beware! The only enemy is the mind; there is no other enemy.
The old scriptures talk about the mind. They have a special name for it -- they call it the
Devil. The Devil is not somebody outside you; it is your own mind that goes on
tempting you, that goes on cheating you, deceiving you, that goes on creating new
illusions in you. Beware, watch the mind! And in watching, questions disappear -- not
that they are answered, let me repeat it again.
The buddha knows no answers -- not that he has come to the conclusion of all
questions, no, not at all. On the contrary, he has no questions anymore. Because he has
no questions anymore, his whole being has become the answer.
Savita, that moment is possible.
That's my whole work here. I am not here to give you more information; that you can
get anywhere. Thousands of universities exist, thousands of libraries exist. Information
you can get anywhere, you can become knowledgeable anywhere. My effort is to make
you unlearn whatsoever you have learned up to now, to make you innocent so that you
can start functioning from a state of not-knowing. So that you don't have any answers,
so that you act spontaneously, not out of the past and out of the conclusions already
arrived at. So that you don't have any ready-made formula for anything...so that you
are like a small child mirroring reality.
And when you are silent, no knowledge clamoring inside you, your perception is clear -
- no dust on the mirror...you reflect that which is. And out of that reflection whatever
action arises is virtue.
The second question:
Question 2
BELOVED MASTER,
YOU WANT US TO BE INDIVIDUALS, BUT DURING WORK IN THE ASHRAM WE
HAVE TO BE VERY DISCIPLINED. DISCIPLINE AND INDIVIDUALISM -- ARE
THEY NOT DIAMETRICALLY OPPOSITE?
Sudarshan, I would like you to be individuals, but not individualists. And there is a
great difference. The individualist is not an individual yet. The individualist who
believes in individualism is only an egoist. And to be an egoist is not to be anindividual. Just the contrary: the individual has no ego, and the ego has no
individuality.
The ego is such an ordinary phenomenon -- everybody has it! There is nothing special
about it, there is nothing unique about it. Everybody has the ego. It is so common! The
uncommon thing is egolessness.
Only an egoless consciousness attains to individuality. And by individuality I simply
mean the literal meaning of the word: individual means indivisible, individual means
integrated; individual means one who is not many, who is not a crowd, who is not
multipsychic; one who has attained to unity, one who has become a crystallized being.
Gurdjieff uses the word 'crystallization' for individuality. But the basic requirement for
crystallization is to drop the ego, because ego is a false entity. It won't allow you to be
real, it won't allow you to be authentically real. It won't allow you to grow. It is false, it
is a deception, it is an illusion. You are not separate from existence, but the ego goes on
pretending separation.
And the other word that you have used in the question also has to be understood:
discipline. Discipline does not mean anything imposed upon you. Nothing is imposed
in this commune. If you enter this commune it is at your own choice. The doors are
open -- you can leave any moment. In fact, entry is difficult and we make every possible
effort to help you to leave. Nobody is hindered from leaving, although every possible
effort is made to hinder you from entering. Entry is very difficult.
If you choose to become part of this commune it is your decision -- your readiness to
commit yourself, to be involved.
Out of this decision a discipline arises. You can choose to get out of the commune, but
once you are in the commune it means that you have taken a responsibility. And it is
only through responsibility that one grows. By fulfilling one's responsibility totally,
growth becomes possible.
There are a few people here, only a few, who go on trying to deceive the commune.
They are simply befooling themselves; nobody is befooled! They don't want to work,
they try to avoid it in every possible way. They find excuses, they even fall ill just to
avoid work. But this is so stupid! You have entered the commune to work upon
yourself. You have entered the commune to make a concentrated effort to become an
integrated individual. You have entered the commune for your spiritual growth, for
enlightenment. And if you avoid...and that seems to be the real question behind the
apparent question.
You say, Sudarshan, "Individualism and discipline -- are they not diametrically
opposite?"
They are not! An individual is always a disciplined phenomenon. One who is not
disciplined is not an individual; he is just a chaos, he is many fragments. All those
fragments are functioning separately, even in opposition to each other. That's how
people are ordinarily: one part of the mind going to the south, another part going to the
north; one part saying one thing, another part opposing it. You know it! I am simply
stating a fact -- you can observe it. One part says "Do this." Another part immediatelysays "No!" Something says "Yes," and something immediately destroys it by saying
"No."
This is your situation! You are an individual in such a situation, when you cannot even
say a total yes or a total no? Your no is always halfhearted and your yes too -- and you
think you are an individual?
An individual means one who can function as a totality, as an organic unity. How are
you going to become an organic unity? It can only be through conscious discipline.
That's what Buddha is saying again and again: perseverance, effort, a conscious,
deliberate effort to grow -- and total effort, not lukewarm. You have to boil at a hundred
degrees. Yes, sometimes it is painful, but it all depends on you, on how you interpret it.
If you really want to grow it is not painful -- it is tremendously pleasant. Each step
deeper into discipline brings more and more joy, because it gives you more and more
soul, being.
Discipline means readiness to learn; hence the word 'disciple', they come from the same
root. Who is a disciple? -- one who bows down, surrenders, and is ready to learn. And
what is discipline? -- the readiness, the openness, the vulnerability, to learn.
Entering into this commune you are entering into a buddhafield. It is a surrender, it is a
trust! I am here to make you individuals, but you will have to pass through many many
devices. Many fires you will have to pass through, many tests. Only then, slowly
slowly, will you be welded into one unity. And you have remained a multiplicity for so
long, for so many lives, that unless concentrated effort is made, unless you are attacked
from every nook and corner, unless your sleep is broken in every possible way, you are
shaken and shocked, the individual is not going to be born.
The work that is happening in the commune is not really what it appears from the
surface. It is something else -- it is a device! We have to use devices.
Somebody comes to me and wants to become part of the commune, and I say to him,
"Go to Deeksha." Deeksha is my device! I have given her total power -- and I have given
her total power because she is so loving, so soft, so caring. She wounds people, but she
heals also. By one hand she hammers, by the other she consoles. She is a device.
And when I say to you, "Go and work with Deeksha," and she shouts at you and in
every possible way she provokes you, it is discipline to watch -- not to act in your old
ways, as you have always acted. And she is so motherly that it is very simple to react to
her as you have been reacting to your own parents. It is very simple that she will create
a reaction in you that your mother creates in you. Mothers are intolerable creatures --
and Deeksha is a perfect mother!
I know, Sudarshan, it is difficult -- but growth is difficult. Many more devices are going
to be created. You will be sent to many dimensions. No corner of your being has to be
left undeveloped, otherwise you will become lopsided.
And the first principle of discipline is surrender. Apparently it looks contradictory,
because that's what you have been told: that if you surrender, then you are no longer an
individual. And I say to you, if you cannot surrender you are not an individual. Only an
individual can surrender. Surrender is such a great phenomenon, only a man of great
will can surrender. It is the ultimate in will. To drop your will is bound to be theultimate in will. To put yourself aside, absolutely aside, and to say to something such a
total yes -- which your mind resists, your old habits resist....
And sometimes you are right -- and that's where the whole beauty lies. You are right,
and still you have to surrender to something which does not appear at all right
logically.
Deeksha is crazy! You may be far more intellectual, far more rational -- but you have to
surrender to Deeksha. Her craziness is her quality -- that's why I have chosen her. I
have got many more rational people: I could have chosen a Ph.D. who would have
convinced you that he is right. But when you are convinced and you follow, it is not
surrender. When you are not convinced at all, you see the apparent stupidity of a
certain thing, and still you surrender, that is a great step, a great step of getting out of
your past.
This commune is a lab, this commune is an alchemical process. You come here as a
crowd and I have to weld you into unity. Much hammering is going to happen, and you
will come out of this whole process as pure individuals.
Discipline is the way to create individuality. But remember: to be an individual is not to
be an individualist. Individualism is an ego trip. And the people who believe in
individualism are not individuals, remember -- remember well. Deep down they know
they are not individuals, hence they create a facade of philosophy, of logic, of argument,
because deep down they don't feel they are individuals. They pretend on the outside
that they are individuals -- they believe in individualism. Believing in individualism is
not becoming an individual. Belief is always false.
When you are an individual you need not believe in individualism. When it is a truth of
your being, belief is not needed. Belief is needed only to cover things: you don't know
about God and you believe in God. The believer is an atheist. He may be a Christian, a
Hindu, a Mohammedan, a Buddhist, it doesn't matter: a believer is an atheist. He does
not know about God, and still he believes. That means he is even trying to deceive God!
He is a hypocrite, he is a parrot. Parrotlike he goes on repeating what the scriptures say,
what others say. And parrots can repeat beautifully, without understanding a thing,
without knowing a thing, mechanically.
A Negro walked into a pet store in Harlem, wanting to buy a good talking parrot. The
proprietor told him that they had a wide selection of parrots, so what sort did he want?
The Negro asked to see a fifty-dollar parrot. "Polly wanna cracker? Polly wanna
cracker?" he called as soon as the parrot appeared. The parrot said nothing.
"I wanna parrot that talks good," he said. "Show me a good one."
So the proprietor brought out a two-hundred-dollar parrot: "Polly wanna cracker? Polly
wanna cracker?" No answer.
"You gotta better parrot than this?" asked the Negro.
The proprietor said yes, and led the Negro behind the counter, to where the thousand-
dollar parrot, beautifully plumaged with sparkling beady eyes, clearly a very special
parrot, sat proudly in a luxurious cage."Polly wanna cracker? Polly wanna cracker?" came from the Negro, but the parrot
didn't even look up.
"Man, this your best parrot?" asked the Negro, "because I wanna a good talker and this
one looks dumb."
The proprietor took him to the back of the shop where in a special polished brass cage
the size of a small room sat the pride of the proprietor's collection -- a five-thousand-
dollar parrot. The parrot, dressed in a silk smoking jacket and sitting on a quilted perch,
was smoking a pipe and reading the FINANCIAL TIMES.
"Polly wanna a cracker? Polly wanna cracker?" the Negro yelled.
The parrot sniffed and looked at him over his gold-rimmed spectacles with aristocratic
disdain.
"Polly wanna cracker? Polly wanna cracker?" the Negro yelled again.
"Polly wanna cracker?" said the parrot in an impeccable Oxford accent. "Nigger wanna
watermelon?"
The believer is a parrot. The believer knows nothing. The believer is an atheist in
disguise. He is trying to befool himself, the world and even God.
The man who believes in individualism is not an individual. The man who is really an
individual need not believe -- he knows it, so what is the point of believing? Belief is
always needed in ignorance, and individualism is a belief. To be an individual is an
experience! Individualism is very cheap, but to be an individual needs arduous
discipline. It needs great perseverance, work, watchfulness. It comes only out of years
of effort in awareness, in meditation.
And whatsoever is happening here in this commune, Sudarshan, is nothing but
different ways to introduce you to meditation. In the kitchen, in the carpentry shop, in
the soap workshop, in the boutique -- whatsoever is happening, apparently it looks as if
it is the same ordinary thing as happens everywhere else. It is not. If you go and see the
carpenters working, of course they go on working like any other carpenters anywhere
else -- but with a different quality. That quality cannot be seen. You will have to become
a participant, only then will you slowly feel it. That quality is of trust, love.
My sannyasins are here because they love me, for no other reason. They are simply here
with me to be here with me. For the sake of being here with me they are ready to do
anything. But whatsoever they are doing is only the outer part. You will see the body of
the work but you will not be able to see the spirit of the work. For that you will have to
become a participant.
And, Sudarshan, it seems that you are still a spectator. Maybe you are working in the
commune, but still you have not become a participant -- otherwise such a question
would have been impossible.
The third question:
Question 3
BELOVED MASTER,WHY AM I FEELING I AM MISSING SOMETHING? THAT I SHOULD BE
SOMETHING ELSE? PLEASE HELP ME LET GO OF THIS GARBAGE.
Dhyana Yogi, if it is garbage, if you really understand that it is garbage, then there is no
question of helping you drop it. Knowing it as garbage is dropping it!
But is seems that you have heard me say that it is garbage. It has become a belief in you;
it is not your own knowing, it is not your own experience. You are still clinging to it.
Deep down you still think it is precious, it is not garbage. Deep down you still think
these are diamonds not pebbles. Deep down somewhere you still believe it is a treasure
to be protected and guarded.
Don't start believing me, because that will make no difference. You were believing in
Mohammed, or you were believing in Christ, or in Buddha, and then you come and you
start believing in me. That is not a revolution, that is not conversion. You simply change
the object of your belief, but the belief remains -- the same believing mind. You believe
in Jesus, but Jesus speaks the language which is now two thousand years old. You
cannot make much sense out of it; the context is lost in which it was relevant. I speak
the language of the twentieth century. You can make sense out of it, so you withdraw
your belief from Jesus and you start believing in me. This is very simple and cheap.
I am not saying believe in me. I am saying drop all believing and start seeing, because
belief will remain a blindness -- start seeing! Is it really garbage that you are carrying? Is
it your understanding that it is garbage? Then you will not ask how to drop it. Nobody
asks how to drop garbage. The problem arises only because deep down you know
yourself that it is gold. And somebody says that it is garbage and says it very
convincingly, and you cannot argue, and he silences you. And the man has such
authenticity, such integrity, that in his presence you simply become overflooded with
his being. You simply start saying, "Yes, it is garbage." But deep down you still know it
is not garbage, it is gold! Hence the problem arises: how to drop it?
If you understand on your own that it is garbage, you will never ask how to drop it.
Seeing it as garbage is dropping it, knowing it as garbage is dropping it! The garbage is
not clinging to you -- you are clinging to it. The garbage cares nothing about you, the
garbage is not interested in you. If you drop it, it is not going to make much fuss about
it -- "Why are you dropping me?" It will not say a single word, it will not create any
problem for you. It will not go to the court. You need not have a divorce! If you drop it,
the garbage will be really more happy than it is now. It will be finished with you, it will
be free from you. It must be getting tired of you. It is you who are clinging to it. Why
are you clinging to it? Why does one cling to something? -- because deep down one
goes on believing it is precious.
Dhyana Yogi, you say, "Why am I feeling I am missing something?"
Because from your very childhood you have been told that in yourself, intrinsically, you
are worthless. As you are you have no value. The value has to be attained, the worth
has to be proved. From your very childhood you have been taught this millions of
times. The parents, the teachers, the priests, the politicians, they are all in a secretconspiracy to destroy the child. And the best way to destroy a child is to destroy his
trust in himself.
To destroy the trust in the child you have to prove to the child that worth is not a given
phenomenon, that it has to be achieved in life and you can miss it. Unless you work,
unless you are very ambitious, unless you struggle with others.... It is a tooth and nail
fight and you have to cut each other's throats to achieve it. You are being conditioned to
be violent, ambitious, full of desires: to have more money, to have more power, to have
more prestige. Because you have been told that intrinsically you don't have any worth,
this problem has arisen.
And I say that you are intrinsically worthy, that you are born as buddhas. Unaware you
are, utterly oblivious of the reality of your own being, but you are hidden gods. What I
am saying is so totally different from what has been told to you, that a problem has
arisen. I say you are buddhas -- right now you are buddhas! -- but the whole training
and teaching, conditioning is: How can you be a buddha right now? Tomorrow maybe,
one day certainly, in some future life it is going to happen...but right now? It seems
impossible.
You have believed too much in your parents, in your teachers, in your politicians, in
your priests, and whatsoever they have told you, you have collected it. It is garbage, but
you have carried the garbage for so long that suddenly to drop it seems impossible -- so
long you have remained attached to it, so long you have thought it beautiful, precious,
nourishing. Now I say: It is all nonsense! Drop it, and just be a buddha from this very
moment! It is not a question of attaining, it is only a question of becoming aware. It is
only a question of becoming conscious, alert, awake, not a question of achievement.
So you listen to me: one part of your mind says, "Yes, the Master must be right!" One
part of you simply nods yes, because what is being said is a simple truth of life. But all
your training is against it. When you are close to me you start feeling it is true. When
you go away from me the mind jumps back upon you -- with vengeance. And of course
it is very powerful. The mind is so powerful, that's why it destroys your intelligence.
Intelligence has nothing to do with the mind; intelligence has something to do with the
heart. It is the quality of the heart. Intellectuality is the quality of the head. The
intellectual is not necessarily an intelligent person and the intelligent person is not
necessarily an intellectual.
Your intellect is full of garbage -- and I am trying to wake up your intelligence. And the
whole society has tried to make you unaware of your intelligence. The society is against
your intelligence. It wants you to be mediocre, because only mediocre people can be
good slaves. It wants you to be unintelligent and stupid, because only stupid people can
be dominated.
And stupid people are obedient, stupid people are never rebellious, and stupid people
simply vegetate. They don't make any effort to live their lives at the optimum. They
don't try to burn their torch of life from both ends simultaneously. They don't have
intensity. Stupidity is obedient, and obedience creates stupidity.A rather simple dude rode into town in the middle of the day stark naked. The sheriff
called him over and said, "Jake, what are you doing riding into town with no clothes
on?"
"Well, sheriff," said Jake, "it is a long story. I was riding into town to get some
provisions for my pa, when I came across this lady on the side of the road who asked
me for some help. Now my daddy always told me to help gentle lady folk, so I got off
my horse and helped her carry her picnic basket down to the river. Then I helped her
lay out her blanket, and helped her with everything she asked me to do. Then she said,
'How about taking your boots off, cowboy?' So I did, sheriff, and then she said, 'How
about taking your clothes off, cowboy?' And I said, 'Sure thing, Ma'am.' And she was
there on that rug, naked as the day she was born. Then she lay back and said, 'Go to
town cowboy!'...and so here I am, sheriff."
Obedience is a form of stupidity -- and the society wants you to be stupid. Stupid
people are good people. They remain always with the status quo, they never go against
it. Even if they see the rottenness of things, they simply close their eyes, or they are
always ready to accept any stupid explanation.
For example, this country has been poor for centuries, starving, suffering. But because
people are religious, obedient, stupid, they have been given any kind of explanation
and they have accepted it. Some believe that God has made them poor because poverty
is something very pious. They worship poverty; in India poverty is worshipped. If you
renounce your riches and you become a naked fakir, millions of people will think you
are a great sage. You may be simply stupid, but just because you have renounced riches
you are a great sage. I have seen many stupid sages.
Now it is a contradiction in terms -- how can a stupid person be a sage? A sage has to be
wise! But it is very difficult in this world to be wise and be worshipped. Wise people are
to be murdered, crucified, poisoned. Stupid people are worshipped. Stupid people
simply follow whatever the society says. Whatsoever the society wants them to do, they
simply do it. So a few people have been worshipping poverty.
Gandhi used to call poor people daridra narayana -- "the poor are divine." Poverty is
divine! The poor people are gods! If this is true then who would not like to be poor? If
poor people are gods, who would not like to be a god?
And then there are other explanations: that you are poor because in your past lives you
have committed sins. Those explanations have been invented for those people who
don't believe in God. The Jainas, the Buddhists, they don't believe in God so you cannot
give the first explanation to them. They need another explanation: the theory of karma.
But the purpose is the same! If you have committed sins in your past life, then it is
better to be finished with the karma. Go through poverty, and go through poverty
without any resistance. If you create any resistance, you will again be creating bad
karma and you will suffer in your future life. Enough, after all, is enough! Now be
finished with the whole thing -- suffer at this moment contentedly. So people have
become cows and buffaloes; they are suffering contentedly, no resistance, no rebellion.The society wants you to be stupid, not intelligent. Intelligence is dangerous.
Intelligence means you will start thinking on your own, you will start looking around
on your own. You will not believe in the scriptures; you will believe only in your own
experience.
Dhyana Yogi, please don't believe in what I say.
Experiment, meditate, experience -- unless it becomes your own understanding,
nothing is going to help.
You ask me, "Why am I feeling that I am missing something?"
...Because you have been told always that you have to find something. Now you are not
finding it, so the feeling arises that you are missing. And I am telling you, you have
never lost it in the first place! Please stop trying to find it, stop seeking and searching.
You have it already! Whatsoever is needed, you have it already. Just look within and
you will find infinite treasures, inexhaustible treasures of joy, love, ecstasy.
Nothing is being missed if you look in, but if you go on searching outside you will feel
more and more frustrated. And as you grow older, of course, you will feel that your life
is slipping out of your hands and you have not found it yet. And the whole irony is that
you have not lost it in the first place. It has always been within you...it is this moment
within you.
But don't believe me. I am not here to create believers, I am here to help you experience.
The moment it becomes your experience, it liberates. Truth liberates, says Jesus -- not
belief but truth.
But my truth cannot be your truth; my truth will be your belief. Only your truth can be
true to you. Truth certainly liberates, but let me add that the truth has to be your truth.
Nobody else's truth can liberate you. Somebody else's truth will become only an
imprisonment.
Dhyana Yogi, you are not missing anything. Nobody is missing. In the nature of things
we cannot miss it. We are part of God and God is part of us. There is no way, no
possible way to miss it. How can you escape from yourself? Where? Wherever you go
you will remain yourself. Even in hell you will remain yourself, because you cannot
escape from yourself, you cannot escape from God.
It is there waiting, patiently waiting for you to look in.
You say, "...that I should be something else?"
That has been told to you again and again: "Be somebody! Look at Gautam Buddha, at
Krishna, at Christ. Be a Buddha, be a Krishna, be a Christ!" Then certainly you will die
in misery, in anguish, frustrated -- utterly frustrated, crying and weeping -- because you
cannot be a Buddha. You are not meant to be a Buddha! You cannot be a Christ, you
cannot be a Krishna. You can only be yourself.
A great Hassid master, Zusiya, was dying. People had gathered -- disciples,
sympathizers. Somebody asked, an old man, "Zusiya, when you are facing God -- and
soon you will be facing God because you are dying -- will you be able to say to him that
you followed Moses absolutely, truthfully?"Zusiya opened his eyes, and these were his last words. He said, "Stop talking nonsense!
God is not going to ask me, 'Zusiya, why were you not a Moses?' He will ask me,
'Zusiya, why were you not a Zusiya?'"
You have to be just yourself and nobody else. And in fact that's what buddhahood
means: to be yourself. That is what christ-consciousness means: just to be yourself.
Buddha was not an imitation of somebody else. Don't you think there were many many
great men who had preceded him? He must have been told, "Be a Krishna! Be a
Parshvanath! Be an Adinatha!" He must have heard beautiful stories, mythologies. He
must have read the PURANAS, ancient stories about the great men, Rama, Krishna,
Parasuram. He must have heard all that, he must have received the heritage. But he
never tried to be somebody. He wanted to be himself, he wanted to know who he is. He
never became an imitator; that's why one day he became awakened.
Jesus never tried to be Abraham, Moses, Ezekiel. Jesus simply tried to be himself. That
was his crime, that's why he was crucified. The same people who crucified Jesus would
have worshipped him if he had simply been an imitator, a carbon copy of Moses. If he
had been just a gramophone record repeating the Ten Commandments, the Jews would
have worshipped him. But they had to crucify the man -- he was just himself.
The rotten society, the crowd, the mob mind, cannot tolerate individuals. It is
impossible for them to tolerate a Socrates. Do you know what the charge was against
Socrates? Exactly the same thing is said about me! This was the crime of Socrates, that
he used to corrupt the minds of the youth. That's exactly what my enemies say: that I
am corrupting people's minds, particularly the minds of the youth.
Socrates was corrupting the minds of the youth? He was trying to awaken their
intelligence, but the society became afraid. If so many people become so authentic, true,
then the vested interests are in danger. Then you cannot drive people like cattle. And
that's what priests enjoy, and the politicians too.
There is a conspiracy between the priest and the politician to exploit people, to
dominate people, to oppress people. And the fundamental is: never allow them to
become intelligent. Give them substitutes. What is the substitute for intelligence? --
intellectuality. Give them education; send them to the school, to the college, to the
university, so they become intellectuals.
Have you ever heard of universities creating intelligence? They create intellectuals, they
create scholars, they create people who know the scriptures -- to the very word they can
repeat the scriptures -- but they don't create intelligent people. They serve society; the
educational system is invented by this rotten society to serve its own purposes. It is not
there to help you, it is there to keep you in bondage.
Dhyana Yogi, I cannot help you let go of this garbage, I can only help you to be more
conscious. And if you are conscious the garbage will be dropped of its own accord. One
day suddenly you will find it disappearing...suddenly disappearing. As consciousness
deepens, all garbage disappears -- just as you bring light in and darkness disperses.
Buddha says: Become more aware and the light will start pouring in...aes dhammo
sanantano.The fourth question:
Question 4
BELOVED MASTER,
I OFTEN READ THE 'HYMN TO LOVE' IN THE NEW TESTAMENT. IT SEEMS TO
ME THAT THIS IS EXACTLY YOUR MESSAGE. ALSO, IT IS SIGNIFICANT THAT IT
NEVER ACTUALLY USES THE WORD 'GOD'. I CAN FIND NOTHING TO
CONTRADICT YOUR BASIC MESSAGE IN THIS LOVELY POEM. ON THE OTHER
HAND, IT SEEMS TO BE EXACTLY WHAT YOU ARE SAYING IN YOUR
DISCOURSES. AM I RIGHT?
YOU HAVE SUCH A BEAUTIFUL VOICE THAT IT WOULD BE REALLY NICE TO
HEAR YOU SAY SOME OR ALL OF IT, ESPECIALLY AS I FEEL YOU WILL SOON
STOP TALKING PUBLICLY ALTOGETHER. HERE IS A COPY OF THE HYMN.
Premartha, the message of all the buddhas is always the same because the truth is one.
Expressions may differ, different languages may be used, but that which is indicated
towards is the same.
Millions of fingers can point to the same moon. Fingers are bound to be different -- my
finger is different from the finger of Jesus or Buddha or Moses or Abraham -- but the
moon is the same. And this hymn is a beautiful finger pointing to the moon. It is the
very essence of all the teachings of all the buddhas of all the ages -- past, present, and
future too.
THOUGH I SPEAK WITH THE TONGUES OF MEN AND ANGELS, AND HAVE NOT
LOVE, I AM BECOME AS SOUNDING BRASS OR A TINKLING CYMBAL. AND
THOUGH I HAVE THE GIFT OF PROPHECY, AND UNDERSTAND ALL
MYSTERIES, AND ALL KNOWLEDGE; AND THOUGH I HAVE ALL FAITH, SO
THAT I COULD REMOVE MOUNTAINS, AND HAVE NOT LOVE, I AM NOTHING.
AND THOUGH I BESTOW ALL MY GOODS TO FEED THE POOR, AND THOUGH I
GIVE MY BODY TO BE BURNED, AND HAVE NOT LOVE, IT PROFITETH ME
NOTHING.
LOVE SUFFERETH LONG, AND IS KIND; LOVE ENVIETH NOT; LOVE VAUNTETH
NOT ITSELF, IS NOT PUFFED UP, DOTH NOT BEHAVE ITSELF UNSEEMLY,
SEEKETH NOT HER OWN, IS NOT EASILY PROVOKED, THINKETH NO EVIL;
REJOICETH NOT IN INIQUITY, BUT REJOICETH IN THE TRUTH; BEARETH ALL
THINGS, BELIEVETH ALL THINGS, HOPETH ALL THINGS, ENDURETH ALL
THINGS.
LOVE NEVER FAILETH: BUT WHETHER THERE BE PROPHECIES, THEY SHALL
FAIL; WHETHER THERE BE TONGUES, THEY SHALL CEASE; WHETHER THERE
BE KNOWLEDGE, IT SHALL VANISH AWAY. FOR WE KNOW IN PART, AND WE
PROPHESY IN PART. BUT WHEN THAT WHICH IS PERFECT IS COME THENTHAT WHICH IS PART SHALL BE DONE AWAY. WHEN I WAS A CHILD, I SPAKE
AS A CHILD, I UNDERSTOOD AS A CHILD, I THOUGHT AS A CHILD; BUT WHEN
I BECAME A MAN, I PUT AWAY CHILDISH THINGS. FOR NOW WE SEE
THROUGH A GLASS, DARKLY; BUT THEN FACE-TO-FACE. NOW I KNOW IN
PART, BUT THEN SHALL I KNOW EVEN AS ALSO I AM KNOWN. AND NOW
ABIDETH FAITH, HOPE, LOVE, THESE THREE; BUT THE GREATEST OF ALL
THESE IS LOVE.
These are the essential qualities of a religious person. This is my message -- this is the
message!
The language is old, and because it is old it has a beauty of its own, because the older
the language is, the more poetry it has. As we have become more and more scientific
our language has also become more and more scientific.
As the hymn is two thousand years old, it has something of primitive innocence in it,
the childlike quality of wonder, of being surprised at the mysterious. But, Premartha,
you are perfectly right: there is nothing in it which contradicts me, and there is nothing
in it which I would like to contradict either. Whosoever said it must have been an
awakened one.
But don't go on simply repeating it. It is beautiful to repeat, it is beautiful to sing it, but
not enough. Practice it, let it become the very flavor of your life. Let it be dissolved into
your blood, into your bones, into your marrow. Let it surround you like an invisible
aura. Don't go on simply repeating it. It is beautiful -- and that is the danger. You can
become so charmed, so hypnotized by its beauty, that you may go on repeating it your
whole life. And the more you repeat, the more beautiful it will look...because these
ancient messages have tremendous power and many layers of meaning.
But don't go into the linguistic or philosophical analysis of it. It is a prayer! -- and a
prayer is not something to be said but something to be felt. A prayer is not something to
be read but something to be lived. Live it!
It is true: AND NOW ABIDETH FAITH, HOPE, LOVE, THESE THREE; BUT THE
GREATEST OF ALL THESE IS LOVE.
You can think about love, you can have beautiful flights of imagination about love, you
can have beautiful dreams about love, but that is not going to help. What is going to
help is, you have to become love. Love has to become your essential core. Everything
else has to be sacrificed to love, everything else has to become part of your loving life.
Then only will this prayer be true for you. And then it will not be Christian, then it will
not belong to the New Testament. It will be something that is part of your heart; you
will breathe it. And whosoever will come close to you will have a little glimpse of it. A
little light will be shed on everybody's path...if you live it.
Scriptures can be understood only if first they are practiced. People do just the opposite:
they read the scripture and they try to understand it. Intellectually it is not difficult to
understand those scriptures, they are simple. People become very proficient, very
efficient, in repeating the scriptures -- and they end with that. They remain parrots.And what can you understand about it? Intellectually whatsoever you understand will
not be right, because it will reflect your state of mind, not the state of the mind who
uttered these words.
A retired cattle rancher, aged sixty-five, who had sold his ranch and come to New York
to see the sights, checked into a midtown hotel.
Once upstairs, he made himself comfortable and relaxed on the bed. While he was
resting, he saw the door slowly open, and there standing before him was a curvaceous
blonde attired only in a sheer negligee.
"Oh," she apologized when she saw the old fellow, "I must be in the wrong room."
"No," he corrected, "you are in the right room, but you are about forty years too late!"
The interpretation is always going to be yours. You can read Jesus, you can read
Buddha, but who is going to interpret it? You will interpret it. And what is your
understanding? What light have you got? Those beautiful sayings will remain just
beautiful sayings, beautiful nothings. Yes, good poetry, but poetry cannot liberate you
unless it becomes your own experience, unless you can become a witness to the
scriptures.
"Your continual unfaithfulness proves you are an absolute rotter," stormed the outraged
wife who had just caught her husband for the seventh time in a sportive romp with
another woman.
"Quite the contrary!" came the cool reply. "It merely proves that I am too good to be
true."
Your interpretations will always reflect you. When you look in the mirror you will be
looking at your face, you will be looking at yourself. You can't see the mirror, you can
only see your face reflected in it. You will be able to see the mirror only when you have
lost your face, when you have lost your head, when you are not. When you have
become a nothing, a nobody, then stand before a mirror and you will see the mirror and
its mirroring and you will not be mirrored in it, you will not be reflected in it. You will
not be present there. Before you become an absence, going before the mirror is of no
use.
And that's what people go on doing: reading the Bible, the Koran, THE
DHAMMAPADA, they read themselves.
The worried mother was lecturing her teenage daughter on the subject of sex morality.
"Of course I realize you may be tempted while you are out on a date. If you are, dear,
please ask yourself this all-important question: is an hour of pleasure worth an entire
life of humiliation?"
"Gosh, mother," asked the daughter, "how do you make it last an hour?"Remember always, you cannot understand Jesus, Moses, Zarathustra. Your face will
come in it too much.
A newly wed patient was complaining to his doctor about his marital relations. It seems
the first time he makes love to his spouse it is just wonderful, but the second time, he is
perspired and sweaty.
The medicine man decided to consult the wife. "Isn't it odd," the medico asks the missus
when she arrives, "that it is just wonderful the first time and the second time he is all
perspired and sweaty?"
"Why should it be odd?" she smirks. "The first time it is in January and the second time
it is July!"
You cannot go directly into the sayings of the buddhas. First you will have to go inside
yourself. The basic encounter has to be with your own originality, and then all the
buddhas will become clear to you. And then one thing more starts happening: then
Jesus and Buddha and Moses and Mohammed are not saying different things -- they are
saying the same things.
Unless a person becomes a witness to the ultimate truth himself, he will go on thinking
that Buddha is saying one thing and Jesus is saying something contrary; that Buddhism
is against Hinduism, that Hinduism is against Jainism, that Jainism is against
Mohammedanism. Unless you witness the truth you will go on believing these three
hundred religions, and you will be part of the quarrel, the conflict, the antagonism that
goes on between these religions continuously. The day you see the truth of your own
being, all these three hundred religions simply disappear, evaporate.
Once -- just like Premartha -- a Christian missionary went to see a Zen master. He
wanted to convert the Zen master, so he had brought the Sermon on the Mount with
him. He started reading the Sermon on the Mount: he had read only the first two or
three sentences, and the Zen master said, "Stop! Whosoever said it was a buddha!"
The missionary was surprised. He said, "But these are the words of Jesus!"
The master said, "It doesn't matter what the name of the buddha is, but whosoever said
this was a buddha. He had arrived."
And I say this to you because I know too. Once you have tasted, you will know. In
whatsoever form the truth comes you will immediately recognize it. But first become a
witness.
The last question:
Question 5
BELOVED MASTER,
ONLY ONE STEP?Digambara, yes, in fact, not even one...because we are not to go anywhere. We are
already in God! I say "only one step" just to console you, because without any steps you
will be too puzzled. I reduce it to the minimum, only one step, so that something
remains for you to do, because you understand only the language of doing. You are a
doer! If I say, "Nothing has to be done, not even a single step has to be taken," you will
be at a loss how to make any head or tail of it.
The truth is, not even a single step is needed. Sitting silently doing nothing, the spring
comes and the grass grows by itself. But that may be too much. Your doer mind may
simply ignore it or may think it is all nonsense. How can you achieve God without
doing anything? Yes, a shortcut the mind can understand; that's why I say, "a single
step." That is the shortest -- it cannot be reduced to less than that.
A single step! That is just to make you understand that doing is nonessential. To attain
to being, doing is absolutely nonessential. When you are agreed and convinced that
only one step is needed, then I will whisper in your ear, "Not even one -- you are
already there!"
Rabiya, a great Sufi mystic, was passing.... It was the street she used to pass every day
on her way to the marketplace, because in the marketplace she would go every day and
shout the truth that she had attained. And for many days she had been watching a
mystic, a well-known mystic, Hassan, sitting before the door of the mosque and praying
to God, "God, open the door! Please open the door! Let me in!"
Rabiya could not tolerate it that day. Hassan was crying, tears were rolling down, and
he was shouting again and again, "Open the door! Let me in! Why don't you listen?
Why don't you hear my prayers?"
Every day she had laughed, whenever she had heard Hassan she had laughed, but it
was too much today. Tears...and Hassan was really crying, weeping, crying his heart
out. She went, she shook Hassan, and said, "Stop all this nonsense! The door is open --
in fact you are already in!"
Hassan looked at Rabiya, and that moment became a moment of revelation. Looking
into the eyes of Rabiya, he bowed down, touched her feet, and said, "You came in time;
otherwise I would have called my whole life! For years I have been doing this -- where
have you been before? And I know you pass this street every day. You must have seen
me crying, praying."
Rabiya said, "Yes, but truth can only be said at a certain moment, in a certain space, in a
certain context. I was waiting for the right, ripe moment. Today it has arrived; hence I
came close to you. Yesterday if I had told you, you would have felt irritated; you may
have even become angry. You may have reacted antagonistically; you may have told
me, 'You have disturbed my prayer!' -- and it is not right to disturb anybody's prayer."
Even the king is not allowed to disturb the prayer of a beggar. Even if a criminal, a
murderer, is praying in Mohammedan countries, the police have to wait till he finishes
his prayer, only then can he be caught. Prayer should not be disturbed.
Rabiya said, "I had wanted to tell you this, that 'Hassan, don't be a fool, the door is open
-- in fact, you are already in!' But I had to wait for the right moment."Digambara, I say "only one step" -- and even that seems to be unbelievable to you,
hence the question.
You ask me, "Beloved Master, only one step?"
Not even one, Digambara. But the right moment has not come yet, at least for you.
When it comes I will whisper in your ear, "You are already in. Not even a single step is
needed" -- because we are not going outside. Steps are needed to go outside, steps are
not needed to go in.
It is like a man dreaming, and in his dreams he has gone far far away. Will he need a
long journey to come back home? He is already home, he is sleeping in his home...but
he may be in Timbuktu in his dream. All that is needed is that he has to be shaken up.
As Rabiya shook Hassan, Digambara, one day I will shake you up! You just need cold
water to be poured on you -- really cold water, ice-cold, so in shock you open your eyes.
Do you think you will ask me, "How to go back home -- because I am in Timbuktu?"
No, you will not ask, if you see that you are already in your home, had fallen asleep and
dreamt about Timbuktu. You had never gone there.
You have not gone out of God! You cannot, it is impossible, because only God exists.
Where can we go, where can we go? There is no place where God is not. We are always
in him and he is always in us. But that needs an awakening.
Not even one step -- that is just to bring you closer to truth. Slowly slowly, you have to
be persuaded. One thousand steps are reduced to one step, and then I will take that step
away from you too. But that needs a right moment. Ultimate truths can be said only in a
right, ripe situation.
That moment will also come.
Just be ready to receive it, welcome it....
Enough for today.The Dhammapada: The Way of the Buddha, Vol 1
Chapter #7
Chapter title: By watching....
27 June 1979 am in Buddha Hall
THE FOOL IS CARELESS.
BUT THE MASTER GUARDS HIS WATCHING.
IT IS HIS MOST PRECIOUS TREASURE.
HE NEVER GIVES IN TO DESIRE.
HE MEDITATES.
AND IN THE STRENGTH OF HIS RESOLVE
HE DISCOVERS TRUE HAPPINESS.
HE OVERCOMES DESIRE --
AND FROM THE TOWER OF WISDOM
HE LOOKS DOWN WITH DISPASSION
UPON THE SORROWING CROWD.
FROM THE MOUNTAINTOP
HE LOOKS DOWN ON THOSE
WHO LIVE CLOSE TO THE GROUND.
MINDFUL AMONG THE MINDLESS,
AWAKE WHILE OTHERS DREAM,
SWIFT AS THE RACE HORSE
HE OUTSTRIPS THE FIELD.
BY WATCHING
INDRA BECAME KING OF THE GODS.
HOW WONDERFUL IT IS TO WATCH,
HOW FOOLISH TO SLEEP.
THE BHIKKHU WHO GUARDS HIS MIND
AND FEARS THE WAYWARDNESS OF HIS THOUGHTS
BURNS THROUGH EVERY BOND
WITH THE FIRE OF HIS VIGILANCE.
THE BHIKKHU WHO GUARDS HIS MIND
AND FEARS HIS OWN CONFUSION
CANNOT FALL.
HE HAS FOUND THE WAY TO PEACE.Life is three-dimensional, and man is free to choose. The freedom that man has is both a
curse and a blessing. He can choose to rise, he can choose to fall. He can choose the way
of darkness or he can choose the way of light.
No other being has the freedom to choose. Their lives are predetermined. Because they
are predetermined they cannot go astray -- that's the beauty of it. But because it is
predetermined they are mechanical -- that's what is ugly about it.
Man is not yet a being in the true sense. He is only a becoming, he is on the way. He is
searching, seeking, groping; he is not yet crystallized. That's why he does not know
who he is -- because he is not yet; how can he know who he is? Before knowing, being
has to happen. And the being is possible only if you choose rightly, consciously, with
full awareness.
Jean-Paul Sartre is right when he says that man is a project, that man creates himself by
his own effort, that man is born only as an opportunity, as a possibility, not as an
actuality. He has to become actual -- and there is every possibility that he may miss the
target. Millions of people miss the target; it is very rarely that a person has found his
being. When a person finds his being, he is a buddha.
But the basic requirement is: choose your life with awareness. You have to choose
anyway -- whether you choose with awareness or not makes no difference, choice has to
be made. You are not free in the sense that if you don't want to choose you will be
allowed not to. You are not free not to choose -- even not choosing will be a choosing.
The millions who miss, they miss because they don't choose. They simply wait; they go
on hoping that something is going to happen. Nothing ever happens that way. You
have to create the context, the space, for something valuable to happen to you, for
something essential to happen to you.
There are two schools of philosophers in the world. One believes that man is born as an
essence: the essentialist school. It says that man is already born ready-made. This is the
idea of all the fatalists. The other school is that of those who call themselves
existentialists. They believe that man is born not as an essence but only as an existence.
And what is the difference? The essence is predetermined; you bring it with your life,
you bring it as a blueprint. You have only to unfold it; you are already made. There is
no choice for you to make yourself, to create yourself. That is a very uncreative
standpoint; that reduces man to a machine.
The other school believes that man is born only as an existence. The essence has to be
created; it is not already there. You have to create yourself, you have to find ways and
means to become, to be. You have to become a womb to your own being, you have to
give birth to yourself. The physical birth is not the true birth; you will have to be born
again.
Jesus says to Nicodemus, "Unless you are born again, you will not enter into the
kingdom of my God." What does he mean? Is Nicodemus to die first physically? No.
Jesus means something totally different: he has to die as an ego, he has to die as a
personality. He has to die as a past. He has to die as mind. Only when you die as mind
are you born as a being.In the East we have called the buddhas the twice-born -- dwij. Other people are only
once-born; a buddha is twice-born. The first gift of life is through the parents; the
second gift you have to give to yourself.
You can choose between these three dimensions. If you choose one dimension you will
attain a certain integrity, but because it is one-dimensional it will not be total and it will
not be whole. The first dimension is the dimension of science, of the objective world, of
objects, things, the other. The second dimension is of aesthetics: the world of music,
poetry, painting, sculpture, the world of imagination. And the third dimension is that of
religion -- subjective, inner.
Science and religion are polar opposites: science is extrovert, religion is introvert. And
between the two is the world of aesthetics. It is the bridge; it is both and neither. The
world of aesthetics, the world of the artist, is in a way objective -- only in a way. He
paints, and then a painting is born as an object. It is also subjective, because before he
can paint he has to create the painting in his inwardness, in his subjectivity. Before a
poet can sing his song, he sings it in his innermost recesses of being. It is sung there
first, only then does it move into the outer world.
It is scientific in the sense that art creates objects, and it is religious in the sense that
whatsoever art creates is first envisioned in one's own inner being. It is the bridge
between science and religion. Religion is absolute inwardness. It is moving into your
innermost core, it is subjectivity.
These are the three dimensions.
If you become a scientist and lose contact with aesthetics and religion, you will be a
one-dimensional man. You will be only one third; you will not be whole. You may
attain to a certain integrity that you will see in a man like Albert Einstein -- a certain
individuality, a beauty, a truth, but only partial.
You can choose to be an artist: you can be a Picasso, a Van Gogh, a Beethoven, a
Rabindranath, but then too...you will be a little better because aesthetics is the world of
in-between, the world of twilight. You will have something of religion in you. Each poet
has something of religion in him -- he may be aware of it, he may not be aware of it, but
no poet can be without some flavor of religion. It is impossible. Even the most atheistic
artist is bound to have some kind of religiousness. Without it he will not be a genius.
Without it he will remain only a technician, a craftsman, but not an artist.
Even a man like Jean-Paul Sartre -- who is determinedly an atheist, who will never
concede that he is religious -- even he is in some way religious. He has created great
novels, and those novels and the characters of those novels have great interiority. That
interiority has been lived by this man, otherwise he could not write about it. That
interiority is experienced.
And the man that moves into aesthetics is bound to have some scientific qualities
around him too. He will be more logical than the religious person, more object-oriented
than the religious person -- less object-oriented than the scientist of course, less logical
than the scientist, but more logical than the religious person. He will be in a more
balanced state.It is better to move in the world of art because somehow it has something of all the three
dimensions -- but only something, still it is not total.
The religious man is again one-dimensional, just as the scientist is. Albert Einstein is
one-dimensional, so is Gautama the Buddha. And because the East has become one-
dimensionally religious it has suffered much. And now the West is suffering much, and
the cause is one-dimensionality. The West is bankrupt as far as the inner world is
concerned and the East is bankrupt as far as the outer world is concerned.
The East is not accidentally poor and starving. It has chosen to be that way. It has
denied science; it has even denied the world of objective reality. It says the world is
illusory. If the world is illusory, how can you create a science? The very first
requirement is missing. You cannot create a science out of maya, illusion. How can you
create a science out of something which is not, which does not even exist? If you deny
the world, you have denied the dimension of science altogether.
That is the reason why the East is poor and starving. And unless the Eastern genius
understands this, we can go on importing science from the West but it will not get roots
into our beings. If our approach remains the same as it has been for five thousand years,
science will only be something foreign. That's how it is.
In India you can find a scientist, world famous in his field of work, and still living a
very unscientific life. He may be consulting the palmist and the astrologer. He may be
going to take a bath in the Ganges, so his sins of many many lives are washed away. He
may still be believing in a thousand and one things which are simply superstitious --
and still he is a scientist! Science remains something peripheral; his soul still remains
rooted in the ancient past of the East, which is unscientific.
The East has suffered much because of one-dimensionality. And now the West is
suffering again for the same reason: one-dimensionality. The West has chosen to be
scientific at the cost of being religious. Now God is denied, the soul is denied. Man is
reduced first to an animal and now to a machine. Man loses all glory, all grandeur. Man
loses all hope, all future. The moment man loses his interiority he loses depth, he
becomes superficial. The Western man is rich as far as things are concerned, but is very
poor as far as soul is concerned -- inwardly poor, outwardly rich.
This is the state of affairs right now.
And between these two a few artists exist who have something of both the dimensions.
But even the artist is not satisfied, because he is something of both but he is neither a
scientist nor a religious person -- just having a few glimpses of both the worlds. He
remains in a kind of limbo; he never settles, he remains a vagabond. He moves like a
shuttle between these two worlds. He does not contribute much: because he is not a
scientist he cannot contribute scientifically and he is not religious so he cannot
contribute religiously. At the most his art remains decorative; at the most it can make
life a little more beautiful, a little more comfortable, convenient. But that is not much.
I propose the fourth way. The true man will be all three simultaneously: he will be a
scientist, an artist, and religious. And I call the fourth man the spiritual man. That's
where I differ from Albert Einstein and Gautam Buddha and Picasso -- from them all.
You must remember my differences.Buddha is one-dimensional -- tremendously beautiful! As far as his own inner world is
concerned he is the greatest master, the master of the inner, unsurpassable, but he
remains one-dimensional. He attains to immense peace, silence, bliss, but does not
contribute to the world in any objective way.
Albert Einstein contributes to the world in a very objective way, but cannot contribute
anything of the inner -- hence his contribution becomes a curse. He suffered his whole
life because he was the man who proposed that atom bombs should be made. He had
written a letter to the American president: "Now it is time -- unless atom bombs are
made the war can go on for years and years and will be very destructive. Just making
the atom bombs, the very threat of it, will stop the war."
But once the power -- any kind of power -- reaches into the hands of the politicians, you
cannot control them, you cannot prevent them from using it. The politician is the most
stupid kind of person -- monkeyish, power-mad.
Once the atom bomb was in the hands of the American politicians it had to be dropped
somewhere. Hiroshima, Nagasaki, were bound to happen. And when they happened it
was a wound, a great wound, for Albert Einstein. He repented his whole life.
In the last moments, when somebody asked him, "Would you like to become a scientist
again if God gives you an opportunity to be born in the world again?"
He said, "No, certainly no, absolutely no! I would like rather to be a plumber than to be
a physicist, a scientist. Enough is enough! I have not been a blessing to the world, I have
been a curse."
He enriched the outer world certainly, but without inner growth, the outer growth
creates a lopsidedness. You possess many things, but you don't possess yourself. You
have all that can make you happy but you are not happy, because happiness cannot be
derived from your possessions. Happiness is an inner welling-up; it is an awakening of
your own energies. It is an awakening of your soul.
Buddha contributed tremendously to the subjective dimension. He is a master par
excellence. Whatsoever he says is absolutely true, but it is one-dimensional -- never
forget it.
My effort here is to create the fourth way: a man who joins all these three dimensions of
life into himself, who becomes a trinity, a trimurti, who has all these three faces of God
to him. Who has as much of a logical mind as is needed by science and who is also as
poetic as is needed by aesthetics, and who is also as meditative and watchful as is
proposed by the buddhas.
The fourth man is the hope of the world. The fourth way is the only possibility if man is
to survive. If man is still to exist on this earth, we have to find a great synthesis between
these three dimensions. And if all these three dimensions are meeting, merging, melting
into one, of course that synthesis is the fourth.
I am speaking on Buddha, on Mahavira, on Jesus, on Patanjali, on Lao Tzu, and many
more. But always remember that all these people are one-dimensional. I want to enrich
your life through their teachings, but I don't end with them. I would like you to go a
little deeper into other dimensions too.Hence the new commune is going to be a meeting place of East and West, of the
subjective and the objective. In the new commune we are going to have scientists,
artists, poets, painters, singers, musicians, meditators, yogis, mystics -- all kinds of
people pouring their energies into one great river. And that's how I would like the
whole world to be.
Buddha is to be incorporated in it, that's why I am speaking on him. And, of course, the
third dimension, the religious, is one of the most important, the most important
dimension. Without it everything is soulless.
Today's sutras:
THE FOOL IS CARELESS.
BUT THE MASTER GUARDS HIS WATCHING.
IT IS HIS MOST PRECIOUS TREASURE.
Buddha calls a man foolish, not because he is ignorant, not because he is not
knowledgeable. According to Buddha, a man is a fool if he is unconscious, if he behaves
unconsciously, if he lives in sleep, if he is a somnambulist. If he goes on behaving
without any mindfulness, then he is a fool. The word has a special meaning, remember:
unconsciousness, unawareness, unmindfulness -- that's Buddha's definition of the fool.
He moves in life like driftwood, at the mercy of the winds. He does not know who he is,
he does not know from where he comes, he does not know to where he is going. He is
accidental; he simply lives by accident. He has no conscious, deliberate search for being,
for truth, for reality. He follows the crowd; he remains a part of the mob psychology.
He is not an individual. He has no authentic intelligence of his own; he simply follows
others. The parents have said something, the teachers, the priests, the politicians, and he
goes on following all kinds of advice. He has no idea why he is here, for what, and what
he is doing, and why. He never raises such questions.
These questions are very uncomfortable to him. They create anxiety in him; he avoids
these questions. He simply believes in the answers that are handed over to him; he
never doubts those answers. Not that he has attained to trust -- no, he has no trust either
-- but he simply represses his doubt because doubt creates discomfort.
He remains a Hindu, a Mohammedan, a Christian. He never inquires and he never risks
anything for his inquiry. He never goes into exploration. He is not an adventurer, his
life is not an adventure. He is stuck, he is dormant, stagnant. You cannot separate him
from his crowd; he is like a sheep. Buddha calls him the fool.
The fool can be very knowledgeable -- in fact almost always he is. He can be a pundit, a
scholar, a great professor -- that's how he hides his foolishness. By gathering knowledge
on the circumference he hides the ignorance that exists at the center.
There are two types of people: one, very knowledgeable people -- knowledgeable, but
they know nothing. They have a kind of ignorant knowledge. And there is the other
category: the people who are not knowledgeable -- but they know. They have a kind of
knowing ignorance.When Buddha uses the word 'fool', he is not talking about the second category --
because Buddha himself is not very knowledgeable, neither is Jesus, nor is Mohammed.
They are innocent people, simple people, but their simplicity is such, their innocence is
such, their childlike quality is such, that they have been able to penetrate into the
innermost core of their beings. They have been able to know their truth; they have been
able to reach the very core of their existence. They know, but they are not
knowledgeable. Their knowing is not through scriptures. Their knowing has happened
through watchfulness. Remember the source: real knowing comes through meditation,
awareness, consciousness, mindfulness, watchfulness, witnessing. And unreal
knowledge comes through scriptures. You can learn the unreal knowledge very easily
and you can brag about it, but you will remain a fool -- a learned fool, but a fool all the
same.
If you really want to know you will have to drop all your knowledge, you will have to
unlearn it. You will have to become ignorant again, like a small child, with wondering
eyes, with alertness. You will be able to know not only your own being but also the
being that exists in the world...the being that exists in the trees and the birds and the
animals and the rocks and the stars. If you are able to know yourself, you will be able to
know all that is.
God is another name for all that is.
THE FOOL IS CARELESS. By "carelessness" Buddha means he behaves unconsciously.
He does not know what he is doing. He simply goes on doing things because he cannot
remain unoccupied; he wants constant occupation. He cannot remain alone; he wants
constant company. He cannot remain unengaged even for a single moment, because
whenever he is unengaged, unoccupied, alone, he starts facing himself -- and he is very
afraid of that.
He does not want to go into the abyss of his own being. All that he knows is
meaningless there. All that he knows, he cannot carry it there. All his knowledge, all his
efficiency, all his scriptures, all his theories, are utterly futile in the inner world. He
clings to the outer because there he is somebody. In the inner world he is a nobody.
Just watch people! In fact it is the greatest entertainment: stand by the side of the road
and just watch people. What are they doing? Why are they doing it? And then watch
yourself -- what are you doing? and why?
A man picks up a young woman in a hotel lobby and goes to her apartment with her.
They both undress, but then she says, "First chase me! I want to be inflamed, excited!"
He chases her for two hours, but cannot catch her and leaves in disgust.
The next night he sees her pick up another victim in the same lobby and he sneaks up
on the fire-escape to watch the new sucker's discomfiture through the window. As he
watches the bare legs flashing by under the partly-drawn window shade, he says to
himself out loud, "Ah, brother, get a load of that!"
"You said it!" breathes a man's voice in his ear, "but you should have seen the
sonofabitch that was here last night!"Just watch people -- what are they doing? Chasing shadows, chasing things which they
don't need, trying to make great effort to attain something which once attained they will
not know what to do with. That's how people are running after money, after political
power. Once you have it you don't know what to do with it.
A woman was saying to another woman, "Are you not worried about your husband?
He continuously goes on chasing women, any woman -- and you know it!"
And the other woman laughed. She said, "There is nothing to worry about: his chasing
women is like dogs chasing cars."
The other woman said, "I don't understand. What do you mean, dogs chasing cars?"
She said, "Yes, dogs chasing cars -- once they have caught one they don't know what to
do with the car, and that's how my husband is. He will chase a woman, he will catch
hold of her. Then he does not know what to do with her. I know him! That's why I am
not worried."
This is the situation. Somebody wants to be very famous, and he will waste his whole
life in becoming famous and then he will not know what to do with it. In fact, once you
become very famous you want to become unfamous again, because it is such a weight.
You cannot relax. You cannot go anywhere without being watched by the crowds. You
have no privacy anymore, you cannot live any personal life. Everybody is looking,
watching, investigating your life. You cannot laugh, you cannot talk with
ease...everything becomes difficult.
Just a few days ago Jimmy Carter said that if Kennedy stands against him in the
presidential election he will "whip his ass." Now he is being condemned all over the
world for using that word. You cannot even use an innocent word. Now he must be
feeling very repentant for what he has done. He has committed a crime.
You don't have a private life when you are famous -- when you are a president of a
country, a Nobel Prize winner, you are a public thing. You are always on show, in the
show-window; you always have to keep dressed up. You cannot make a simple gesture
in freedom.
People have money...and then they don't know what to do with it.
The accidental man is foolish. The wise man moves deliberately, takes each step
consciously. His life is a constant inquiry for truth. He does not go astray. He remains
alert in every one of his acts -- not because of others. He remains alert because it is only
by being alert that he will become integrated, that he will become crystallized.
THE FOOL IS CARELESS. The wise man cares -- he cares about himself, he cares about
his life, and he cares about others too. He cares about everything, because he values his
life. He knows that it is very precious, that it is a God-given opportunity to grow, that is
has not to be lost in a kind of drunkenness.
A reformed prostitute has joined the Salvation Army and is giving testimony on a street
corner. "I used to lie in the arms of men," she confesses, "white men, black men,
Chinamen. But now I lie in the arms of Jesus.""That's right, sister," cries a drunk in the back row, "fuck 'em all!"
Just watch people and watch yourself, and you will be surprised how unconscious, how
drunk we are. How careless! We don't listen to what is said, we don't see what we see.
Our eyes are clouded, our minds confused, our beings have no clarity. We are not
perceptive, we are not sensitive.
We go on uttering things which we don't mean, and then we suffer for them. We go on
saying things which we never wanted to say. We go on doing things -- even while we
are doing them we know that we don't want to do these things, still we go on doing
them. Some unconscious force goes on driving us. Sometimes we even decide not to do
a certain thing, not to say a certain thing -- still we do it, even against our own
decisions. We don't have any resolution, we don't have any resolve, we don't have any
will.
She knew that these were to be her last few hours on this earth, so she called her
husband to her side and in a halting voice told him her last request.
"I know," she said, "that you and mother have never gotten along. But would you as a
special favor to me, ride to the cemetery in the same car with her?"
"Alright," replied the unhappy husband. "But it will spoil my whole day."
This is not really a joke -- this happens every day. You say things which you should
have known are not right to say. But you know only later on, when the harm is done.
Unconscious utterings.
Now, this man may have been crying and saying to his wife, "Without you it will be
impossible to live. I will always remain empty without you, a part of my soul will die
with you..." and things like that. But now, in this moment, he has forgotten all.
THE FOOL IS CARELESS. BUT THE MASTER GUARDS HIS WATCHING. IT IS HIS
MOST PRECIOUS TREASURE. The fool remains a slave -- a slave of the instincts, a
slave of unconscious desires, a slave of whims, a slave of the society in which he is born,
a slave of the fashions -- a slave of anything that happens around him. He simply picks
it up. If the neighbor is buying a new car, he has to buy a new car too. He does not need
it. If the neighbor has purchased a house in the hills, he has to purchase one. It may be
difficult and hard to manage for the money. He may have to borrow, it may take years
for him to pay, but he has to purchase it. His ego is hurt. People are living imitatively,
very carelessly.
Among the Eskimos there is a tradition, a very beautiful tradition, that each year, the
first day of the year, every family looks in the house for what is unnecessary and what
is necessary -- they sort things out. And only what is absolutely necessary is saved; all
that is unnecessary is given as gifts to people.
And you will be surprised to know that the Eskimo's home is the cleanest home in the
world, has a purity about it -- no garbage, nothing accumulates. Spacious -- small but
spacious; only that much which is necessary, absolutely necessary....Just think of all the things that you go on accumulating: are they really necessary? do
you really need them? Or is it just because people are accumulating that you also
become accumulative?
The watchful man becomes the master of his life. He lives it according to his light, not
according to others' lives. He lives it according to his own needs. And remember, your
needs are not many. If you are wise, watchful, you will have a very very contented life,
and very simple, and with small things.
But if you are imitative, then your life will become very complex, unnecessarily
complex. And I am not giving you particular directions about what you should have
and what you should not have. I am simply saying go on watching...whatsoever is
necessary for you, have it; and whatsoever is not necessary for you, forget about it. This
is the way of a sannyasin.
I am not for renouncing things, but I am certainly for renouncing unnecessary garbage.
And it is not only that you collect unnecessary things -- you desire unnecessary things,
and you never meditate whether those things are really necessary. Are they going to
help in any way? Are they going to make you more happy, more blissful?
Before you start desiring a thing, think it over thrice...and you will be surprised. Out of
a hundred of your desires, ninety-nine are absolutely useless. They simply keep you
occupied; that is their only function. They keep you away from yourself; that is their
only utility. They don't allow you time, space to be with yourself. They are dangerous.
It is because of these unnecessary things that you will waste your life, and you will die a
bankrupt.
...THE MASTER GUARDS HIS WATCHING.
I have heard:
The husband and wife are being driven crazy by the continued presence of the wife's
brother, who came to spend the weekend but is still there six months later. They decide
that the wife will cook a chicken and the husband will pretend it is overdone. They will
put the matter to the brother-in-law. If he says the chicken is good, the husband will
throw him out; if he says the chicken is bad the wife will throw him out. It can't fail!
The scene is set up as planned, with much pretended shouting and recrimination, while
the brother-in-law silently stows away his food. Suddenly the husband and wife stop
shouting and turn to him.
"Harry," says the husband, "what do you think?"
"Me?" says Harry, biting into the chicken leg. "I think I am staying another three
months."
Must have been a very watchful man. Must have been very careful, alert. He is not
caught in the trap. The trap was certainly very subtle. Unless he was very alert, it was
bound to trap him. He does not give any opinion. He simply states a fact, that "I am
going to stay three more months."Live watchfully and you will not be trapped. Live unconsciously and on each step you
are trapped; your life becomes more and more imprisoned. And nobody is responsible
except you.
BUT THE MASTER GUARDS HIS WATCHING. IT IS HIS MOST PRECIOUS
TREASURE. Whatsoever he does, he does with total awareness. Whatsoever you do,
you do almost mechanically. You will have to de-automatize yourself. That's what
meditation is all about: the process of de-automatization.
You have become automatic. You go on driving the car, smoking the cigarette, talking
to the friend, and thinking a thousand and one thoughts inside. Most accidents happen
because of this. More men are dying every year in car, train, airplane and similar
accidents than die in war. Adolf Hitler may not have killed as many people as are being
killed every year by the mechanical behavior of man around the earth.
But what can you do? That's your whole way of life, that's how you live. You eat -- you
simply go on stuffing, you don't pay any attention to what you are eating. You make
love to your wife or your husband -- you don't even see the face of the woman. You
have become very insensitive; you just go on moving through empty gestures, with no
significance. They can't have any significance unless you are fully alert.
It is the light of awareness that makes things precious, extraordinary. Then small things
are no longer small. When a man with alertness, sensitivity, love, touches an ordinary
pebble on the seashore, that pebble becomes a kohinoor. And if you touch a kohinoor in
your unconscious state, it is just an ordinary pebble -- not even that. Your life will have
as much depth and as much meaning as you have awareness.
Now people are asking all over the world, "What is the meaning of life?" Of course the
meaning is lost, because you have lost the way to find the meaning -- and the way is
awareness. IT IS HIS MOST PRECIOUS TREASURE.
HE NEVER GIVES IN TO DESIRE.
What does Buddha mean by "desire"? Desire means your whole mind. Desire means not
to be herenow. Desire means moving somewhere in the future which is not yet. Desire
means a thousand and one ways of escaping from the present. Desire is equivalent to
mind. In Buddha's terminology, desire is mind.
And desire is time too. When I say desire is time too, I don't mean the clock time, I mean
the psychological time. How do you create future in your mind? -- by desiring. You
want to do something tomorrow, you have created the tomorrow; otherwise the
tomorrow is nowhere yet, it has not come. But you want to do something tomorrow,
and because you want to do something tomorrow you have created a psychological
tomorrow.
And people are creating years ahead, lives ahead. They are even thinking about what to
do after life, after death. They are even preparing for that! And these people are thought
to be religious; they are not religious at all. Desire takes you away from the now-here,
and now-here is the only reality.Hence Buddha says: HE NEVER GIVES IN TO DESIRE. He never moves into the
future, he lives in the present. To live in the future is to live a false life, a pseudo life.
A fashionable actress refuses a young man who begs for her favors, on the grounds that
he is Jewish, and laughs at his offer of one hundred thousand francs. She tells him that
to show him how little she cares for his money he can make love to her for as long as it
takes the hundred thousand francs to burn.
He comes back the next day with the money, lays ten bills out in a line with the ends
just overlapping, lights the first one and leaps into bed with her. As the last bill burns
away, she pushes him off her.
"Well, I have had you," he says triumphantly.
"Yes," she smiles, "and your hundred thousand francs are burnt to ashes."
"What does it matter?" he says, lighting a cigarette. "They were counterfeit."
The man who lives in the future, lives a counterfeit life. He does not really live, he only
pretends to live. He hopes to live, he desires to live, but he never lives. And the
tomorrow never comes, it is always today. And whatsoever comes is always now and
here, and he does not know how to live now-here; he knows only how to escape from
now-here. The way to escape is called "desire," tanha -- that is Buddha's word for what
is an escape from the present, from the real into the unreal.
The man who desires is an escapist.
Now, this is very strange, that meditators are thought to be escapists. That is utter
nonsense. Only the meditator is not an escapist -- everybody else is. Meditation means
getting out of desire, getting out of thoughts, getting out of mind. Meditation means
relaxing in the moment, in the present. Meditation is the only thing in the world which
is not escapist, although it is thought to be the most escapist thing. People who
condemn meditation always condemn it with the argument that it is escape, escaping
from life. They are simply talking nonsense; they don't understand what they are
saying.
Meditation is not escaping from life: it is escaping into life. Mind is escaping from life,
desire is escaping from life.
HE NEVER GIVES IN TO DESIRE....
HE MEDITATES.
He brings himself again and again to the present. Again and again the mind starts
functioning and he brings it back to the present. Slowly slowly, it starts happening: the
window opens and for the first time you see the sky as it is. And for the first time you
feel the wind and the rain and the sun, in their immediacy, because you become
meditative. You start touching life. Then life is no longer a word but a tangible reality;
then love is no longer a word but an overflowing energy. Then blessing is no longer just
a desire, a hope -- you feel it, you have it, you are it.HE MEDITATES.... Buddha is not for prayer, he is for meditation, because prayer is
again somehow a kind of desiring. When you pray, you desire. Prayer is always for the
future; prayer means you are asking for something. You may not be asking for money,
you may be asking for God himself, but it is the same. Ask, and you have moved away.
Meditation is a state of nonasking, nonquestioning, nonthinking. Prayer is still part of
thinking -- a beautiful thinking, but thinking is thinking; a beautiful prison, but a prison
is still a prison.
And the mind who prays is greedy, and the mind who prays goes through no
transformation. It remains the same mind. And the prayer is born out of the same mind;
it cannot have a very different quality. How can you pray for something which is
different from you? -- it will be your prayer. It will reflect your mind, it will come out of
your mind, it will sprout out of your mind. How can it take you beyond the mind?
Prayer cannot take you beyond the mind. Only meditation can take you beyond the
mind.
Meditation is a state of no-mind. Prayer is a state of religious mind, but mind is there.
And when it has the beautiful garment of religiousness around it, it becomes even more
dangerous.
A little boy on a picnic strays away from his family, and suddenly realizes that he is lost
and night is falling. Becoming frightened after wandering aimlessly for some time, and
shouting for his parents but receiving no answer, he kneels down and prays with
uplifted hands. "Dear Lord," he says, "please help me to find my daddy and mommy,
and I won't hit my little sister anymore, honest I won't!"
As he kneels praying, a bird flies over and drops a load of shit into his outstretched
palm. The little boy examines it and turns his eyes back to heaven.
"Oh please, Lord," he begs, "don't hand me that shit. I really and truly am lost!"
Your prayer is your prayer; it is part of you, an extension of you. It cannot help you to
surpass yourself. Meditation is the only way to surpass oneself, the only way to
transcend oneself.
And what is meditation? It does not mean meditating upon something; the English
word is misleading. In English there is no word adequate enough to translate Buddha's
word sammasati. It has been translated as meditation, as right mindfulness, as
awareness, as consciousness, alertness, watchfulness, witnessing -- but there is not
really a single word which has the quality of sammasati.
Sammasati means: consciousness is, but without any content. There is no thought, no
desire, nothing is stirred in you. You are not contemplating about God or about great
things...nature and its beauty, the Bible, the Koran, the Vedas, and their immensely
significant statements. You are not contemplating! You are not concentrating on any
special object either. You are not chanting a mantra, because those are all things of the
mind, those are all contents of the mind. You are not doing anything! The mind is
utterly empty, and you are simply there in that emptiness. A kind of presence, a purepresence, with nowhere to go -- utterly relaxed into oneself, at rest, at home. That is the
meaning of Buddha's meditation.
And nobody else has ever reached such a beautiful expression about meditation as
Buddha. Many people have attained, but nobody has been so expressive, so capable of
conveying the message, as the Buddha. HE NEVER GIVES IN TO DESIRE. HE
MEDITATES.
AND IN THE STRENGTH OF HIS RESOLVE
HE DISCOVERS TRUE HAPPINESS.
Bliss is true happiness. What you call happiness is just misery in disguise. What you call
happiness is nothing but entertainment, pleasure. It is momentary -- it cannot be true.
Truth has to have one quality, and the quality is of eternity. If something is true it is
eternal; if it is untrue it is momentary.
True happiness is found only when the mind completely ceases functioning. It does not
come from the outside. It wells up within your own being, it starts overflowing you.
You become luminous. You become a fountain of bliss.
HE OVERCOMES DESIRE --
AND FROM THE TOWER OF WISDOM
HE LOOKS DOWN WITH DISPASSION
UPON THE SORROWING CROWD.
FROM THE MOUNTAINTOP
HE LOOKS DOWN ON THOSE
WHO LIVE CLOSE TO THE GROUND.
As someone becomes a buddha -- desire overcome, mind overcome, time overcome, the
ego transcended -- he is no longer part of this earth. He still lives on the earth, but his
soul soars so high that from the sunlit tops of his being he can see the sorrowing crowd
in the dark valleys of life, stumbling, drunken, fighting, ambitious, greedy, angry,
violent...a sheer wastage of great opportunities. Great compassion arises in his being.
His whole passion passes through dispassion and becomes compassion.
Passion means using the other as a means -- and that is the fundamental of immorality.
To use somebody as a means is the most immoral act in the world, because each person
is an end unto himself. To use him as a means is to exploit. And that's what we call love:
the husband using the wife, the wife using the husband; the children using their
parents, and the parents later on using their children -- that's what we call love!
It is not love. It is a strategy of the mind; it is poison coated with sugar. This love is
really disgusting. That's why you see the whole world in such disgust. This love is
sickening. It has sickened the whole soul of humanity because it is not love at all. It is
passion, lust, using the other as a means.
As you start meditating you move to the second stage, dispassion -- love disappears.
You come into a neutral phase; just as you change gears in the car, and each time youchange gear, the gear first has to move through neutral, so passion moves through a
neutral phase -- it becomes dispassion. Love disappears. For the time being, in the
interval, the man who is moving towards buddhahood becomes utterly cold,
dispassionate.
And then the third stage is reached. When he has attained buddhahood, he has found
bliss and the inexhaustible fountains of bliss -- aes dhammo sanantano -- when he has
found the principle of eternity, when he has found the inexhaustible treasure of life, he
starts overflowing. Love comes back -- in fact, love comes for the first time. It is
compassion. Now he showers his compassion on each and everybody; whosoever
comes to him, he shares his bliss with him, he shares his way, he shares his insight.
MINDFUL AMONG THE MINDLESS,
AWAKE WHILE OTHERS DREAM,
SWIFT AS THE RACE HORSE
HE OUTSTRIPS THE FIELD.
And when you have become established in meditation and compassion you no longer
fall a victim of sleep and dream. You remain awake -- even while asleep. And then your
life becomes a straight arrow, moves with tremendous speed, with the speed of light,
towards the goal. You become, for the first time, being.
SWIFT AS THE RACE HORSE HE OUTSTRIPS THE FIELD. MINDFUL AMONG THE
MINDLESS, AWAKE WHILE OTHERS DREAM. That is the difference between
Buddha and others. Others are only dreaming, not really living; hoping to live some
day, preparing to live, but not living. And that day never comes -- before that day
comes death.
A buddha is awake. Even while he is asleep he does not dream. When desires
disappear, dreams disappear too. Dreams are desires translated into the language of
sleep. A buddha sleeps with absolute alertness. The light goes on burning within him.
The body needs rest, hence the body sleeps, but he needs no rest -- the energy is
inexhaustible. There, at the center of his being, a small light goes on burning. The whole
circumference is fast asleep, but that light is alert, awake.
We are asleep even while we are awake: he is awake even while he is asleep.
BY WATCHING
INDRA BECAME KING OF THE GODS.
HOW WONDERFUL IT IS TO WATCH,
HOW FOOLISH TO SLEEP.
THE BHIKKHU WHO GUARDS HIS MIND
AND FEARS THE WAYWARDNESS OF HIS THOUGHTS
BURNS THROUGH EVERY BOND
WITH THE FIRE OF HIS VIGILANCE.'Bhikkhu' is Buddha's word for sannyasin. 'Sannyasin' is my word for the bhikkhu. I
have not chosen Buddha's word -- for a certain reason. Bhikkhu literally means beggar.
Buddha renounced his kingdom and became a beggar. Of course, even while he is a
beggar, he walks like an emperor; of course, he is far more graceful than he ever was
before, and far richer that he ever was before. But because he renounced the kingdom,
people started calling him a bhikkhu, a beggar. And, slowly slowly, the name was
adopted by his followers too.
I don't want you to be beggars, I want you to be masters. Hence I have chosen the word
'sannyasin'. A sannyasin means one who knows how to live rightly. It is not
renunciation; on the contrary, it is rejoicing, it is celebration.
THE BHIKKHU WHO GUARDS HIS MIND AND FEARS THE WAYWARDNESS OF
HIS THOUGHTS BURNS THROUGH EVERY BOND WITH THE FIRE OF HIS
VIGILANCE.
Yes, meditation is fire -- it burns your thoughts, your desires, your memories; it burns
the past and the future. It burns your mind and the ego. It takes away all that you think
that you are. It is a death and a rebirth, a crucifixion and a resurrection. You are born
anew. You lose your own identity totally, and you attain to a new vision of life.
That vision of life is what is meant by god, dhamma, tao, logos. You can choose your
name for it because it has no name of its own. In fact it is not expressible at all; it can
only be indicated, hinted at.
THE BHIKKHU WHO GUARDS HIS MIND
AND FEARS HIS OWN CONFUSION
CANNOT FALL.
HE HAS FOUND THE WAY TO PEACE.
Mind is confusion. Thoughts and thoughts -- thousands of thoughts clamoring,
clashing, fighting with each other, fighting for your attention. Thousands of thoughts
pulling you into thousands of directions. It is a miracle how you go on keeping yourself
together. Somehow you manage this togetherness -- it is only somehow, it is only a
facade. Deep behind it there is a clamoring crowd, a civil war, a continuous civil war.
Thoughts fighting with each other, thoughts wanting you to fulfill them. It is a great
confusion, what you call your mind.
But if you are aware that the mind is confusion, and you don't get identified with the
mind, you will never fall. You will become fallproof! The mind will become impotent.
And because you will be watching continuously, your energies will slowly be
withdrawn, away from the mind; it will not be nourished any more.
And once the mind dies, you are born as a no-mind. That birth is enlightenment. That
birth brings you for the first time to the land of peace, the lotus paradise. It brings you
to the world of bliss, benediction. Otherwise you remain in hell. Right now you are in
hell. But if you resolve, if you decide, if you choose consciousness, right now you can
take a jump, a leap from hell into heaven.It is up to you: you can choose hell, you can choose heaven. Hell is cheap. Heaven needs
great effort, perseverance, resolve. Hell means you can remain unconscious, you can
remain as you are. Heaven means you have to rise above yourself, you have to
transcend. You have to move from the valley towards the peaks.
And those peaks are yours, but you have to pay for them. Climbing to those peaks is
arduous effort. Be watchful, be meditative, and one day you will find yourself on the
sunlit peaks. That is liberation, moksha. That is nirvana -- cessation of the ego and the
birth of God.
You are entitled to be gods. If you are not, only you are responsible and nobody else.
Listen to the Buddha. Don't only listen to the Buddha -- act, be committed to the life of
consciousness, get involved.
But let me remind you again: this is only one dimension of life -- immensely rich, but
still one dimension. You will have to do something more. I am giving you a more
arduous task than Buddha did. Buddha gave you one dimension; I want you to have all
three dimensions, and a synthesis.
A new man is needed on the earth. The old is rotten and finished, it has no future, it
can't survive. It has come to the very end of its tether. It is on the deathbed. Unless a
new man is born -- East and West meeting, all three dimensions together -- humanity is
doomed.
This experiment that I am doing here is just to create the first specimen of the new man.
You are participating in a great experiment of tremendous import. Feel blessed. Feel
fortunate. You may not be aware of what you are participating in, but you may create
history! It all depends on how committed, how involved you become with me and with
my experiment.
This is the greatest synthesis possible, that has ever been tried....
Enough for today.The Dhammapada: The Way of the Buddha, Vol 1
Chapter #8
Chapter title: The beginning of a new phase
28 June 1979 am in Buddha Hall
The first question:
Question 1
BELOVED MASTER,
I NEVER DID GET TURNED ON BY CLASSICAL MUSIC, AND ART GALLERIES
BORED ME SILLY. SO, IS IT POSSIBLE TO GO FROM THE FIRST LAYER, THE
HEAD, TO THE THIRD LAYER, THE CENTER, AND SORT OF BYPASS ALL THIS
AESTHETIC GARBAGE?
Nirgun, yes, it is true: in the name of aesthetics, there is much garbage. But when I use
the word 'aesthetics' I don't mean the garbage collected in the museums and art
galleries.
When I use the word 'aesthetics' I mean a quality in you. It has nothing to do with
objects -- paintings, music, poetry -- it has something to do with a quality in your being,
a sensitivity, a love for beauty, a sensitivity for the texture and taste of things, for the
eternal dance that goes on all around, an awareness of it, a silence to hear this cuckoo
calling from the distance....
It is not garbage: it is the very core of existence.
But I can understand that you must be getting bored with the so-called classical music
and paintings collected in the art galleries. And you must be a little bit puzzled why
people go on talking so much about all this nonsense.
Aesthetics is just an artistic approach towards life, a poetic vision. Seeing colors so
totally that each tree becomes a painting, that each cloud brings the presence of God,
that colors are more colorful, that you don't go on ignoring the radiance of things, that
you remain alert, aware, loving, that you remain receptive, welcoming, open. That's
what I mean by the aesthetic attitude, the aesthetic approach.
Music has to be in your heart, your very being has to be musical, it has to become a
harmony. A man can exist as a chaos or as a cosmos. Music is the way from chaos to
cosmos. A man can exist as a disorder, a discord, just noise, a market place, or a man
can exist as a temple, a sacred silence, where celestial music is heard on its own,
uncreated music is heard on its own.
The Zen people call it the sound of one hand clapping. In India, for centuries mystics
have been talking about anahat nad -- the unstruck sound. It is there in your very being;
you need not go anywhere to listen to it. It is the ancientmost music, and the latest too.
It is both the oldest and the newest. And it is the music of your own being, the hum of
your own existence. And if you can't hear it, you are deaf.And there is no way, Nirgun, to bypass it. Museums you can bypass, art galleries you
can bypass -- in fact, you should bypass them. You need not be worried about art and
art criticism -- forget all about it. But you have to become an artist of life itself.
I say Buddha is a poet, although he never composed a single poem. Still I insist that he
is one of the greatest poets who has ever lived. He was not a Shakespeare, a Milton, a
Kalidas, a Rabindranath -- no, not at all. But still I say: Shakespeare, Milton, Kalidas,
Rabindranath, are nothing compared to his poetry. His life was his poetry -- the way he
walked, the way he looked at things....
Just the other night I came across one of the most beautiful statements of Saint Teresa of
Avila. She says: All that you need is to look. Her whole message is contained in this
simple statement: All that you need is to look. The capacity to look -- and you will find
God. The capacity to hear -- and you will find his music. The capacity to touch -- and
every texture becomes his texture. Touch the rock and you find God.
It is not a question of objects of art: it is a question of an inner approach, a vision -- of
seeing things artistically. And, Nirgun, you have that quality! In fact, because of that
quality you were bored by classical music and you were bored by galleries -- because in
an unconscious way, in a groping way, you feel something far superior inside you. But
you are not yet fully aware of it.
Bypass the art galleries and you will not be losing anything. But you cannot bypass the
aesthetic layer of your being: you have to go through it. Otherwise you will always
remain impoverished; something will be missing, something of immense value. Your
enlightenment will never be total. A part of your being will remain unenlightened; a
corner of your soul will remain dark -- and that corner will remain heavy on you. One
has to become totally enlightened. Nothing should be bypassed, no shortcuts are to be
invented. One has to move very naturally through all the layers, because all those layers
are opportunities to grow.
Remember it: whenever I use the words 'music' or 'poetry' or 'painting' or 'sculpture', I
have my own meaning.
When Helen Keller, the blind woman, came to India, she visited Jawaharlal Nehru. She
was blind, deaf. She touched Nehru's face; with both her hands she felt Nehru's face,
and she was immensely delighted. She expressed her great joy. She stated, "I have felt
the same quality in Nehru's face as I felt when I touched beautiful Roman statues -- the
same coolness and the same proportion and the same form."
Now this woman has a heart of a sculptor -- blind, deaf, but she has the genius of a
great artist. Because she was deaf and blind, she had to find new ways to feel life. And
sometimes curses prove blessings. She would touch water, she would feel its coolness,
its flow, its life, its vibe. You will never feel it, because you can see the water; you can
say, "What is there?" Because she could not see, she could only feel the texture of a
rock...you can see and you will miss -- you will not feel the texture of it.
Sometimes it is tremendously significant to close your eyes and just touch the rock, and
feel as if you are blind and you have only hands and you have to use the hands as youreyes. And you will be surprised -- you are in for a surprise. For the first time you will
see that the texture has its own dimension.
Because she had no eyes and no ears, her sense of smell was just at the optimum. She
could feel the perfume of things, of people. She could discriminate between one tree
and another tree just by the fragrance of it. She could even distinguish persons just by
their smell.
Now she is as aesthetic as any Picasso, Dali, Van Gogh -- or even more so.
Nirgun, the aesthetic garbage is certainly there, because whatsoever man creates in his
unconsciousness is bound to be garbage. The paintings of Picasso represent the mind of
Picasso. Now this man seems to be insane somewhere deep down. In fact, his paintings
are a way to remain sane; his paintings are cathartic. What you do in your Dynamic
Meditation he is doing through his paintings: throwing out tensions, nightmares, all the
ugliness that is in the mind. It has to be thrown out of the system, and it can be done
through painting very easily.
Carl Gustav Jung used to tell his patients to paint. And many insane people have
painted really beautiful paintings. But, certainly, those paintings are insane! How can
an insane person paint a sane painting? It may have a certain beauty of its own -- the
beauty of insanity -- it may have a certain proportion, a certain arrangement of colors,
or it may even have a certain vision, but something of his insanity is bound to be
lurking there around it. And Jung became aware, slowly slowly, that through painting
insane people can be helped tremendously -- painting can become a therapy. And,
certainly, he is right. If you can paint your nightmares, you will be getting free from
them. It is an expression! Expression always brings freedom. Repression brings
bondage, expression brings freedom. And this is one of the beautiful ways to express, to
paint.
If you are afraid of death, tortured by the idea of death, if you have nightmares about
death, and you can paint many paintings of death, you will get rid of those ideas. You
have brought them to the conscious from the unconscious. Anything that is brought to
the conscious from the unconscious, you become free of it.
But humanity has been doing just the opposite. We have been told for centuries to
throw things from the conscious to the unconscious -- that's what repression is. Yes, in a
way, you appear to have got free of them, but not really. In fact, they have gone deeper
in you, they have sunk deeper in you. They will trouble you even more. Now they will
control you from the unconscious and you will not even be aware of them.
The whole approach of psychoanalysis is against repression: bring all that is repressed
in the unconscious to the conscious. It can be done in many ways. Psychoanalysis is the
longest route; it takes three years, six years, even ten. Then too the analysis is never
complete. There is not a single person in the whole world whose psychoanalysis is
complete and finished.
It cannot be finished, because the process is slow. Twice a week or thrice a week you see
your psychoanalyst; lying on the psychoanalyst's couch you throw out your garbage for
one hour. He listens patiently -- at least he pretends that he is listening patiently. Andbecause he is listening you go on bringing it out. He gives you encouragement, so you
go on digging deeper and deeper, and you bring things from the unconscious to the
conscious. His presence, his expertise, his name, his authority, make you courageous.
You are not afraid of bringing things up which would scare you if you brought them up
when you were alone -- because you would see yourself on the verge of going mad. But
his authority and his presence...and that may be only in your belief, because he himself
may be more insane than you are. But you can have just the belief that he knows that he
will be able to help, that he is there, so you need not be afraid; you can go and dig deep
into your unconscious.
The more you bring to the conscious, the more you are freed -- it is very unburdening.
But once, twice or thrice a week you unburden, and the whole week you go on
gathering again. The three hours' doing is undone; you remain the same. It becomes a
vicious circle. In the society, in the family, you again accumulate repressions, and you
go to the analyst and you express those suppressions. A little bit unburdened, you are
back in the society -- the same society, the same people. You listen to the same priest,
you read the same newspaper, you go to the same political rally. You remain a
communist or you remain a Catholic. The same wife, the same husband, the same
children, the same people to associate with.... Again repression happens.
This is a very temporary relief.
Many other ways are being found. Painting is one of the ways -- far more significant,
because the unconscious knows the language of pictures and not the language of words.
The unconscious expresses itself in pictures. That's why in your dreams your
unconscious expresses itself more adequately. Hence the psychoanalyst wants to know
about your dreams more and more. Dreams are a pictorial, primitive language,
unsophisticated, more innocent. And that's exactly what happens when you paint.
Painting is bringing your dreams out into the light -- it can help tremendously. My own
feeling is that if Picasso had been prevented from painting he would have gone mad. It
was his painting that saved him -- although he was unaware that it was his painting
that was saving him. But his painting has the quality of madness in it.
If you look at a Picasso painting and meditate over it you will feel dizzy, you will feel
uneasy, you will feel tense, you will not feel relaxed. And if you live in a room where on
all the walls are Picasso paintings, there is every danger that you will have nightmares,
or you may go mad. Those paintings will provoke your insanity.
So, Nirgun, you can avoid the art galleries, you can bypass Picassos, but you cannot
bypass the aesthetic layer of your being. You cannot bypass the aesthetic dimension;
otherwise you will remain impoverished, lopsided, something will be missing in you.
And I would not like anything to be missing in my sannyasins. They have to be as
scientific as possible. I don't mean -- again remember -- that you have to become a
physicist or a chemist or a biologist or a physiologist. I don't mean that! When I say you
have to be a scientist, I mean you have to be scientific -- it is a metaphor. Always
remember: I am talking in metaphors and similes and parables.
You have to be scientific. To approach the world, the objective world, rightly, the only
way is science. If the Bible says that the earth is not round but flat, don't believe in it --be scientific. The earth is round and not flat. The Bible has no right to say anything
about something objective. The Bible is a religious book; it has its own dimension. Don't
confuse these dimensions.
Because of this confusion there has arisen a great conflict between science and religion.
There is no need at all. Science has its own realm, its own territory. First the priests
started interfering with science; now, the whole story is again being repeated in the
opposite order. Now scientists are trying to interfere in the world of religion.
Don't ask a scientist whether God exists or not -- that is none of his business. What does
he know about God? That is not his dimension. And whatsoever he says about God is
stupid; whatsoever he says is going to be wrong.
It is like asking a great doctor about poetry -- he may be a great doctor, a great
physician, but asking him about poetry just because he is a great physician is foolish. Or
asking a great poet about your illness because he is a great poet...you can see the
stupidity of it. You will not go to a great poet to be diagnosed just because he is a great
poet. You will go to a doctor -- he may not be a poet at all.
The scientist has no right to say anything about the interiority of humanity -- that is not
his world. But now he is interfering. He is doing the same wrong that the priests have
been doing for centuries.
Galileo was called by the pope, forced in his old age to apologize because he had said
that it is not the sun that goes round the earth, but the earth that goes round the sun.
Now, it is against the Bible. The priests were very much annoyed: "How can you deny
the Bible? Who are you?" In his old age -- he was seventy, ill, bed-ridden -- he was
forced to go to the court, he was forced to kneel down before the pope, and he was
asked to apologize.
He must have been a man of humor, he must have had a great sense of humor. He said,
"Yes, sir, I apologize. I declare that the Bible is right, that the earth does not go round
the sun but the sun goes round the earth. Are you satisfied, sir?"
And they were all happy. They said, "We are satisfied."
And then Galileo laughed. He said, "But whatsoever I say, it makes no difference -- the
earth goes round the sun. My statements, what do they mean? What can they do? What
can I do? My saying it won't help -- the earth won't listen. But I apologize, I am wrong
and the Bible is right. But remember well: the earth goes round the sun -- it has no
obligation to fulfill my desire. I would like it to go according to the Bible and according
to you, but I am helpless, utterly helpless."
The Bible has many unscientific statements, the Vedas have many unscientific
statements. All old scriptures have many unscientific statements, for a certain reason:
because in those days there was no science as a separate phenomenon. The religious
scripture was the only scripture available. So it used to collect everything; whatever
knowledge was available was collected in the scripture. It contains art, it contains
mathematics, it contains geography, it contains history, it contains science -- it containseverything that was available. And the knowledge was so small that it could be
contained in a single scripture.
But now, centuries have passed, man has grown, has come of age. Now, science has its
own world. We should drop all that is scientific from the religious scriptures -- they
have nothing to do with it. Neither does science have anything to do with religious
scriptures or the religious dimension. But this is how stupid minds go on quarreling.
I would like you to be scientific -- as far as the world is concerned, be scientific. As far as
your inner reality is concerned, be religious. And there is a world between the two, the
world of in-between, the twilight world, where the objective and the subjective meet.
That is the world of aesthetics. About that, be an artist, be a poet, be a musician.
All these dimensions fulfilled and you will become spiritual; all these dimensions
enriched will make you the fourth man, the spiritual man. My sannyasins have to be the
fourth -- integrated, whole. Nothing has to be bypassed, Nirgun. Everything has to be
lived, loved, experienced. Everything has to be absorbed, so that you become as rich as
it is possible to become.
The second question:
Question 2
BELOVED MASTER,
WILL YOU SAY SOMETHING MORE ABOUT RELAXATION? I AM AWARE OF A
TENSION DEEP AT THE CORE OF ME AND SUSPECT THAT I HAVE PROBABLY
NEVER BEEN TOTALLY RELAXED.
WHEN YOU SAID THE OTHER DAY THAT TO RELAX IS ONE OF THE MOST
COMPLEX PHENOMENA POSSIBLE, I GLIMPSED A RICH TAPESTRY IN WHICH
THE THREADS OF RELAXATION AND LET-GO WERE DEEPLY INTERWOVEN
WITH TRUST, AND THEN LOVE CAME INTO IT, AND ACCEPTANCE, GOING
WITH THE FLOW, UNION AND ECSTASY....
Anurag, total relaxation is the ultimate. That's the moment when one becomes a
buddha. That is the moment of realization, enlightenment, christ-consciousness. You
cannot be totally relaxed right now. At the innermost core a tension will persist.
But start relaxing. Start from the circumference -- that's where we are, and we can start
only from where we are. Relax the circumference of your being -- relax your body, relax
your behavior, relax your acts. Walk in a relaxed way, eat in a relaxed way, talk, listen
in a relaxed way. Slow down every process. Don't be in a hurry and don't be in haste.
Move as if all eternity is available to you -- in fact, it is available to you. We are here
from the beginning and we are going to be here to the very end, if there is a beginning
and there is an end. In fact, there is no beginning and no end. We have always been
here and we will be here always. Forms go on changing, but not the substance;
garments go on changing, but not the soul.
Tension means hurry, fear, doubt. Tension means a constant effort to protect, to be
secure, to be safe. Tension means preparing for the tomorrow now, or for the afterlife --
afraid tomorrow you will not be able to face the reality, so be prepared. Tension meansthe past that you have not lived really but only somehow bypassed; it hangs, it is a
hangover, it surrounds you.
Remember one very fundamental thing about life: any experience that has not been
lived will hang around you, will persist: "Finish me! Live me! Complete me!" There is an
intrinsic quality in every experience that it tends and wants to be finished, completed.
Once completed, it evaporates; incomplete, it persists, it tortures you, it haunts you, it
attracts your attention. It says, "What are you going to do about me? I am still
incomplete -- fulfill me!"
Your whole past hangs around you with nothing completed -- because nothing has
been lived really, everything somehow bypassed, partially lived, only so-so, in a
lukewarm way. There has been no intensity, no passion. You have been moving like a
somnambulist, a sleepwalker. So that past hangs, and the future creates fear. And
between the past and the future is crushed your present, the only reality.
You will have to relax from the circumference. The first step in relaxing is the body.
Remember as many times as possible to look in the body, whether you are carrying
some tension in the body somewhere -- at the neck, in the head, in the legs. Relax it
consciously. Just go to that part of the body, and persuade that part, say to it lovingly
"Relax!"
And you will be surprised that if you approach any part of your body, it listens, it
follows you -- it is your body! With closed eyes, go inside the body from the toe to the
head searching for any place where there is a tension. And then talk to that part as you
talk to a friend; let there be a dialogue between you and your body. Tell it to relax, and
tell it, "There is nothing to fear. Don't be afraid. I am here to take care -- you can relax."
Slowly slowly, you will learn the knack of it. Then the body becomes relaxed.
Then take another step, a little deeper; tell the mind to relax. And if the body listens,
mind also listens, but you cannot start with the mind -- you have to start from the
beginning. You cannot start from the middle. Many people start with the mind and they
fail; they fail because they start from a wrong place. Everything should be done in the
right order.
If you become capable of relaxing the body voluntarily, then you will be able to help
your mind relax voluntarily. Mind is a more complex phenomenon. Once you have
become confident that the body listens to you, you will have a new trust in yourself.
Now even the mind can listen to you. It will take a little longer with the mind, but it
happens.
When the mind is relaxed, then start relaxing your heart, the world of your feelings,
emotions -- which is even more complex, more subtle. But now you will be moving with
trust, with great trust in yourself. Now you will know it is possible. If it is possible with
the body and possible with the mind, it is possible with the heart too. And then only,
when you have gone through these three steps, can you take the fourth. Now you can
go to the innermost core of your being, which is beyond body, mind, heart: the very
center of your existence. And you will be able to relax it too.And that relaxation certainly brings the greatest joy possible, the ultimate in ecstasy,
acceptance. You will be full of bliss and rejoicing. Your life will have the quality of
dance to it.
The whole of existence is dancing, except man. The whole of existence is in a very
relaxed movement; movement there is, certainly, but it is utterly relaxed. Trees are
growing and birds are chirping and rivers are flowing, stars are moving: everything is
going in a very relaxed way. No hurry, no haste, no worry, and no waste. Except man.
Man has fallen a victim of his mind.
Man can rise above gods and fall below animals. Man has a great spectrum. From the
lowest to the highest, man is a ladder.
Anurag, start from the body, and then go, slowly slowly, deeper. And don't start with
anything else unless you have first solved the primary. If your body is tense, don't start
with the mind. Wait. Work on the body. And just small things are of immense help.
You walk at a certain pace; that has become habitual, automatic. Now try to walk
slowly. Buddha used to say to his disciples, "Walk very slowly, and take each step very
consciously." If you take each step very consciously, you are bound to walk slowly. If
you are running, hurrying, you will forget to remember. Hence Buddha walks very
slowly.
Just try walking very slowly, and you will be surprised -- a new quality of awareness
starts happening in the body. Eat slowly, and you will be surprised -- there is great
relaxation. Do everything slowly...just to change the old pattern, just to come out of old
habits.
First the body has to become utterly relaxed, like a small child, then only start with the
mind. Move scientifically: first the simplest, then the complex, then the more complex.
And then only can you relax at the ultimate core.
You ask me, Anurag, "Will you say something more about relaxation? I am aware of a
tension deep in the core of me and suspect that I have probably never been totally
relaxed."
That is the situation of every human being. It is good that you are aware -- millions are
unaware of it. You are blessed that you are aware, because if you are aware then
something can be done. If you are not aware, then nothing is possible. Awareness is the
beginning of transformation.
And you say, "When you said the other day that to relax is one of the most complex
phenomena possible, I glimpsed a rich tapestry in which the threads of relaxation and
let-go were deeply interwoven with trust, and then love came into it, and acceptance,
going with the flow, union and ecstasy...."
Yes, Anurag, relaxation is one of the most complex phenomena -- very rich,
multidimensional. All these things are part of it: let-go, trust, surrender, love,
acceptance, going with the flow, union with existence, egolessness, ecstasy. All these are
part of it, and all these start happening if you learn the ways of relaxation.
Your so-called religions have made you very tense, because they have created guilt in
you. My effort here is to help you get rid of all guilt and all fear. I would like to tell you:
there is no hell and no heaven. So don't be afraid of hell and don't be greedy for heaven.All that exists is this moment. You can make this moment a hell or a heaven -- that
certainly is possible -- but there is no heaven or hell somewhere else. Hell is when you
are all tense, and heaven is when you are all relaxed. Total relaxation is paradise.
The third question:
Question 3
BELOVED MASTER,
EVERY TIME YOU HAVE SPOKEN ON A MASTER, I HAVE FELT YOU TO BE IN
LOVE WITH THAT MASTER AND YOU FLOWING THROUGH HIS SUTRAS. IN
THIS SERIES THOUGH, I FEEL YOU STANDING APART FROM THE BUDDHA AND
NOT REALLY IN LOVE WITH HIS WORK.
IS SOMETHING CHANGING OR AM I IMAGINING THINGS?
Nishant, you are not imagining things. With me, you will have to be always on the
move -- things will be changing. As you grow up I will be telling you things which I
could not tell you before. It is not that my love for Buddha is less -- my love cannot be
less or more; my love is just love, it is a quality, it has no quantitative dimension to it. It
can never be less or more -- it simply is.
I love Buddha, I love Jesus, I love Zarathustra, I love Lao Tzu, I love Patanjali --
BECAUSE I love...because I love you, because I love the trees, because I love the birds.
My love is not less.
And you are perfectly right that I am standing apart -- I will be standing apart more and
more in the future. I am preparing for the new phase. The work has to take a quantum
leap, and much preparation is needed. The work has to take on a totally different
quality now. Now I have people with me of great trust, of love, people who are
committed and surrendered.
In the beginning I was talking to the masses. It was a totally different kind of work: I
was in search of disciples. Talking to the masses I was using their language; talking to
the masses was talking to a primary class. You can't go very deep; you have to talk
superficially. You have to look to whom you are talking.
Then, slowly slowly, a few people started turning from students to disciples. Then my
approach changed. It was now possible to communicate on higher levels. Then disciples
started changing into sannyasins -- they started becoming committed, they started
becoming involved with me, with my destiny. My life became their life, my being
became their being. Now communication took a jump: it became communion.
Now I have got enough sannyasins...the work will have to move deeper.
I was talking about Buddha before, and I was talking as if I was simply allowing him to
flow through me. Now this is not going to be the case. This series is the beginning of a
new phase.
Nishant, you have suspected rightly. Now I will have to make it clear what the points
are in which I differ from Buddha, from Jesus, from Krishna. I have to make it very clear
where I differ from them.Twenty-five centuries have passed since Buddha. Much has happened since then --
much water has flowed down the Ganges. Everything has changed! If Buddha comes
into the world he will not be able to recognize that it is the same world that he had left.
I belong to this century. In these twenty-five centuries many new things have been
added. For example, Buddha knew nothing about science -- he could not. I am not
saying that he should have known -- he could not! It was impossible. Albert Einstein
had not happened yet. Buddha was not aware of many things of which we are aware, I
am aware. I have to incorporate all those things. Sigmund Freud and Karl Marx and
Albert Einstein and many more have to be incorporated. Religion has to become more
and more rich every day.
I will have to make it clear where I differ. I will have to make clear what MORE I am
trying to add to the religious heritage. I will not be just a vehicle anymore. That phase is
complete. It was needed up to now, because I wanted...the people who loved Buddha, I
wanted to approach them; the people who loved Mahavira, I wanted to approach them;
the people who loved Jesus, I wanted to approach them.
Humanity is divided: a few are with Jesus, a few are with Buddha, a few are with
Krishna...and so on and so forth. There are no free human beings available. I had to pick
and choose from different sects, from different communities, from different religions.
The only way was: to speak the way Buddha spoke, then only would a few Buddhists
become involved with me; otherwise it would have been impossible for them, they
would not have understood me. Now they have become involved with me it is going to
be a totally different matter. Now their love has arisen for me, it is easy for me to say
where I differ from Buddha and they will be able to understand. It won't create any
trouble for them, it will not be confusing to them.
But remember, my love is not less because I am standing apart: my love is the same. My
love is not going to change; it is not something that can change. But more and more it
will happen: I will stand apart and separate.
Now I have got my own people. And I have to make it very clear where I differ, where I
am trying to give something new, something more; where I am trying to enrich the
heritage, where I am contributing. And sometimes I will have to criticize too -- but I
love so much that I can criticize.
Sometimes I am going to criticize Buddha, Mahavira, Jesus. Not that I don't love them --
I love them, otherwise why should I speak on them? Even if I criticize them, that means
my love is so much that I will take even that trouble, to criticize them.
Buddha has given much to humanity, but humanity is an on-going process. And
everything that happens to humanity brings its advantages and also brings its
disadvantages.
In this world, nothing can remain absolutely pure. When it rains the water is pure. The
moment it touches the earth...in fact even before that: the moment it enters into the
atmosphere, the polluted air starts contaminating it. The earth is surrounded by a thick
layer of air; when the water enters into this layer of air, it starts becoming polluted. And
when it falls on the earth it becomes muddy, it becomes dirty. Still it is water, but it is
no longer pure.That's what happens to every truth. When Buddha uttered something, it was absolutely
pure. The moment it was heard by people it became impure. When it was recorded --
and remember it was recorded after many years, after three hundred years...now can
you imagine that people can record after three hundred years exactly the same thing
that Buddha said? It is impossible! People are people; they will automatically destroy it,
distort it -- they will give their own colors to it.
The day Buddha died, his followers were divided into thirty-six schools -- immediately!
Thirty-six interpretations. Nobody was agreeing on what he said, or even if they were
agreeing about the words, they were not agreeing about the meaning that was given to
the words.
I am reminded:
In the last year of his life, Sigmund Freud called all his disciples -- the important ones,
the chief ones. He was feeling death coming close by, he must have heard the first steps
of death, and he wanted to have a last gathering.
They were sitting at the table, nearabout thirty people from all over the world -- all the
chief disciples -- and they started arguing about something that Freud had said a few
days before. Freud was there! He was the host, but they completely forgot about Freud.
They became so involved in the argument: somebody was saying one thing, and
somebody else was saying something else, and somebody else was contradicting both.
And they were arguing about what Freud really meant.... And Freud watched, listened,
and then shouted, "Stop all this nonsense! Do you think I am dead? I am here, present --
why don't you ask me what my meaning was? And if you can do this to me while I am
alive, what are you going to do when I am dead? You don't bother to ask me, and you
have wasted one hour in arguing with each other, fighting, getting irritated, annoyed,
shouting at each other...and the master is present!"
And Freud is not an enlightened man. If this can happen to an unenlightened person,
what about the Buddha who speaks from the highest peaks of existence? The moment
he utters something, it is no longer the same as it was in his heart. When it is heard, it is
no longer the same as it was uttered. When it is interpreted, it is totally something else.
Many times I will criticize. Many times I will tell you about all the advantages and all
the disadvantages that have happened. Buddha is the purest religious dimension, the
purest possible, but how can I avoid saying that he is a one-dimensional man? If I don't
say it, it will be untrue. If I don't say it, my love for truth is not total then. I have to say
it, that he is one-dimensional -- the purest in his dimension, but he lacks the other
dimensions.
He has no appreciation of beauty, not at all. He has no appreciation of music, not at all.
He has no appreciation of love, not at all. The aesthetic dimension is missing, he has
bypassed it. And he has no scientific approach; he cannot have -- science was not yet
developed enough. He is one-dimensional purity, but one-dimensional.
And because he is one-dimensional, this whole country has remained one-dimensional.
Buddha is one-dimensional, Mahavira is one-dimensional, Patanjali is one-dimensional.All the great religious masters of this country were religious people. They reached to
the purest religious experience, and they tried to convert the whole country to their
vision. But the disadvantage was that the country became poor. Without science no
country can ever become rich. The country became outwardly ugly, starving, ill.
Without science and technology, no country can be outwardly beautiful, healthy,
affluent.
Now, I cannot avoid mentioning it -- that will not be true, and that will not be right
either. That will be deceiving you! That will be a crime against humanity. It is time that
somebody should have the guts to say it! Nobody in the whole world is doing it, and
the time is ripe that somebody should shout and say that Buddha, Mahavira, Patanjali,
Lao Tzu, are immensely beautiful people, and they have contributed much -- humanity
would not have been what it is without them -- they are our very soul, that is absolutely
true, but there is a disadvantage because they are all one-dimensional. Other
dimensions have remained paralyzed, crippled. And now the time has come: other
dimensions have to be fulfilled too.
I would like this country to become rich, scientific, technological, healthy, well
nourished -- not only this country but the whole of humanity. And I don't see that it is
against religion. On the contrary: the more rich a country is, the more religious it can
become -- because richness gives you opportunity, richness gives you facility, richness
gives you time and space and energy, to move inwards. If you don't move, that's your
responsibility. Nothing is wrong in being rich. If a rich person is not religious, he is
simply mediocre, stupid; it is nothing against richness: it is simply an indication that he
is foolish.
If a rich person is not religious, I call him stupid; and if a poor person is religious, I call
him intelligent, really intelligent. Rare intelligence is needed for the poor man to
become religious. When a Kabir becomes religious he shows more intelligence than
Buddha himself -- because it is impossible, almost impossible to become religious when
you are poor. When you have not known what riches are, how can you get beyond
them? One can go beyond a certain thing only when it has been experienced; it is only
through experience that one surpasses and transcends. If somebody transcends without
experiencing something, that simply means that he has such intelligence that he learns
from others' experiences; he need not go into all those things on his own.
Kabir must have looked at the rich people and seen the futility of it all. Hence he
dropped that ambition, that desire. Buddha was the son of a king; he lived richly, and
through experience he came to understand that all is futile and all is vanity. He came
through his own experience: Kabir came by watching others' experiences. Certainly,
Kabir needs more intelligence.
Poor persons can become religious, but poor societies cannot become religious. Rich
persons may avoid religion, but rich societies cannot avoid religion.
Now, this new dimension has to be added. Religion need not worship poverty. Religion
need not console poor people by saying false things to them, by consoling them, by
giving them invented theories of past lives and future lives and fate, etcetera. The wholeearth is now capable of becoming affluent. Science has released so much power -- but it
has to be used rightly!
Hence I am not in favor of the Western approach. The West is missing the soul, the very
soul -- it is only a body. And the danger is that the stupid politicians in the East are
going to imitate the West.
Now, every country wants to create atomic energy -- even India. Poor countries like
India or Pakistan, they want to create atomic bombs. Why? People are poor and
starving.
Just a few days ago, India launched a satellite, Bhaskar, into the sky, to study....
Industries don't have electricity; five days in a week, industries are being closed. You
don't have electricity, but you launch a satellite to study the possibilities of the sky --
competition, foolish competition.
Now there are five hundred man-made satellites going round the earth. One of them,
the American Skylab, is going to fall because it has gone out of control. It can create
great danger. Poona is on its way; from Bombay to Poona, and from Poona up to
Kannada, somewhere it will fall. And it will not fall in one piece in one place -- at least
five hundred pieces, and each piece will be like a bomb. It can fall on an atomic
generator and can destroy the whole earth.
And all those five hundred satellites, sooner or later, are going to go out of control. If
the American satellite can go out of control, what about the Indian? Just two years ago,
India launched its first satellite. Now it is functioning almost like an Indian -- the name
of the satellite was Aryabhatta -- now it goes on giving wrong information. It is a
nuisance! You cannot believe it. In the beginning they used to believe it, but then they
found that it was giving absolutely wrong information. How like the Indian mind! How
representative! Now they want to get rid of it, they want it to shut up, but it won't...it
continues to send information. You cannot shut it up.
Poor countries imitating the West -- the whole thing is so foolish. The poor countries
certainly need more scientific understanding, but they don't need sophisticated
scientific instruments -- that is not their need.
And now science has released enough energy for the whole earth to be transformed into
a paradise.
Buddha has contributed immensely, but as a side effect he has been one of the causes of
India's poverty. I cannot ignore that fact. I have to state it. I have not stated it up to now,
but now I have my own people who will understand.
Mahavira has contributed tremendously to India's spiritual enrichment, but the by-
product of his teachings has been slavery for one thousand years; because of his
teaching of nonviolence, India became one of the most cowardly countries in the world.
Now, Krishna is right in saying to leave everything to God -- in the religious dimension
that's how things should be: trust God. But not in the scientific dimension -- there is a
totally different mechanism that functions: doubt, not trust. Trust is the foundation of
the religious world, doubt the foundation of the scientific world.
Krishna is perfectly right when he says to Arjuna, "Trust God! Surrender to God. Trust
that whatsoever he is doing is right." Now, what has been the side effect? The side effecthas been: "If you are poor, trust God; if you are ill, trust God. Whatsoever he is doing is
right." This is the side effect. In the religious dimension it is perfectly right, but when
you bring it to the scientific dimension it becomes absolutely wrong.
Now I have to say it. And I know I am going to suffer much because of these
statements, because in India people are not accustomed to hearing any criticism of
Krishna, Mahavira or Buddha -- no, not at all.
First I will make it clear to you where I differ. And soon I will start criticizing the side
effects too.
Nishant, wait a little more, because I have to tell you the whole truth -- the whole truth
as it is, whatsoever the consequences. I will appreciate whatsoever is worth
appreciating and I will condemn whatsoever needs to be condemned.
India's poverty, slavery, long long suffering, cannot simply be tolerated, ignored. And
Krishna, Mahavira and Buddha cannot be forgiven -- they are responsible. If they are to
be praised for what they have contributed to the spiritual, they have to be criticized too
because they have been the root cause of India's fall.
And now the time has come when everything should be put right. And it is not only a
question of India: it is a question of the whole world. Just as Indian fools can imitate the
West, there are Western fools who can imitate India, and can go on committing the
same kind of mistakes that India has committed in the past.
We have to put things absolutely clear. We have to be very very dispassionate. That's
why, Nishant, you are feeling there is a certain difference -- there is. You are not
imagining things. My work is going into a new phase, I am entering into a new phase.
Before the new commune happens, I am preparing for it....
The last question:
Question 4
BELOVED MASTER,
WHY AM I TIRED OF SEX?
Sandhan, sex is tiring -- and that's why I say to you: Don't avoid it. Unless you know its
stupidity you will not be able to get rid of it. Unless you know its sheer wastage, you
will not be able to transcend it.
It is good that you have started feeling tired -- that is natural. Sex simply means energy
being dissipated downwards. The energy has to move upwards, then it is nourishing.
Then it opens inexhaustible treasures in you -- aes dhammo sanantano. But if you go on
and on into sex like a maniac, soon you will find yourself utterly exhausted, wasted.
A newly married couple go to Niagara Falls for their honeymoon. When they arrive,
they immediately check into a hotel and are not heard of for three days, no room service
or anything. After a while the manager gets a bit worried, so he decides to check up on
them.
He knocks on the door, hears a little scurrying in the room, and then a pale-looking man
opens the door with just his shorts on. "We were worried," said the manager."Well, we just got married," replied the man.
"I understand," says the manager, "but you have one of the great wonders of the
world...."
At that a tiny voice from the back of the room interrupts, "If you show that thing to me
one more time, I will jump out of the window."
You don't get it! ...Three days continuously -- the woman is bound to jump out of the
window.
Man can go on living stupidly only to a certain extent -- beyond that he has to become
aware of what he is doing to himself. Sandhan, it is time now. There are far more
important things in life than sex. Sex is not all. It is significant, but not all. If you remain
trapped in it you will miss all the glories of life.
And I am not against sex, remember. That's why my teaching becomes a little
contradictory. I am a paradox. I cannot help it because truth itself is a paradox. I am not
against sex, because those who are against sex, they will always remain sexual. I am for
sex, because if you go deep into it you will come out of it soon. The more consciously
you go into it, the sooner you will come out of it. And the day when a person comes out
of sex totally is a day of great blessing.
It is good that you are feeling tired. Now don't go to a physician for some medicine --
that won't help, or that may only postpone your tiredness a little bit more. If you are
feeling tired that simply shows that you have come to the point from where you can
jump out of it.
What is the point of remaining in it if you are feeling tired? Get out of it! And I am not
saying repress it. When you are feeling much energy for it and you try to get out, there
will be repression. But when you are exhausted and tired and you see the futility of it,
you can come out of it without repression. And to come out of sex without repression is
to be free of it.
Freedom from sex is a great experience. Freedom from sex makes your energies
available for meditation, for samadhi.
Enough for today.The Dhammapada: The Way of the Buddha, Vol 1
Chapter #9
Chapter title: Seated in the cave of the heart
29 June 1979 am in Buddha Hall
AS THE FLETCHER WHITTLES
AND MAKES STRAIGHT HIS ARROWS,
SO THE MASTER DIRECTS
HIS STRAYING THOUGHTS.
LIKE A FISH OUT OF WATER,
STRANDED ON THE SHORE,
THOUGHTS THRASH AND QUIVER.
FOR HOW CAN THEY SHAKE OFF DESIRE?
THEY TREMBLE, THEY ARE UNSTEADY,
THEY WANDER AT THEIR WILL.
IT IS GOOD TO CONTROL THEM.
AND TO MASTER THEM BRINGS HAPPINESS.
BUT HOW SUBTLE THEY ARE,
HOW ELUSIVE!
THE TASK IS TO QUIETEN THEM,
AND BY RULING THEM TO FIND HAPPINESS.
WITH SINGLEMINDEDNESS
THE MASTER QUELLS HIS THOUGHTS.
HE ENDS THEIR WANDERING.
SEATED IN THE CAVE OF THE HEART,
HE FINDS FREEDOM.
Freedom is the goal of life. Without freedom, life has no meaning at all. By "freedom" is
not meant any political, social or economic freedom. By "freedom" is meant freedom
from time, freedom from mind, freedom from desire. The moment mind is no more,
you are one with the universe, you are as vast as the universe itself.
It is the mind that is the barrier between you and the reality, and because of this barrier
you remain confined in a dark cell where no light ever reaches and where no joy can
ever penetrate. You live in misery because you are not meant to live in such a small,
confined space. Your being wants to expand to the very ultimate source of existence.Your being longs to be oceanic, and you have become a dewdrop. How can you be
happy? How can you be blissful? Man lives in misery because man lives imprisoned.
And Gautama the Buddha says that tanha -- desire -- is the root cause of all our misery,
because desire creates the mind. Desire means creating future, projecting yourself in the
future, bringing tomorrow in. Bring the tomorrow in and the today disappears, you
cannot see it anymore; your eyes are clouded by the tomorrow. Bring the tomorrow in
and you will have to carry the load of all your yesterdays, because the tomorrow can
only be there if the yesterdays go on nourishing it.
Each desire is born out of the past and each desire is projected in the future. The past
and the future, they constitute your whole mind. Analyze the mind, dissect it, and you
will find only two things: the past and the future. You will not find even an iota of the
present, not even a single atom. And the present is the only reality, the only existence,
the only dance there is.
The present can be found only when mind has ceased utterly. When the past no more
overpowers you and the future no more possesses you, when you are disconnected
from the memories and the imaginations, in that moment where are you? who are you?
In that moment you are a nobody. And nobody can hurt you when you are a nobody,
you cannot be wounded -- because the ego is very ready to receive wounds. The ego is
almost seeking and searching to be wounded; it exists through wounds. Its whole
existence depends on misery, pain.
When you are a nobody, anguish is impossible, anxiety simply unbelievable. When you
are a nobody there is great silence, stillness, no noise inside. Past gone, future
disappeared, what is there to create noise? And the silence that is heard is celestial, is
sacred. For the first time, in those spaces of no-mind, you become aware of the eternal
celebration that goes on and on. That's what the existence is made of.
Except man, the whole existence is blissful. Only man has fallen out of it, has gone
astray. Only man can do it because only man has consciousness.
Now, consciousness has two possibilities: either it can become a bright light in you, so
bright that even the sun will look pale compared to it.... Buddha says it is as if a
thousand suns have risen suddenly -- when you look within with no mind it is all light,
eternal light. It is all joy, pure, uncontaminated, unpolluted. It is simple bliss, innocent.
It is wonder. Its majesty is indescribable, its beauty inexpressible, and its benediction
inexhaustible. Aes dhammo sanantano: so is the ultimate law.
If you can only put your mind aside you will become aware of the cosmic play. Then
you are only energy, and the energy is always herenow, it never leaves the herenow.
That is one possibility: if you become pure consciousness.
The other possibility is: you can become self-consciousness. Then you fall. Then you
become a separate entity from the world. Then you become an island, defined, well
defined. Then you are confined, because all definitions confine. Then you are in a prison
cell, and the prison cell is dark, utterly dark. There is no light, no possibility of light.
And the prison cell cripples you, paralyzes you.
Self-consciousness becomes a bondage; the self is the bondage. And just consciousness
becomes freedom.Drop the self and be conscious! That is the whole message -- the message of all the
buddhas of all the ages, past, present, future. The essential core of the message is very
simple: drop the self, the ego, the mind, and be.
Just this moment when this silence pervades...who are you? A nobody, a nonentity. You
don't have a name, you don't have a form. You are neither man nor woman, neither
Hindu nor Mohammedan. You don't belong to any country, to any nation, to any race.
You are not the body and you are not the mind.
Then what are you? In this silence, what is your taste? How does it taste to be? Just a
peace, just a silence...and out of that peace and silence a great joy starts surfacing,
welling up, for no reason at all. It is your spontaneous nature.
The art of putting the mind aside is the whole secret of religion, because as you put the
mind aside your being explodes into a thousand and one colors. You become a rainbow,
a lotus, a one-thousand-petaled lotus. Suddenly you open up, and then the whole
beauty of existence -- which is infinite! -- is yours. Then all the stars in the sky are
within you. Then even the sky is not your limit; you don't have any limits anymore.
Silence gives you a chance to melt, merge, disappear, evaporate. And when you are not,
you are -- for the first time you are. When you are not, God is, nirvana is, enlightenment
is. When you are not, all is found -- and when you are, all is lost.
Man has become a self-consciousness; that is his going astray, that is the original fall.
All the religions talk about the original fall in some way or other, but the best story is
contained in Christianity. The original fall is because man eats from the tree of
knowledge. When you eat of the tree of knowledge, the fruits of knowledge, it creates
self-consciousness.
The more knowledgeable you are, the more egoistic you are -- hence the ego of the
scholars, pundits, maulvis. The ego becomes decorated with great knowledge,
scriptures, systems of thought. But they don't make you innocent; they don't bring you
the childlike quality of openness, of trust, of love, of playfulness. Trust, love,
playfulness, wonder, all disappear when you become very knowledgeable.
And we are being taught to become knowledgeable. We are not taught to be innocent,
we are not taught how to feel the wonder of existence. We are told the names of the
flowers, but we are not taught how to dance around the flowers. We are told the names
of the mountains, but we are not taught how to commune with the mountains, how to
commune with the stars, how to commune with the trees, how to be in tune with
existence.
Out of tune, how can you be happy? Out of tune you are bound to remain in anguish, in
great misery, in pain. You can be happy only when you are dancing with the dance of
the whole, when you are just a part of the dance, when you are just a part of this great
orchestra, when you are not singing your song separately. Only then, in that melting, is
man free.
That's what freedom is. It is not political, not economic, not social. Freedom is spiritual.
The social, the economic, and the political freedom are freedoms only if they help
people to be spiritually free. If they don't help people to become spiritually free, then
they are pretenders. Then in the name of freedom man is made more and more a slave.Beautiful names become facades hiding ugly realities. If you are not spiritually free you
are not free at all. Then all your freedoms are bogus, phony, pseudo. Then you have
been duped. Then you have been given toys to play with.
Buddha is talking about the reality -- the real freedom. He calls it nirvana. The word
'nirvana' is very beautiful; it means cessation of self-consciousness, utter cessation of the
self, the naked state of egolessness. It brings great ecstasies, great harvest; inexhaustible
treasures it brings.
Hence Buddha goes on repeating again and again...two statements he repeats in THE
DHAMMAPADA. One is: aes dhammo sanantano. This is the ultimate law of life: that
you disappear and you will find yourself. Very paradoxical -- that just by disappearing
one finds. By dropping the self one becomes the ultimate self. By disappearing as a
dewdrop one becomes the ocean.
And the other statement that he repeats again and again is: aes dhammo visuddhya --
such is the law of purity, of becoming innocent, pure. What is the law of purity? A
simple law: become disidentified with the mind, don't think of yourself as a mind. Not
that Buddha is against the mind, not that he does not want you to use it -- he wants you
to use it, but not to be used by it. And usually the second is the case: the mind is using
you. You have become a slave. The master has become the slave and the slave has
become the master. Everything has gone topsy-turvy.
You are standing on your head! Now how can you walk, how can you move, how can
you dance? Have you seen anybody dancing standing on his head? Your life will not be
a life of movement anymore if you are standing on your head. Your life will be
stagnant, it will become a dirty pool of water. You will start stinking soon. Standing on
your head you are crippled, paralyzed.
If you just stand on your legs again -- a small change, a very small change, but it brings
a radical revolution -- immediately you are capable of movement, and movement is life.
Not to move is to die.
How do you define death? When a person cannot move in any possible way. He cannot
breathe -- that is one kind of movement; he cannot see -- that is another kind of
movement; he cannot walk, he cannot talk -- these are all kinds of movement, different
dimensions of movement. Because all movement has ceased we say the man is dead.
The more movement you have, the more life, the livelier you are. Have
multidimensional movement! But that is possible only if you stop standing on your
head. You have to be put right.
The day you come to me you come in a topsy-turvy state. Initiation into sannyas means
nothing except that I persuade you to stand on your feet and not to go on doing this
shirshasana -- headstand -- your whole life.
Be natural, be part of nature. Don't brag. Don't go on puffing up your egos. We are tiny
parts -- immensely beautiful if we function with the whole, but absolutely ugly if we
function against it.
But you have been told by your societies to fight, to struggle, because life is a struggle
for survival, because if you don't fight you will be defeated. And you have to be
victorious, and you have to be famous. You have been given great ambitions and allthose ambitions have become chains, all those ambitions are keeping you tethered. All
those ambitions are the root cause of your mind; they create the mind.
Buddha's word 'tanha' contains all the meanings of desire, ambition, achievement.
These are the nourishments of the mind. If you go on nourishing the mind you are
poisoning yourself. And the mind will become bigger and bigger and you will become
smaller and smaller. The mind becomes almost a cancerous growth.
Sannyas means an operation. Buddha transformed thousands of people through
sannyas, through initiation. He was a great surgeon.
And once you become aware that you are the cause of your own misery, things start
changing. You no longer help your own misery, you no longer feed it. And once you
become aware that you are not your mind but a witness to it, you start rising above the
mind, you are no longer tethered. You start growing wings, you start soaring higher
and higher. Mind remains always groping in the dark valleys of life, but you can
become an eagle, you can soar high. You can be the master and then you can use the
mind -- and very purposely it can be used.
These sutras are how to become the master of your mind. They contain the science of
becoming the master.
The Buddha says:
AS THE FLETCHER WHITTLES
AND MAKES STRAIGHT HIS ARROWS,
SO THE MASTER DIRECTS
HIS STRAYING THOUGHTS.
Now meditate: are your thoughts directing you, or do you direct your thoughts? --
because much depends on that insight. Are you being dominated by your thoughts? Do
they go on driving you hither and thither? Do they suggest to you, do they fascinate
you, do they obsess you? Do they pull your strings and are you simply a slave? Or are
you the master, and can you say to your thoughts "Stop!" and they have to stop -- can
you put them on or off?
People never meditate over it because it makes them feel very humiliated. It shows
them their impotence: they cannot even stop thoughts, their own thoughts.
There is a famous Tibetan parable:
A man served a master for many many years. The service was not pure; there was a
motivation in it. He wanted some secret from the master. He had heard that the master
has the secret -- the secret to do miracles. With this hidden desire he was serving the
master day in, day out, but he was afraid to say anything. But the master was
continuously watching his motivation.
One day the master asked, "It is better that you please speak your mind, because I am
continuously seeing a motive in all your service that you do for me. It is not out of love,
certainly not out of love. I don't see any love in it and I don't see any humility in it. It is
a kind of bribery. So please, just tell me, what do you want?"The man was waiting for this opportunity. He said, "I want the secret of doing
miracles."
The master said, "Then why did you waste your time so long? You could have said it
the very first day you had come. You tortured yourself and you tortured me too,
because I don't like people around me who have motives. They are ugly to look at. They
are basically greedy, and greed makes them ugly. The secret is simple -- why didn't you
ask me the first day? This is the secret...."
He wrote down a small mantra on a piece of paper, just three lines maybe: "Buddham
sharanam gachchhami, sangham sharanam gachchhami, dhammam sharanam
gachchhami -- I go to the feet of the Buddha, I go to the feet of the Buddha's commune, I
go to the feet of the dhamma, the ultimate law."
And the master told the man, "You take this small mantra with you, repeat it five times,
just five times. It is a simple process. Just remember one condition: while you are
repeating it, take a bath, close the door, sit silently -- and while you are repeating it,
please don't remember monkeys."
The man said, "What nonsense are you talking about? Why should I remember
monkeys in the first place? I have never remembered them my whole life!"
The master said, "That is up to you, but I have to tell you the condition. This is how the
mantra was given to me, with this condition. If you have never remembered monkeys,
so far so good. Now go home, and please never come back to me. You have the secret,
you know the condition. Fulfill the condition and you will have miraculous powers,
and whatsoever you want to do you can do: you can fly in the sky, you can read
people's thoughts, you can materialize things, and so on and so forth."
The man rushed home; he even forgot to thank the master. That's how greed functions:
it does not know thankfulness, it does not know gratitude. Greed is absolutely unaware
of gratitude; it never comes across it. Greed is a thief and thieves don't thank.
The man rushed, but he was very much puzzled: even on the way to his home monkeys
started appearing in his head. He saw many kinds of monkeys: small and big, and red-
mouthed and black-mouthed, and he was very much puzzled -- "What is happening?"
In fact he was not thinking of anything else but the monkeys. And they were becoming
bigger and they were crowding all around.
He went home, he took a bath, but the monkeys were not leaving him. Now he was
becoming suspicious that they were not going to leave him while he would be chanting
the mantra. He had not even chanted the mantra yet, he was simply preparing. And
when he closed his doors the room was full of monkeys. It was so crowded that he had
no space for himself! He closed his eyes and there were monkeys, and he opened his
eyes and there were monkeys. He could not believe what was happening! The whole
night he tried. Again and again he would take a bath, and again and again he would try
and fail, and fail utterly.
In the morning he went to the master, returned the mantra and said, "Keep this mantra
with you. This is driving me mad! I don't want to do any miracles, but please help me to
get rid of these monkeys!"It is so impossible to get rid of a single thought! And if you want to get rid of it, it
becomes even more difficult, because when you want to get rid of a thought it is a
question -- a very decisive moment -- of who is the master: the mind or you? The mind
will try in every possible way to prove that he is the master and not you.
The master has been a slave for centuries, and the slave has been the master for millions
of lives. Now the slave cannot leave all his privileges, priorities, so easily. He is going to
give you great resistance.
You try it! Today take a bath, close your doors, repeat this simple mantra: Buddham
sharanam gachchhami, sangham sharanam gachchhami, dhammam sharanam
gachchhami -- and don't let the monkeys come to you....
You are laughing at the poor man. You will be surprised: you are that man.
Sigmund Freud used to tell another story:
It happened once in a big hotel that a man came to stay. The manager was a little
hesitant in giving him a room although there was an empty room. The man said, "Why
are you hesitating so much?"
The man said, "The reason is, just below that room there is a politician staying, a very
famous man and very powerful, a big gun. And he is annoyed by small things, so we
have kept the room above him empty for three days since he has been here -- because if
anybody walks some noise is created, if you move something some noise is created, and
he becomes so irritated and so angry that he creates much fuss about it."
The stranger said, "Don't be worried! I will be very careful. Moreover, I am going to stay
only overnight. I will be coming nearabout twelve in the night because I have much
work to do in the town, and I will be leaving early in the morning, five o'clock. There is
not much possibility that between twelve and five I will do anything which will irritate
the great man. At the most I will be asleep and dreaming, and I don't think my dreams
will disturb him."
The manager was convinced: "If he is going to stay just for five hours there is no
problem." He was allowed.
At twelve the man reached his room exhausted: the whole day's work, a thousand and
one things clamoring in his head. He had completely forgotten the politician. He
entered his room. He was so tired. He sat on his bed, took off one of his shoes and
threw it in the corner of the room. Then suddenly the noise of the shoe reminded him
that maybe the politician, the great leader, would get disturbed, may be awakened. So
the other shoe he put down very silently.
After one hour the politician knocked on his door. He came out of his sleep, opened the
door and said, "Have I done anything? -- because for one hour I have been asleep."
The politician was red with anger. He said; "Yes! Where is the other shoe? I cannot
manage to sleep. That other shoe goes on hanging, a continuous question in my mind --
where has the other shoe gone? Is this man sleeping with one shoe on? One I know you
have thrown, but what happened to the other one? I have tried in every possible way to
get rid of the idea -- that this is not my concern. How am I concerned with his shoe? But
the more I have tried to get rid of the idea the more I have become possessed by it. Nowthere is only one possible way to go to sleep: to come and wake you and ask you what
happened. Unless I know I cannot sleep."
It is very difficult even to get rid of an absurd thought, utterly meaningless to you, of no
purpose, something which is just accidental, none of your business. But still it can
pursue you, it can haunt you, it can torture you. It can become such a powerful thing
that it can drive you mad.
People don't look in. They know that it is better not to look in because it is very
humiliating. To see oneself as a slave is humiliating. And the mind has been on the
throne so long, it has become accustomed to being the master. And it is not the master.
You are born as a consciousness, not as a mind. Your innermost core is consciousness,
not mind. Mind is nothing but accumulated thoughts, junk of the past. You are totally
different from it.
Watching it, slowly slowly you will see the distance. A thought arises in you, watch it.
Watch it without any judgment. Don't be for or against, simply look at it, see into it, just
like a mirror reflecting it. And one thing will become certain: that it is separate from
you. It comes and goes, and you abide forever. The reflection in the mirror is not the
mirror. Many reflections come and go, the mirror remains. The mirror is only the
capacity of mirroring. A thought is there -- anger, greed, jealousy -- some thought, some
kind of thought is there. It is not you!
But our whole training, our whole conditioning, is basically wrong. Our languages are
basically wrong because they give us wrong notions. When you see the thought of
hunger arise in your mind you immediately say, "I am hungry," which is utter
nonsense. You have never been hungry and you cannot be hungry, because
consciousness has nothing to do with hunger, food, satiation. What is actually
happening is: the body is hungry -- you are aware of it. You are simply reflecting the
situation of the body.
To be exactly precise you should say, "I am aware that my body is hungry, I am seeing
that my body needs food."
But every language says, "I am hungry, I am thirsty." I know it is simpler to say, "I am
thirsty," than to say again and again, "I am aware that my body is thirsty."
One of the great Indian mystics visited America -- his name was Swami Ram. He used
to speak of himself in the third person, he never used to use the word 'I'. He would only
call himself Ram. He would say, "Ram is hungry. Ram is thirsty. Now Ram is feeling
sleepy." It is a very strange way because we are not accustomed to it.
When he went to America for the first time, people could not understand him or would
understand him only in a wrong way, misunderstand him. He would say, "Ram is
hungry." They would look all around -- where is Ram? And then he would show them:
"This body is Ram, this body is hungry."And they would say, "Then why don't you simply say 'I am hungry'? Why go so
roundabout, why go in circles? 'Ram is hungry.' Then we have to ask, 'Who is Ram?'
Then you have to say, 'This body is Ram.'"
But Ram would say, "I cannot assert something which is not true. I cannot say 'I am
hungry' because I am not."
Once it happened that he was sitting in a park, a public park, and a few people who had
gathered around him were asking questions. One man asked, "We have heard about
Krishna that when he used to play on his flute that people would forget their jobs and
just rush towards him enchanted, as if possessed. What was his secret?"
Ram was only wearing one single cloth, he had just wrapped a blanket around himself.
He threw the blanket -- rather than answering he created a situation. That's how great
mystics work. He threw the blanket, he was utterly naked, and he ran away. All the
people ran with him! Not only those who were surrounding him but others also who
were standing here and there or who had come for a morning walk, and people who
were sitting on the benches reading their newspapers, they threw their newspapers. A
great crowd was following him, and he was laughing and giggling, and the whole
crowd was following him.
And then he stood under a tree and he said, "Why are you following me? For what? I
have not even played on the flute! And you had asked me why people used to become
possessed by Krishna's flute."
Wherever something of the beyond happens, people become enchanted. "You are
enchanted," he said. "And Ram has not done anything special. Ram has only become
naked and has been running like a child in the morning sun."
Somebody who was not acquainted with his way of talking asked, "Who is this Ram?"
And again he said, "This body is Ram, this mind is Ram, and I am a watcher just as you
are a watcher. Just as you watched this body running naked in the morning sun, I was
also watching. You are watching from without, I am watching from within. We are both
watchers."
This is the way to become disidentified from the mind: be a watcher.
Buddha says: AS THE FLETCHER WHITTLES AND MAKES STRAIGHT HIS
ARROWS, SO THE MASTER DIRECTS HIS STRAYING THOUGHTS. Then it will be
possible and only then: when you have become an observer, when you have reduced
your thoughts to observed objects, the content of the mind is no longer powerful. You
have slipped out of its power, you are standing apart. You are a spectator, a witness.
When you have become a witness, you will be able to direct your thoughts. Then
thoughts can be used, then thoughts are beautiful.
The mind is the most sophisticated mechanism in the whole of existence, and the
human mind more so than any other. It is the most evolved machine, it can be used for
great things. But you have to be the master, only then can you use it.
But the situation is such that the car is driving the driver.
The driver has become completely unaware of himself; maybe he is drunk. He is simply
moving wherever the car is leading him. Now he is bound for a ditch, bound for anaccident! And if your life is so full of accidents it is not an accident at all -- it has to be
so.
You are following a machine. It is a biocomputer, your mind; beautiful if you can use it
as a master, dangerous if it uses you. This is slavery. To be free of it is to know
something of freedom.
And the first effort should be like the fletcher who makes his arrows straight.
Your minds are not in a state of harmony; your minds are in a mess, nothing is straight
there. Everything has become a very complicated labyrinth, a riddle. You don't know
what is what and which is which. You don't know what you are doing and why. And
one moment one thought possesses you, another moment another thought possesses
you, and both may be contradictory. So by one hand you make something and by the
other hand you unmake it. Hence the utter failure of life, a sheer wastage of energy and
time and opportunity.
Watch how contradictory your thoughts are. One part says yes, another part
immediately says no, never misses the opportunity to say no. Now saying yes and no
together is wasting your energy. Either say yes and be total, then your thought is
straight; or say no and be total, then your thought is straight. But saying yes and no
together, or alternately -- one moment yes, another moment no -- where are you going
to reach? You take one step in one direction, another step in another direction. You will
remain stuck in the same place, or at the most you will move in circles, But your life will
not be a life of growth, you will not grow. You may certainly grow old but you will
never grow up, you will never attain to maturity.
Straighten out your thoughts! It is almost a complete jungle in your mind -- all paths are
lost. You don't know what is happening. You can't stop either, because it makes you
frightened to stop. Everybody else is doing so much, everybody else is achieving,
reaching, fulfilling their ambitions, how can you stop? You have to go on, and you have
to go on with great speed and great gusto and enthusiasm. And you don't know where
you are going, what the goal is. What do you really want to achieve in life? Money?
And even if you achieve much money what will you do with it?
You can purchase more misery, of course, when you have more money; that's what you
are going to do. You will go on purchasing the same things that you are purchasing
now. Of course, you can purchase them in bigger quantities, that's all. You will live in
bigger houses, but you will live; the house is not going to live it. If you are anxious in a
small house you may be more anxious in a bigger house, because you will have more
space to be anxious in. If you are ignorant, utterly ignorant of yourself, how is money
going to help? How is being famous going to help? You may become a world-renowned
person, but that will not change anything. Your inner darkness will remain the same; it
may even become darker.
The first thing Buddha says is: ...THE MASTER DIRECTS HIS STRAYING THOUGHTS.
He does not allow the thoughts to go into contradictory pathways. He does not allow
one thought to be destroyed by another. He does not allow thoughts to direct him -- he
is the director. He masters them; he uses them as beautiful implements, instruments.And then certainly he comes to fulfillment, because he knows where he is going and he
knows what he is doing.
On each step of his journey he is perfectly aware of his whereabouts; he has a certain
sense of direction. He does not go on running in all the directions simultaneously; he
has a direction. Naturally he becomes integrated, he becomes a great power. Without
attaining any political power he becomes a great power. His power arises from his own
being, it is his own. Nobody can take it away; it does not depend on anybody. Even
death cannot take it away from him, even death is impotent.
But people are living in such an insane state. This state is insane! People feel offended
when I say that the whole of humanity is insane, but what can I do? -- it is so. The fact
has to be stated, howsoever painful it is. I am also pained by it, I feel sorry for
humanity, but it has to be said: that the whole of humanity is mad. What you call
normal human beings are not normal at all. They are normally mad, certainly; their
madness is almost the same, hence they are normal. But they are not the norm, they are
not the principle, they are not the criterion of health. The whole earth is a big
madhouse.
Kahlil Gibran has a beautiful story:
One man becomes insane; he is put in an insane asylum. A friend comes to visit him.
The friend is a professor, a professor of philosophy, has written many books, is a well-
known scholar, is also a psychologist. The madman is sitting on a bench under a tree in
the garden, surrounded by a big wall. The professor comes, sits by his side and asks
him, "How are you feeling inside this place?"
The madman laughs. He says, "I am feeling so good -- as I have never felt before."
The professor is puzzled. He says, "Why? Why are you feeling so happy being in this
madhouse?"
The madman says, "Madhouse? This you call a madhouse? I have left the madhouse
outside -- this is the sanest place in the world! The madhouse is outside; this wall
protects us from mad people. If ever you become tired of the mad people outside, you
are always welcome here. Come in! It is very peaceful here -- nobody interferes in
anybody's work. It is very silent here. Very few people are here, and I have never seen
such sane people in my whole life -- they are all like me!"
That's his definition of sanity: he is sane and they are like him. The people who are
outside are insane.
But the same criterion is followed by the people outside: you think yourself sane
because you are exactly like your neighbors. But who knows? -- the neighbors may be
insane too.
The whole history of humanity proves that this is an insane humanity; something is
basically wrong with it. In three thousand years man has fought five thousand wars.
Will you call this humanity sane? Everybody is greedy, jealous, possessive -- and you
call this humanity sane? Everybody is at each other's throats -- and you call this
humanity sane? Normal of course -- normal in the sense that they are all alike.Once Mark Twain advertised, as a hoax, that he had lost a cat so black that it could not
be seen by ordinary light, and he wanted it back. Nearly a thousand people contacted
him claiming to have seen it.
Just look around, just observe people, and you will be surprised seeing the utterly
insane state which is known as normal. What is normal? What is the definition of a
normal human being?
He should be full of love, he should be full of bliss. He should be fearless. He should be
joyous and ecstatic. He should be able to sing and laugh and dance. He should be able
to enjoy the small things of life. He should be total in whatsoever he is doing. His
thoughts will be straight: if he says no he means no, if he says yes he means yes. He will
not be diplomatic, he will not be political in that he says one thing, he means another,
and will do a third thing. You cannot figure it out, you can never be sure what the
political person is going to do. He has one face outside and another reality inside. He is
double-faced, in a double bind. He smiles at you, he greets you -- and he hates you, he
curses you inside. He is an enemy, yet he pretends to be a friend.
This is insanity! This hypocrisy is insanity, this split is insanity. This schizophrenic
atmosphere is insane. It is not a healthy human being that we have been able to
produce. We have failed up to now...and we have to do something very drastic now,
otherwise humanity is doomed. Now the insane people have so much destructive
power in their hands that one war more and humanity is finished and this planet is
finished.
Something tremendously drastic is needed, a quantum leap is needed. But this is
possible only through those people who listen to the buddhas.
...THE MASTER DIRECTS HIS STRAYING THOUGHTS.
LIKE A FISH OUT OF WATER,
STRANDED ON THE SHORE,
THOUGHTS THRASH AND QUIVER.
FOR HOW CAN THEY SHAKE OFF DESIRE?
Thoughts cannot live out of desire, just as a fish cannot live out of the sea. Thoughts
cannot live out of the sea of desire: thoughts are basically instruments of a desiring
state. And we are continuously desiring, desiring this and that. We cannot stop thinking
if we go on desiring. First the desire, the very root, has to be cut.
What is there to desire in life? Those who have known, those who have realized life, say
there is nothing worth desiring in life. Live it! and live as wholly as possible, and live
each moment to its uttermost. Squeeze it totally. But there is nothing to desire. Desire
leads you astray because it leads you into the future.
Drink out of the present moment, because the present moment is the door to God. God
has only one tense: the present. He knows no past and no future. If you also want to be
part of God...and that's the only way to be sane, to be healthy. Only a religious person issane and healthy. If you want to be part of God, you will have to learn to relax in the
present moment.
Die to the past and die to the future, and live in the present. Don't allow yourself to
move from the present, not even a single inch here and there; otherwise you will always
go on missing the train.
And the mind is continuously running from one object to another, from one person to
another. You have a wife, but the mind is running after other people's wives. You have
children, but they never look so beautiful as other people's children. The grass is always
greener on the other side of the hedge. Everybody else seems to be happier than you.
And then, of course, you logically deduce: "They have bigger houses, better children, a
beautiful woman, more money, more power, more prestige, so these are the things I
also need. Unless I have all these things, how can I be happy?" You make your
happiness conditional. And the moment a man makes his happiness conditional he is
doomed; he will remain unhappy his whole life.
Happiness is not conditional; nothing is needed to be happy. Only to be alive is needed
-- and that you are, you already are. Only to be conscious is needed -- and that you
already are. Hence the mystics and the buddhas say that bliss is our very nature. But the
mind is a runner and it keeps dragging you.
The sultan called for his eunuch. "I am in the mood," he said. "Go get me wife number
256."
So the eunuch ran out of the palace and into the harem. He ran through the garden, past
the orchard, and up the steps. Soon he returned with wife 256. A bit later the sultan sent
for the eunuch again and said, "I want more. Go get me wife 87." The eunuch ran and
got her. Then the king wanted wife 68, and soon after, wife 92.
When he returned with wife number 92 the eunuch was panting heavily. Then he
suddenly collapsed and died.
Moral: It is not the loving that kills you, it is the running around.
The mind is continuously running around. It never sits, it can't sit. Sitting seems to be
death to it, and in a way it is. That's why Zen people say, if you can sit silently for a few
hours every day, doing nothing, not even chanting a mantra, because that is again a
running of the mind, the same mind.... It can sing pop songs, it can chant a religious
mantra, it makes no difference. It wants some work, it wants activity, it wants
occupation, it wants to run. Its life is in the running.
The Zen people say just sit, don't do anything. The most difficult thing in the world is
just to sit doing nothing. But once you have got the knack of it.... If you go on sitting for
a few months doing nothing for a few hours every day, slowly slowly, many things will
happen. You will feel sleepy, you will dream. Many thoughts will crowd your mind,
many things. The mind will say, "Why are you wasting your time? You could have
earned a little money. At least you could have gone to a film, entertained yourself, or
you could have relaxed and gossiped. You could have watched the TV or listened to theradio, or at least you could have read the newspaper you have not seen. Why are you
wasting your time?"
Mind will give you a thousand and one arguments, but if you just go on listening
without being bothered by the mind.... It will do all kinds of tricks: it will hallucinate, it
will dream, it will become sleepy. It will do all that is possible to drag you out of just
sitting. But if you go on, if you persevere, one day the sun rises.
One day it happens, you are not feeling sleepy, the mind has become tired of you, is fed
up with you, has dropped the idea that you can be trapped, is simply finished with you!
There is no sleep, no hallucination, no dream, no thought. You are simply sitting there
doing nothing...and all is silence and all is peace and all is bliss. You have entered God,
you have entered truth.
THEY TREMBLE, THEY ARE UNSTEADY,
THEY WANDER AT THEIR WILL.
IT IS GOOD TO CONTROL THEM.
AND TO MASTER THEM BRINGS HAPPINESS.
Watch, and you will see the trembling mind, the quivering thoughts chasing each other,
running in every possible direction, consistent, inconsistent, meaningful, meaningless.
Just one day sit down in your room, close the doors, and start writing the thoughts that
are happening to you. That will help you to become aware. Just go on writing
whatsoever is happening. Don't edit, don't make them look consistent, beautiful. It is
not to be shown to anybody, it is just for your observation. For fifteen minutes go on
writing, then read it, and you will be puzzled: are you mad or something? What kind of
things are going on in your head? All kinds of things, so irrelevant that you cannot
conceive any possible relationship with them. Anything leads to anything just
accidentally.
The dog starts barking in the neighborhood and your mind starts functioning. You
remember a dog you used to have in your childhood, and suddenly the mind jumps
from the dog to a friend who was also known in the childhood...and from the friend to
the school, and the teacher. And this way the mind goes on hopping, and you will land
nobody knows where. And it was just started by the barking of the dog who knows
nothing about you, who is not interested at all in you, but he triggered a process. You
may reach anywhere! And each time it happens you will reach some other place.
Mind goes on jumping from one place to another, and mind has so much information
that it can produce all kinds of worlds.
Watching it you will see the truth of Buddha's statement: THEY TREMBLE, THEY ARE
UNSTEADY, THEY WANDER AT THEIR WILL. They don't listen to you, they have
their own will. Each thought has its own will and insists on remaining itself. It does not
want to be tinkered with, it does not want you to interfere. If you interfere, it resists, it
protests. Every thought wants its own individuality. And these millions of thoughts in
your head destroy your individuality, because they all claim their own individuality
and they all claim to be autonomous and free. And if you say anything, they ask, "Whoare you?" And each time they will show you your place, they will reduce you to
nothing.
Unless they are controlled, Buddha says, there is no possibility of bliss happening to
you. You will remain in a mess, you will remain a confusion.
Inmate: "I have a mad, insane desire to crush you in my arms."
Lady psychiatrist: "Now you are talking sense!"
It depends on you what you call sense and what you call nonsense. There are
philosophers in the world who say all is nonsense, and there are philosophers in the
world who say everything is sense, sensible. This is the most rational world, they say,
very logical. It all depends on you what you call sense and what you think is sensible. It
depends on your training, your upbringing, your conditioning, the way you have been
hypnotized.
Now, eating meat is sensible if you have been brought up in a house where nobody
ever thought of vegetarianism; even if they talked about it, they talked only to laugh at
vegetarians: "These foolish people who think that by becoming vegetarians they are
becoming religious." If you are born in a vegetarian house, in a vegetarian family, then
the people who eat meat are monsters. They are not people at all; they are untouchable,
they are not human beings, they are animals.
You yourself never know what is right, what is wrong; you know only according to
what others have said to you. This is not a way which can lead you into sanity. You will
have to become more aware, more alert, more watchful. You will have to decide on
your own. You have lived a borrowed life. You will have to reflect -- you become a
human being only when you start reflecting on things on your own. When you observe
accurately, precisely, when you judge, when you value, when you weigh things and
you start living according to your own consciousness more and more, you will attain to
freedom. And freedom brings bliss.
Freedom means you have to control the mind, your so-called mind, which is not yours
at all because it has been given to you by others, in fragments. A part of it belongs to
your mother, another part to your father, another part to your uncle, and so on and so
forth...to the priest, to the teacher, to the neighborhood boy.... You have gathered
fragments from all over the world -- from the books you have been reading and the
films you have been seeing.
If you look into it you will be surprised -- you don't have any mind of your own.
Everything is borrowed! How can you be authentic? You are just a piled-up
phenomenon, fragments from so many different sources that they can never melt and
become one. But one thing is not borrowed in you and that is your consciousness, that is
your awareness. That you have brought with you, that is part of your inner core.
Depend on it and never depend on the mind. Become independent of the mind and
absolutely dependent on consciousness, and you are taking the greatest step of your
life.
